#pubdate 2009-02-21 20:50:50 +0100 #author Max Stirner #SORTauthors Max
Stirner #title The Ego and His Own #LISTtitle Ego and His Own #lang en
#date 1845 #SORTtopics egoist, ethics #source Retrieved on February
18th, 2009 from
[[http://www.nonserviam.com/egoistarchive/stirner/bookhtml/The_Ego.html][www.nonserviam.com]]
#notes A Reproduction of the First English Edition.  Translated from the
German by Steven T.  Byington.  With an Introduction by J.  L.  Walker.
New York.  Benj.  R.  Tucker, Publisher.  1907



<quote>

To my sweetheart

Marie Dähnhardt

</quote>


	* * * * *

*** Publisher’s Preface

For more than twenty years I have entertained the design of publishing
an English translation of “_Der Einzige und Sein Eigentum_.” When I
formed this design, the number of English-speaking persons who had ever
heard of the book was very limited.  The memory of Max Stirner had been
virtually extinct for an entire generation.  But in the last two decades
there has been a remarkable revival of interest both in the book and in
its author.  It began in this country with a discussion in the pages of
the Anarchist periodical, “Liberty,” in which Stirner’s thought was
clearly expounded and vigorously championed by Dr.  James L.  Walker,
who adopted for this discussion the pseudonym “Tak Kak.” At that time
Dr.  Walker was the chief editorial writer for the Galveston “News.”
Some years later he became a practicing physician in Mexico, where he
died in 1904.  A series of essays which he began in an Anarchist
periodical, “Egoism,” and which he lived to complete, was published
after his death in a small volume, “The Philosophy of Egoism.” It is a
very able and convincing exposition of Stirner’s teachings, and almost
the only one that exists in the English language.  But the chief
instrument in the revival of Stirnerism was and is the German poet, John
Henry Mackay.  Very early in his career he met Stirner’s name in Lange’s
“History of Materialism,” and was moved thereby to read his book.  The
work made such an impression on him that he resolved to devote a portion
of his life to the rediscovery and rehabilitation of the lost and
forgotten genius.  Through years of toil and correspondence and travel,
and triumphing over tremendous obstacles, he carried his task to
completion, and his biography of Stirner appeared in Berlin in 1898.  It
is a tribute to the thoroughness of Mackay’s work that since its
publication not one important fact about Stirner has been discovered by
anybody.  During his years of investigation Mackay’s advertising for
information had created a new interest in Stirner, which was enhanced by
the sudden fame of the writings of Friedrich Nietzsche, an author whose
intellectual kinship with Stirner has been a subject of much
controversy.  “_Der Einzige,”_ previously obtainable only in an
expensive form, was included in Philipp Reclam’s Universal-Bibliothek,
and this cheap edition has enjoyed a wide and ever-increasing
circulation.  During the last dozen years the book has been translated
twice into French, once into Italian, once into Russian, and possibly
into other languages.  The Scandinavian critic, Brandes, has written on
Stirner.  A large and appreciative volume, entitled _“L’Individualisme
Anarchiste: Max Stirner,”_ from the pen of Prof Victor Basch, of the
University of Rennes, has appeared in Paris.  Another large and
sympathetic volume, “Max Stirner,” written by Dr.  Anselm Ruest, has
been published very recently in Berlin.  Dr.  Paul Eltzbacher, in his
work, _“Der Anarchismus_,” gives a chapter to Stirner, making him one of
the seven typical Anarchists, beginning with William Godwin and ending
with Tolstoi, of whom his book treats.  There is hardly a notable
magazine or a review on the Continent that has not given at least one
leading article to the subject of Stirner.  Upon the initiative of
Mackay and with the aid of other admirers a suitable stone has been
placed above the philosopher’s previously neglected grave, and a
memorial tablet upon the house in Berlin where he died in 1856; and this
spring another is to be placed upon the house in Bayreuth where he was
born in 1806.  As a result of these various efforts, and though but
little has been written about Stirner in the English language, his name
is now known at least to thousands in America and England where formerly
it was known only to hundreds.Therefore conditions are now more
favorable for the reception of this volume than they were when I formed
the design of publishing it, more than twenty years ago.

The problem of securing a reasonably good translation (for in the case
of a work presenting difficulties so enormous it was idle to hope for an
adequate translation) was finally solved by entrusting the task to
Steven T.  Byington, a scholar of remarkable attainments, whose
specialty is philology, and who is also one of the ablest workers in the
propaganda of Anarchism.  But, for further security from error, it was
agreed with Mr.  Byington that his translation should have the benefit
of revision by Dr.  Walker, the most thorough American student of
Stirner, and by Emma Heller Schumm and George Schumm, who are not only
sympathetic with Stirner, but familiar with the history of his time, and
who enjoy a knowledge of English and German that makes it difficult to
decide which is their native tongue.  It was also agreed that, upon any
point of difference between the translator and his revisers which
consultation might fail to solve, the publisher should decide.  This
method has been followed, and in a considerable number of instances it
has fallen to me to make a decision.  It is only fair to say, therefore,
that the responsibility for special errors and imperfections properly
rests on my shoulders, whereas, on the other hand, the credit for
whatever general excellence the translation may possess belongs with the
same propriety to Mr.  Byington and his coadjutors.  One thing is
certain: its defects are due to no lack of loving care and pains.  And I
think I may add with confidence, while realizing fully how far short of
perfection it necessarily falls, that it may safely challenge comparison
with the translations that have been made into other languages.

In particular, I am responsible for the admittedly erroneous rendering
of the title.  “The Ego and His Own” is not an exact English equivalent
of _“Der Einzige und Sein Eigentum.”_ But then, there is no exact
English equivalent.  Perhaps the nearest is “The Unique One and His
Property.” But the unique one is not strictly the _Einzige,_ for
uniqueness connotes not only singleness but an admirable singleness,
while Stirner’s _Einzigkeit_ is admirable in his eyes only as such, it
being no part of the purpose of his book to distinguish a particular
_Einzigkeit_ as more excellent than another.  Moreover, “The Unique One
and His Property” has no graces to compel our forgiveness of its slight
inaccuracy.  It is clumsy and unattractive.  And the same objections may
be urged with still greater force against all the other renderings that
have been suggested, — “The Single One and His Property,” “The Only One
and His Property,” “The Lone One and His Property,” “The Unit and His
Property,” and, last and least and worst, “The Individual and His
Prerogative.” “The Ego and His Own,” on the other hand, if not a precise
rendering, is at least an excellent title in itself; excellent by its
euphony, its monosyllabic incisiveness, and its telling — _Einzigkeit_.
Another strong argument in its favor is the emphatic correspondence of
the phrase “his own” with Mr.  Byington’s renderings of the kindred
words, _Eigenheit_ and _Eigner._ Moreover, no reader will be led astray
who bears in mind Stirner’s distinction: “I am not an ego along with
other egos, but the sole ego; I am unique.” And, to help the reader to
bear this in mind, the various renderings of the word _Einzige_ that
occur through the volume are often accompanied by foot-notes showing
that, in the German, one and the same word does duty for all.

If the reader finds the first quarter of this book somewhat forbidding
and obscure, he is advised nevertheless not to falter.  Close attention
will master almost every difficulty, and, if he will but give it, he
will find abundant reward in what follows.  For his guidance I may
specify one defect in the author’s style.  When controverting a view
opposite to his own, he seldom distinguishes with sufficient clearness
his statement of his own view from his re-statement of the antagonistic
view.  As a result, the reader is plunged into deeper and deeper
mystification, until something suddenly reveals the cause of his
misunderstanding, after which he must go back and read again.  I
therefore put him on his guard.  The other difficulties lie, as a rule,
in the structure of the work.  As to these I can hardly do better than
translate the following passage from Prof.  Basch’s book, alluded to
above: “There is nothing more disconcerting than the first approach to
this strange work.  Stirner does not condescend to inform us as to the
architecture of his edifice, or furnish us the slightest guiding thread.
The apparent divisions of the book are few and misleading.  From the
first page to the last a unique thought circulates, but it divides
itself among an infinity of vessels and arteries in each of which runs a
blood so rich in ferments that one is tempted to describe them all.
There is no progress in the development, and the repetitions are
innumerable....The reader who is not deterred by this oddity, or rather
absence, of composition gives proof of genuine intellectual courage.  At
first one seems to be confronted with a collection of essays strung
together, with a throng of aphorisms....But, if you read this book
several times; if, after having penetrated the intimacy of each of its
parts, you then traverse it as a whole, — gradually the fragments weld
themselves together, and Stirner’s thought is revealed in all its unity,
in all its force, and in all its depth.”

A word about the dedication.  Mackay’s investigations have brought to
light that Marie Dähnhardt had nothing whatever in common with Stirner,
and so was unworthy of the honor conferred upon her.  She was no
_Eigene._ I therefore reproduce the dedication merely in the interest of
historical accuracy.

Happy as I am in the appearance of this book, my joy is not unmixed with
sorrow.  The cherished project was as dear to the heart of Dr.  Walker
as to mine, and I deeply grieve that he is no longer with us to share
our delight in the fruition.  Nothing, however, can rob us of the
masterly introduction that he wrote for this volume (in 1903, or perhaps
earlier), from which I will not longer keep the reader.  This
introduction, no more than the book itself, shall that _Einzige_, Death,
make his _Eigentum._

_February, 1907.  B.  R.  T._

*** Introduction

Fifty years sooner or later can make little difference in the; case of a
book so revolutionary as this.  It saw the light when a so-called
revolutionary movement was preparing in men’s minds which agitation was,
however, only a disturbance due to desires to participate in government,
and to govern and to be governed, in a manner different to that which
prevails.  The “revolutionists” of 1848 were bewitched with an idea.
They were not at all the masters of ideas.  Most of those who since that
time have prided themselves upon being revolutionists have been and are
likewise but the bondmen of an idea, — that of the different lodgment of
authority.

The temptation is, of course, present to attempt an explanation of the
central thought of this work; but such an effort appears to be
unnecessary to one who has the volume in his hand.  The author’s care in
illustrating his meaning shows that he realized how prone the possessed
man is to misunderstand whatever is not moulded according to the
fashions in thinking.  The author’s learning was considerable, his
command of words and ideas may never be excelled by another, and he
judged it needful to develop his argument in manifold ways.  So those
who enter into the spirit of it will scarcely hope to impress others
with the same conclusion in a more summary manner.  Or, if one might
deem that possible after reading Stirner, still one cannot think that it
could be done so surely.  The author has made certain work of it, even
though he has to wait for his public; but still, the reception of the
book by its critics amply proves the truth of the saying that one can
give another arguments, but not understanding.  The system-makers and
system-believers thus far cannot get it out of their heads that any
discourse about the nature of an ego must turn upon the common
characteristics of egos, to make a systematic scheme of what they share
as a generality.  The critics inquire what kind of man the author is
talking about.  They repeat the question: What does he believe in?  They
fail to grasp the purport of the recorded answer: “I believe in myself”;
which is attributed to a common soldier long before the time of Stirner.
They ask, what is the principle of the self-conscious egoist, the
Einzige?  To this perplexity Stirner says: Change the question; put
“who?” instead of “what?” and an answer can then be given by naming him!

This, of course, is too simple for persons governed by ideas, and for
persons in quest of new governing ideas.  They wish to classify the man.
Now, that in me which you can classify is not my distinguishing self.
“Man” is the horizon or zero of my existence as an individual.  Over
that I rise as I can.  At least I am something more than “man in
general.” Pre-existing worship of ideals and disrespect for self had
made of the ego at the very most a Somebody, oftener an empty vessel to
be filled with the grace or the leavings of a tyrannous doctrine; thus a
Nobody.  Stirner dispels the morbid subjection, and recognizes each one
who knows and feels himself as his own property to be neither humble
Nobody nor befogged Somebody, but henceforth flat-footed and
level-headed Mr.  Thisbody, who has a character and good pleasure of his
own, just as he has a name of his own.  The critics who attacked this
work and were answered in the author’s minor writings, rescued from
oblivion by John Henry Mackay, nearly all display the most astonishing
triviality and impotent malice.

We owe to Dr.  Eduard von Hartmann the unquestionable service which he
rendered by directing attention to this book in his “Philosophie des
Unbewußten,” the first edition of which was published in 1869, and in
other writings.  I do not begrudge Dr.  von Hartmann the liberty of
criticism which he used; and I think the admirers of Stirner’s teaching
must quite appreciate one thing which Von Hartmann did at a much later
date.  In “Der Eigene” of August 10, 1896, there appeared a letter
written by him and giving, among other things, certain data from which
to judge that, when Friedrich Nietzsche wrote his later essays,
Nietzsche was not ignorant of Stirner’s book.

Von Hartmann wishes that Stirner had gone on and developed his
principle.  Von Hartmann suggests that you and I are really the same
spirit, looking out through two pairs of eyes.  Then, one may reply, I
need not concern myself about you, for in myself I have — us; and at
that rate Von Hartmann is merely accusing himself of inconsistency: for,
when Stirner wrote this book, Von Hartmann’s spirit was writing it; and
it is just the pity that Von Hartmann in his present form does not
indorse what he said in the form of Stirner, — that Stirner was
different from any other man; that his ego was not Fichte’s
transcendental generality, but “this transitory ego of flesh and blood.”
It is not as a generality that you and I differ, but as a couple of
facts which are not to be reasoned into one.  “I” is somewise Hartmann,
and thus Hartmann is “I”; but I am not Hartmann, and Hartmann is not —
I.  Neither am I the “I” of Stirner; only Stirner himself was Stirner’s
“I.” Note how comparatively indifferent a matter it is with Stirner that
one is an ego, but how all-important it is that one be a self-conscious
ego, — a self-conscious, self-willed person.

Those not self-conscious and self-willed are constantly acting from
self-interested motives, but clothing these in various garbs.  Watch
those people closely in the light of Stirner’s teaching, and they seem
to be hypocrites, they have so many good moral and religious plans of
which self-interest is at the end and bottom; but they, we may believe,
do not know that this is more than a coincidence.

In Stirner we have the philosophical foundation for political liberty.
His interest in the practical development of egoism to the dissolution
of the State and the union of free men is clear and pronounced, and
harmonizes perfectly with the economic philosophy of Josiah Warren.
Allowing for difference of temperament and language, there is a
substantial agreement between Stirner and Proudhon.  Each would be free,
and sees in every increase of the number of free people and their
intelligence an auxiliary force against the oppressor.  But, on the
other hand, will any one for a moment seriously contend that Nietzsche
and Proudhon march together in general aim and tendency, — that they
have anything in common except the daring to profane the shrine and
sepulchre of superstition?

Nietzsche has been much spoken of as a disciple of Stirner, and, owing
to favorable cullings from Nietzsche’s writings, it has occurred that
one of his books has been supposed to contain more sense than it really
does — so long as one had read only the extracts.

Nietzsche cites scores or hundreds of authors.  Had he read everything,
and not read Stirner?

But Nietzsche is as unlike Stirner as a tight-rope performance is unlike
an algebraic equation.

Stirner loved liberty for himself, and loved to see any and all men and
women taking liberty, and he had no lust of power.  Democracy to him was
sham liberty, egoism the genuine liberty.

Nietzsche, on the contrary, pours out his contempt upon democracy
because it is not aristocratic.  He is predatory to the point of
demanding that those who must succumb to feline rapacity shall be taught
to submit with resignation.  When he speaks of “Anarchistic dogs”
scouring the streets of great civilized cities; it is true, the context
shows that he means the Communists; but his worship of Napoleon, his
bathos of anxiety for the rise of an aristocracy that shall rule Europe
for thousands of years, his idea of treating women in the oriental
fashion, show that Nietzsche has struck out in a very old path — doing
the apotheosis of tyranny.  We individual egoistic Anarchists, however,
may say to the Nietzsche school, so as not to be misunderstood: We do
not ask of the Napoleons to have pity, nor of the predatory barons to do
justice.  They will find it convenient for their own welfare to make
terms with men who have learned of Stirner what a man can be who
worships nothing, bears allegiance to nothing.  To Nietzsche’s
rhodomontade of eagles in baronial form, born to prey on industrial
lambs, we rather tauntingly oppose the ironical question: Where are your
claws?  What if the “eagles” are found to be plain barn-yard fowls on
which more silly fowls have fastened steel spurs to hack the victims,
who, however, have the power to disarm the sham “eagles” between two
suns?  Stirner shows that men make their tyrants as they make their
gods, and his purpose is to unmake tyrants.

Nietzsche dearly loves a tyrant.

In style Stirner’s work offers the greatest possible contrast to the
puerile, padded phraseology of Nietzsche’s “Zarathustra” and its false
imagery.  Who ever imagined such an unnatural conjuncture as an eagle
“toting” a serpent in friendship?  which performance is told of in bare
words, but nothing comes of it.  In Stirner we are treated to an
enlivening and earnest discussion addressed to serious minds, and every
reader feels that the word is to him, for his instruction and benefit,
so far as he has mental independence and courage to take it and use it.
The startling intrepidity of this book is infused with a whole-hearted
love for all mankind, as evidenced by the fact that the author shows not
one iota of prejudice or any idea of division of men into ranks.  He
would lay aside government, but would establish any regulation deemed
convenient, and for this only our convenience in consulted.  Thus there
will be general liberty only when the disposition toward tyranny is met
by intelligent opposition that will no longer submit to such a rule.
Beyond this the manly sympathy and philosophical bent of Stirner are
such that rulership appears by contrast a vanity, an infatuation of
perverted pride.  We know not whether we more admire our author or more
love him.

Stirner’s attitude toward woman is not special.  She is an individual if
she can be, not handicapped by anything he says, feels, thinks, or
plans.  This was more fully exemplified in his life than even in this
book; but there is not a line in the book to put or keep woman in an
inferior position to man, neither is there anything of caste or
aristocracy in the book.  Likewise there is nothing of obscurantism or
affected mysticism about it.  Everything in it is made as plain as the
author could make it.  He who does not so is not Stirner’s disciple nor
successor nor co-worker.  Some one may ask: How does plumb-line
Anarchism train with the unbridled egoism proclaimed by Stirner?  The
plumb-line is not a fetish, but an intellectual conviction, and egoism
is a universal fact of animal life.  Nothing could seem clearer to my
mind than that the reality of egoism must first come into the
consciousness of men, before we can have the unbiased Einzige in place
of the prejudiced biped who lends himself to the support of tyrannies a
million times stronger over me than the natural self-interest of any
individual.  When plumb-line doctrine is misconceived as duty between
unequal-minded men, — as a religion of humanity, — it is indeed the
confusion of trying to read without knowing the alphabet and of putting
philanthropy in place of contract.  But, if the plumb-line be
scientific, it is or can be my possession, my property, and I choose it
for its use — when circumstances admit of its use.  I do not feel bound
to use it because it is scientific, in building my house; but, as my
will, to be intelligent, is not to be merely wilful, the adoption of the
plumb-line follows the discarding of incantations.  There is no
plumb-line without the unvarying lead at the end of the line; not a
fluttering bird or a clawing cat.

On the practical side of the question of egoism versus self-surrender
and for a trial of egoism in politics, this may be said: the belief that
men not moved by a sense of duty will be unkind or unjust to others is
but an indirect confession that those who hold that belief are greatly
interested in having others live for them rather than for themselves.
But I do not ask or expect so much.  I am content if others individually
live for themselves, and thus cease in so many ways to act in opposition
to my living for myself, — to our living for ourselves.

If Christianity has failed to turn the world from evil, it is not to be
dreamed that rationalism of a pious moral stamp will succeed in the same
task.  Christianity, or all philanthropic love, is tested in
non-resistance.  It is a dream that example will change the hearts of
rulers, tyrants, mobs.  If the extremest self-surrender fails, how can a
mixture of Christian love and worldly caution succeed?  This at least
must be given up.  The policy of Christ and Tolstoi can soon be tested,
but Tolstoi’s belief is not satisfied with a present test and failure.
He has the infatuation of one who persists because this ought to be.
The egoist who thinks “I should like this to be” still has the sense to
perceive that it is not accomplished by the fact of some believing and
submitting, inasmuch as others are alert to prey upon the unresisting.
The Pharaohs we have ever with us.

Several passages in this most remarkable book show the author as a man
full of sympathy.  When we reflect upon his deliberately expressed
opinions and sentiments, — his spurning of the sense of moral obligation
as the last form of superstition, — may we not be warranted in thinking
that the total disappearance of the sentimental supposition of duty
liberates a quantity of nervous energy for the purest generosity and
clarifies the intellect for the more discriminating choice of objects of
merit?

_J.  L.  Walker_

*** Translator’s Preface

If the style of this book is found unattractive, it will show that I
have done my work ill and not represented the author truly; but, if it
is found odd, I beg that I may not bear all the blame.  I have simply
tried to reproduce the author’s own mixture of colloquialisms and
technicalities, and his preference for the precise expression of his
thought rather than the word conventionally expected.

One especial feature of the style, however, gives the reason why this
preface should exist.  It is characteristic of Stirner’s writing that
the thread of thought is carried on largely by the repetition of the
same word in a modified form or sense.  That connection of ideas which
has guided popular instinct in the formation of words is made to suggest
the line of thought which the writer wishes to follow.  If this echoing
of words is missed, the bearing of the statements on each other is in a
measure lost; and, where the ideas are very new, one cannot afford to
throw away any help in following their connection.  Therefore, where a
useful echo (and then are few useless ones in the book) could not be
reproduced in English, I have generally called attention to it in a
note.  My notes are distinguished from the author’s by being enclosed in
parentheses.

One or two of such coincidences of language, occurring in words which
are prominent throughout the book, should be borne constantly in mind as
a sort of _Keri perpetuum;_ for instance, the identity in the original
of the words “spirit” and “mind,” and of the phrases “supreme being” and
“highest essence.” In such cases I have repeated the note where it
seemed that such repetition might be absolutely necessary, but have
trusted the reader to carry it in his head where a failure of his memory
would not be ruinous or likely.

For the same reason — that is, in order not to miss any indication of
the drift of the thought — I have followed the original in the very
liberal use of italics, and in the occasional eccentric use of a
punctuation mark, as I might not have done in translating a work of a
different nature.

I have set my face as a flint against the temptation to add notes that
were not part of the translation.  There is no telling how much I might
have enlarged the book if I had put a note at every sentence which
deserved to have its truth brought out by fuller elucidation — or even
at every one which I thought needed correction.  It might have been
within my province, if I had been able, to explain all the allusions to
contemporary events, but I doubt whether any one could do that properly
without having access to the files of three or four well-chosen German
newspapers of Stirner’s time.  The allusions are clear enough, without
names and dates, to give a vivid picture of certain aspects of German
life then.  The tone of some of them is explained by the fact that the
book was published under censorship.

I have usually preferred, for the sake of the connection, to translate
Biblical quotations somewhat as they stand in the German, rather than
conform them altogether to the English Bible.  I am sometimes quite as
near the original Greek as if I had followed the current translation.

Where German books are referred to, the pages cited are those of the
German editions even when (usually because of some allusions in the
text) the titles of the books are translated.

_Steven T.  Byington_


	* * * * *

<quote>

All Things Are Nothing To Me[1]

</quote>

What is not supposed to be my concern!  [_Sache_] First and foremost,
the Good Cause, [_Sache_] then God’s cause, the cause of mankind, of
truth, of freedom, of humanity, of justice; further, the cause of my
people, my prince, my fatherland; finally, even the cause of Mind, and a
thousand other causes.  Only _my_ cause is never to be my concern.
“Shame on the egoist who thinks only of himself!”

Let us look and see, then, how they manage _their_ concerns — they for
whose cause we are to labor, devote ourselves, and grow enthusiastic.

You have much profound information to give about God, and have for
thousands of years “searched the depths of the Godhead,” and looked into
its heart, so that you can doubtless tell us how God himself attends to
“God’s cause,” which we are called to serve.  And you do not conceal the
Lord’s doings, either.  Now, what is his cause?  Has he, as is demanded
of us, made an alien cause, the cause of truth or love, his own?  You
are shocked by this misunderstanding, and you instruct us that God’s
cause is indeed the cause of truth and love, but that this cause cannot
be called alien to him, because God is himself truth and love; you are
shocked by the assumption that God could be like us poor worms in
furthering an alien cause as his own.  “Should God take up the cause of
truth if he were not himself truth?” He cares only for _his_ cause, but,
because he is all in all, therefore all is his cause!  But we, we are
not all in all, and our cause is altogether little and contemptible;
therefore we must “serve a higher cause.” — Now it is clear, God cares
only for what is his, busies himself only with himself, thinks only of
himself, and has only himself before his eyes; woe to all that is not
well-pleasing to him.  He serves no higher person, and satisfies only
himself.  His cause is — a purely egoistic cause.

How is it with mankind, whose cause we are to make our own?  Is its
cause that of another, and does mankind serve a higher cause?  No,
mankind looks only at itself, mankind will promote the interests of
mankind only, mankind is its own cause.  That it may develop, it causes
nations and individuals to wear themselves out in its service, and, when
they have accomplished what mankind needs, it throws them on the
dung-heap of history in gratitude.  Is not mankind’s cause — a purely
egoistic cause?

I have no need to take up each thing that wants to throw its cause on us
and show that it is occupied only with itself, not with us, only with
its good, not with ours.  Look at the rest for yourselves.  Do truth,
freedom, humanity, justice, desire anything else than that you grow
enthusiastic and serve them?

They all have an admirable time of it when they receive zealous homage.
Just observe the nation that is defended by devoted patriots.  The
patriots fall in bloody battle or in the fight with hunger and want;
what does the nation care for that?  By the manure of their corpses the
nation comes to “its bloom”!  The individuals have died “for the great
cause of the nation,” and the nation sends some words of thanks after
them and — has the profit of it.  I call that a paying kind of egoism.

But only look at that Sultan who cares so lovingly for his people.  Is
he not pure unselfishness itself, and does he not hourly sacrifice
himself for his people?  Oh, yes, for “his people.” Just try it; show
yourself not as his, but as your own; for breaking away from his egoism
you will take a trip to jail.  The Sultan has set his cause on nothing
but himself; he is to himself all in all, he is to himself the only one,
and tolerates nobody who would dare not to be one of “his people.”

And will you not learn by these brilliant examples that the egoist gets
on best?  I for my part take a lesson from them, and propose, instead of
further unselfishly serving those great egoists, rather to be the egoist
myself.

God and mankind have concerned themselves for nothing, for nothing but
themselves.  Let me then likewise concern myself for _myself,_ who am
equally with God the nothing of all others, who am my all, who am the
only one.[_Der Einzige_]

If God, if mankind, as you affirm, have substance enough in themselves
to be all in all to themselves, then I feel that I shall still less lack
that, and that I shall have no complaint to make of my “emptiness.” I am
not nothing in the sense of emptiness, but I am the creative nothing,
the nothing out of which I myself as creator create everything.

Away, then, with every concern that is not altogether my concern!  You
think at least the “good cause” must be my concern?  What’s good, what’s
bad?  Why, I myself am my concern, and I am neither good nor bad.
Neither has meaning for me.

The divine is God’s concern; the human, man’s.  My concern is neither
the divine nor the human, not the true, good, just, free, etc., but
solely what is _mine_, and it is not a general one, but is —
unique,[_Einzig_] as I am unique.

Nothing is more to me than myself!

* Part First: _Man_

<quote>

_Man is to man the supreme being_, says Feuerbach.

_Man has just been discovered_, says Bruno Bauer.

Then let us take a more careful look at this supreme being and this new
discovery.

</quote>

** I.  A Human Life

From the moment when he catches sight of the light of the world a man
seeks to find out _himself_ and get hold of _himself_ out of its
confusion, in which he, with everything else, is tossed about in motley
mixture.

But everything that comes in contact with the child defends itself in
turn against his attacks, and asserts its own persistence.

Accordingly, because each thing _cares for itself_ at the same time
comes into constant collision with other things, the _combat_ of
self-assertion is unavoidable.

_Victory or defeat_ — between the two alternatives the fate of the
combat wavers.  The victor becomes the _lord,_ the vanquished one the
_subject_: the former exercises _supremacy_ and “rights of supremacy,”
the latter fulfills in awe and deference the “duties of a subject.

But both remain _enemies_, and always lie in wait: they watch for each
other’s _weaknesses_ — children for those of their parents and parents
for those of their children (_e.g.,_ their fear); either the stick
conquers the man, or the man conquers the stick.

In childhood liberation takes the direction of trying to get to the
bottom of things, to get at what is “back of” things; therefore we spy
out the weak points of everybody, for which, it is well known, children
have a sure instinct; therefore we like to smash things, like to rummage
through hidden corners, pry after what is covered up or out of the way,
and try what we can do with everything.  When we once get at what is
back of the things, we know we are safe; when, _e.g.,_ we have got at
the fact that the rod is too weak against our obduracy, then we no
longer fear it, “have out-grown it.”

Back of the rod, mightier than it, stands our — obduracy, our obdurate
courage.  By degrees we get at what is back of everything that was
mysterious and uncanny to us, the mysteriously-dreaded might of the rod,
the father’s stern look, etc., and back of all we find our ataraxia, _i.
e._ imperturbability, intrepidity, our counter force, our odds of
strength, our invincibility.  Before that which formerly inspired in us
fear and deference we no longer retreat shyly, but take _courage_.  Back
of everything we find our _courage_, our superiority; back of the sharp
command of parents and authorities stands, after all, our courageous
choice or our outwitting shrewdness.  And the more we feel ourselves,
the smaller appears that which before seemed invincible.  And what is
our trickery, shrewdness, courage, obduracy?  What else but —
_mind!_[_Geist_.  This word will be translated sometimes “mind” and
sometimes “spirit” in the following pages]

Through a considerable time we are spared a fight that is so exhausting
later — the fight against _reason._ The fairest part of childhood passes
without the necessity of coming to blows with reason.  We care nothing
at all about it, do not meddle with it, admit no reason.  We are not to
be persuaded to anything by _conviction_, and are deaf to good
arguments, principles, etc.; on the other hand, coaxing, punishment,
etc.  are hard for us to resist.

This stern life-and-death combat with _reason_ enters later, and begins
a new phase; in childhood we scamper about without racking our brains
much.

_Mind_ is the name of the _first_ self-discovery, the first
self-discovery, the first undeification of the divine; _i.  e._, of the
uncanny, the spooks, the “powers above.” Our fresh feeling of youth,
this feeling of self, now defers to nothing; the world is discredited,
for we are above it, we are _mind_.

Now for the first time we see that hitherto we have not looked at the
world _intelligently_ at all, but only stared at it.

We exercise the beginnings of our strength on _natural powers_.  We
defer to parents as a natural power; later we say: Father and mother are
to be forsaken, all natural power to be counted as riven.  They are
vanquished.  For the rational, _i.e._ the “intellectual” man, there is
no family as a natural power; a renunciation of parents, brothers, etc.,
makes its appearance.  If these are “born again” as _intellectual,
rational powers_, they are no longer at all what they were before.

And not only parents, but _men in general_, are conquered by the young
man; they are no hindrance to him, and are no longer regarded; for now
he says: One must obey God rather than men.

From this high standpoint everything _“earthly”_ recedes into
contemptible remoteness; for the standpoint is — the _heavenly_.

The attitude is now altogether reversed; the youth takes up an
_intellectual_ position, while the boy, who did not yet feel himself as
mind, grew up on mindless learning.  The former does not try to get hold
of _things_ (_e.g._ to get into his head the _data_ of history), but of
the _thoughts_ that lie hidden in things, and so, _e.g._, of the
_spirit_ of history.  On the other hand, the boy understands
_connections_ no doubt, but not ideas, the spirit; therefore he strings
together whatever can be learned, without proceeding _a priori_ and
theoretically, _i.e._ without looking for ideas.

As in childhood one had to overcome the resistance of the _laws of the
world_, so now in everything that he proposes he is met by an objection
of the mind, of reason, of his _own conscience_.  “That is unreasonable,
unchristian, unpatriotic,” etc., cries conscience to us, and — frightens
us away from it.  Not the might of the avenging Eumenides, not
Poseidon’s wrath, not God, far as he sees the hidden, not the father’s
rod of punishment, do we fear, but — _conscience._

We “run after our thoughts” now, and follow their commands just as
before we followed parental, human ones.  Our course of action is
determined by our thoughts (ideas, conceptions, _faith_) as it is in
childhood by the commands of our parents.

For all that, we were already thinking when we were children, only our
thoughts were not fleshless, abstract, _absolute_, _i.  e._, NOTHING BUT
THOUGHTS, a heaven in themselves, a pure world of thought, _logical_
thoughts.

On the contrary, they had been only thoughts that we had about a
_thing_; we thought of the thing so or so.  Thus we may have thought
“God made the world that we see there,” but we did not think of
(“search”) the “depths of the Godhead itself”; we may have thought “that
is the truth about the matter,” but we do not think of Truth itself, nor
unite into one sentence “God is truth.” The “depths of the Godhead, who
is truth,” we did not touch.  Over such purely logical, _i.e._
theological questions, “What is truth?” Pilate does not stop, though he
does not therefore hesitate to ascertain in an individual case “what
truth there is in the thing,” _i.e._ whether the _thing_ is true.

Any thought bound to a _thing_ is not yet _nothing but a thought_,
absolute thought.

To bring to light the _pure thought_, or to be of its party, is the
delight of youth; and all the shapes of light in the world of thought,
like truth, freedom, humanity, Man, etc., illumine and inspire the
youthful soul.

But, when the spirit is recognized as the essential thing, it still
makes a difference whether the spirit is poor or rich, and therefore one
seeks to become rich in spirit; the spirit wants to spread out so as to
found its empire — an empire that is not of this world, the world just
conquered.  Thus, then, it longs to become all in all to itself; _i.e._,
although I am spirit, I am not yet _perfected_ spirit, and must first
seek the complete spirit.

But with that I, who had just now found myself as spirit, lose myself
again at once, bowing before the complete spirit as one not my own but
_supernal_, and feeling my emptiness.

Spirit is the essential point for everything, to be sure; but then is
every spirit the “right” spirit?  The right and true spirit is the ideal
of spirit, the “Holy Spirit.” It is not my or your spirit, but just — an
ideal, supernal one, it is “God.” “God is spirit.” And this supernal
“Father in heaven gives it to those that pray to him.”[2]

The man is distinguished from the youth by the fact that he takes the
world as it is, instead of everywhere fancying it amiss and wanting to
improve it, _i.e._ model it after his ideal; in him the view that one
must deal with the world according to his _interest,_ not according to
his _ideals_, becomes confirmed.

So long as one knows himself only as _spirit_, and feels that all the
value of his existence consists in being spirit (it becomes easy for the
youth to give his life, the “bodily life,” for a nothing, for the
silliest point of honor), so long it is only _thoughts_ that one has,
ideas that he hopes to be able to realize some day when he has found a
sphere of action; thus one has meanwhile only _ideals_, unexecuted ideas
or thoughts.

Not till one has fallen in love with his _corporeal_ self, and takes a
pleasure in himself as a living flesh-and-blood person — but it is in
mature years, in the man, that we find it so — not till then has one a
personal or _egoistic_ interest, _i.e._ an interest not only of our
spirit, _e.g._, but of total satisfaction, satisfaction of the whole
chap, a _selfish_ interest.  Just compare a man with a youth, and see if
he will not appear to you harder, less magnanimous, more selfish.  Is he
therefore worse?  No, you say; he has only become more definite, or, as
you also call it, more “practical.” But the main point is this, that he
makes _himself_ more the center than does the youth, who is infatuated
about other things, _e.g._ God, fatherland, etc.

Therefore the man shows a _second_ self-discovery.  The youth found
himself as _spirit_ and lost himself again in the _general_ spirit, the
complete, holy spirit, Man, mankind — in short, all ideals; the man
finds himself as _embodied_ spirit.

Boys had only _unintellectual_ interests (_i.e._ interests devoid of
thoughts and ideas), youths only _intellectual_ ones; the man has
bodily, personal, egoistic interests.

If the child has not an _object_ that it can occupy itself with, it
feels _ennui_; for it does not yet know how to occupy itself with
_itself_.  The youth, on the contrary, throws the object aside, because
for him _thoughts_ arose out of the object; he occupies himself with his
_thoughts_, his dreams, occupies himself intellectually, or “his mind is
occupied.”

The young man includes everything not intellectual under the
contemptuous name of “externalities.” If he nevertheless sticks to the
most trivial externalities (_e.g._ the customs of students’ clubs and
other formalities), it is because, and when, he discovers _mind_ in
them, _i.e._ when they are _symbols_ to him.

As I find myself back of things, and that as mind, so I must later find
_myself_ also back of _thoughts_ — to wit, as their creator and owner.
In the time of spirits thoughts grew till they overtopped my head, whose
offspring they yet were; they hovered about me and convulsed me like
fever-phantasies — an awful power.  The thoughts had become _corporeal_
on their own account, were ghosts, _e.g._ God, Emperor, Pope,
Fatherland, etc.  If I destroy their corporeity, then I take them back
into mine, and say: “I alone am corporeal.” And now I take the world as
what it is to me, as _mine_, as my property; I refer all to myself.

If as spirit I had thrust away the world in the deepest contempt, so as
owner I thrust spirits or ideas away into their “vanity.” They have no
longer any power over me, as no “earthly might” has power over the
spirit.

The child was realistic, taken up with the things of this world, till
little by little he succeeded in getting at what was back of these very
things; the youth was idealistic, inspired by thoughts, till he worked
his way up to where he became the man, the egoistic man, who deals with
things and thoughts according to his heart’s pleasure, and sets his
personal interest above everything.  Finally, the old man?  When I
become one, there will still be time enough to speak of that.

** II.  Men of the Old Time and the New

How each of us developed himself, what he strove for, attained, or
missed, what objects he formerly pursued and what plans and wishes his
heart is now set on, what transformation his views have experienced,
what perturbations his principles — in short, how he has today become
what yesterday or years ago he was not — this he brings out again from
his memory with more or less ease, and he feels with especial vividness
what changes have taken place in himself when he has before his eyes the
unrolling of another’s life.

Let us therefore look into the activities our forefathers busied
themselves with.

*** I.  The Ancients

Custom having once given the name of “the ancients” to our pre-Christian
ancestors, we will not throw it up against them that, in comparison with
us experienced people, they ought properly to be called children, but
will rather continue to honor them as our good old fathers.  But how
have they come to be antiquated, and who could displace them through his
pretended newness?

We know, of course, the revolutionary innovator and disrespectful heir,
who even took away the sanctity of the fathers’ sabbath to hallow his
Sunday, and interrupted the course of time to begin at himself with a
new chronology; we know him, and know that it is — the Christian.  But
does he remain forever young, and is he today still the new man, or will
he too be superseded, as he has superseded the “ancients”?

The fathers must doubtless have themselves begotten the young one who
entombed them.  Let us then peep at this act of generation.

“To the ancients the world was a truth,” says Feuerbach, but he forgets
to make the important addition, “a truth whose untruth they tried to get
back of, and at last really did.” What is meant by those words of
Feuerbach will be easily recognized if they are put alongside the
Christian thesis of the “vanity and transitoriness of the world.” For,
as the Christian can never convince himself of the vanity of the divine
word, but believes in its eternal and unshakable truth, which, the more
its depths are searched, must all the more brilliantly come to light and
triumph, so the ancients on their side lived in the feeling that the
world and mundane relations (_e.g._ the natural ties of blood) were the
truth before which their powerless “I” must bow.  The very thing on
which the ancients set the highest value is spurned by Christians as the
valueless, and what they recognized as truth these brand as idle lies;
the high significance of the fatherland disappears, and the Christian
must regard himself as “a stranger on earth”;[3] the sanctity of funeral
rites, from which sprang a work of art like the Antigone of Sophocles,
is designated as a paltry thing (“Let the dead bury their dead”); the
infrangible truth of family ties is represented as an untruth which one
cannot promptly enough get clear of;[4] and so in everything.

If we now see that to the two sides opposite things appear as truth, to
one the natural, to the other the intellectual, to one earthly things
and relations, to the other heavenly (the heavenly fatherland,
“Jerusalem that is above,” etc.), it still remains to be considered how
the new time and that undeniable reversal could come out of antiquity.
But the ancients themselves worked toward making their truth a lie.

Let us plunge at once into the midst of the most brilliant years of the
ancients, into the Periclean century.  Then the Sophistic culture was
spreading, and Greece made a pastime of what had hitherto been to her a
monstrously serious matter.

The fathers had been enslaved by the undisturbed power of existing
things too long for the posterity not to have to learn by bitter
experience to _feel themselves_.  Therefore the Sophists, with
courageous sauciness, pronounce the reassuring words, “Don’t be
bluffed!” and diffuse the rationalistic doctrine, “Use your
understanding, your wit, your mind, against everything; it is by having
a good and well-drilled understanding that one gets through the world
best, provides for himself the best lot, the most pleasant _life.”_ Thus
they recognize in _mind_ man’s true weapon against the world.  This is
why they lay such stress on dialectic skill, command of language, the
art of disputation, etc.  They announce that mind is to be used against
everything; but they are still far removed from the holiness of the
Spirit, for to them it is a _means_, a weapon, as trickery and defiance
serve children for the same purpose; their mind is the unbribable
_understanding_.

Today we should call that a one-sided culture of the understanding, and
add the warning, “Cultivate not only your understanding, but also, and
especially, your heart.” Socrates did the same.  For, if the heart did
not become free from its natural impulses, but remained filled with the
most fortuitous contents and, as an uncriticized _avidity_, altogether
in the power of things, _i.e._ nothing but a vessel of the most various
_appetites_ — then it was unavoidable that the free understanding must
serve the “bad heart” and was ready to justify everything that the
wicked heart desired.

Therefore Socrates says that it is not enough for one to use his
understanding in all things, but it is a question of what _cause_ one
exerts it for.  We should now say, one must serve the “good cause.” But
serving the good cause is — being moral.  Hence Socrates is the founder
of ethics.

Certainly the principle of the Sophistic doctrine must lead to the
possibility that the blindest and most dependent slave of his desires
might yet be an excellent sophist, and, with keen understanding, trim
and expound everything in favor of his coarse heart.  What could there
be for which a “good reason” might not be found, or which might not be
defended through thick and thin?

Therefore Socrates says: “You must be ‘pure-hearted’ if your shrewdness
is to be valued.” At this point begins the second period of Greek
liberation of the mind, the period of _purity of heart_.  For the first
was brought to a close by the Sophists in their proclaiming the
omnipotence of the understanding.  But the heart remained
_worldly-minded_, remained a servant of the world, always affected by
worldly wishes.  This coarse heart was to be cultivated from now on —
the era of _culture of the heart_.  But how is the heart to be
cultivated?  What the understanding; this one side of the mind, has
reached — to wit, the capability of playing freely with and over every
concern — awaits the heart also; everything _worldly_ must come to grief
before it, so that at last family, commonwealth, fatherland, etc., are
given up for the sake of the heart, _i.  e._, _of blessedness_, the
heart’s blessedness.

Daily experience confirms the truth that the understanding may have
renounced a thing many years before the heart has ceased to beat for it.
So the Sophistic understanding too had so far become master over the
dominant, ancient powers that they now needed only to be driven out of
the heart, in which they dwelt unmolested, to have at last no part at
all left in man.  This war is opened by Socrates, and not till the dying
day of the old world does it end in peace.

The examination of the heart takes its start with Socrates, and all the
contents of the heart are sifted.  In their last and extremest struggles
the ancients threw all contents out of the heart and let it no longer
beat for anything; this was the deed of the Skeptics.  The same
purgation of the heart was now achieved in the Skeptical age, as the
understanding had succeeded in establishing in the Sophistic age.

The Sophistic culture has brought it to pass that one’s understanding no
longer _stands still_ before anything, and the Skeptical, that his heart
is no longer _moved_ by anything.

So long as man is entangled in the movements of the world and
embarrassed by relations to the world — and he is so till the end of
antiquity, because his heart still has to struggle for independence from
the worldly — so long he is not yet spirit; for spirit is without body,
and has no relations to the world and corporeality; for it the world
does not exist, nor natural bonds, but only the spiritual, and spiritual
bonds.  Therefore man must first become so completely unconcerned and
reckless, so altogether without relations, as the Skeptical culture
presents him — so altogether indifferent to the world that even its
falling in ruins would not move him — before he could feel himself as
worldless; _i.  e._, as spirit.  And this is the result of the gigantic
work of the ancients: that man knows himself as a being without
relations and without a world, as _spirit_.

Only now, after all worldly care has left him, is he all in all to
himself, is he only for himself, _i.e._ he is he spirit for the spirit,
or, in plainer language, he cares only for the spiritual.

In the Christian wisdom of serpents and innocence of doves the two sides
— understanding and heart — of the ancient liberation of mind are so
completed that they appear young and new again, and neither the one nor
the other lets itself be bluffed any longer by the worldly and natural.

Thus the ancients mounted to _spirit_, and strove to become _spiritual_.
But a man who wishes to be active as spirit is drawn to quite other
tasks than he was able to set himself formerly: to tasks which really
give something to do to the spirit and not to mere sense or
acuteness,[5] which exerts itself only to become master _of things_.
The spirit busies itself solely about the spiritual, and seeks out the
“traces of mind” in everything; to the _believing_ spirit “everything
comes from God,” and interests him only to the extent that it reveals
this origin; to the _philosophic_ spirit everything appears with the
stamp of reason, and interests him only so far as he is able to discover
in it reason, _i.  e._, spiritual content.

Not the spirit, then, which has to do with absolutely nothing
unspiritual, with no _thing_, but only with the essence which exists
behind and above things, with _thoughts —_ not that did the ancients
exert, for they did not yet have it; no, they had only reached the point
of struggling and longing for it, and therefore sharpened it against
their too-powerful foe, the world of sense (but what would not have been
sensuous for them, since Jehovah or the gods of the heathen were yet far
removed from the conception “God is _spirit_,” since the “heavenly
fatherland” had not yet stepped into the place of the sensuous, etc.?) —
they sharpened against the world of sense their _sense_, their
acuteness.  To this day the Jews, those precocious children of
antiquity, have got no farther; and with all the subtlety and strength
of their prudence and understanding, which easily becomes master of
things and forces them to obey it, they cannot discover _spirit_, which
_takes no account whatever of things_.

The Christian has spiritual interests, because he allows himself to be a
_spiritual_ man; the Jew does not even understand these interests in
their purity, because he does not allow himself to assign _no value_ to
things.  He does not arrive at pure _spirituality_, a spirituality
_e.g._ is religiously expressed, _e.g._, in the _faith_ of Christians,
which alone (_i.e._ without works) justifies.  Their _unspirituality_
sets Jews forever apart from Christians; for the spiritual man is
incomprehensible to the unspiritual, as the unspiritual is contemptible
to the spiritual.  But the Jews have only “the spirit of this world.”

The ancient acuteness and profundity lies as far from the spirit and the
spirituality of the Christian world as earth from heaven.

He who feels himself as free spirit is not oppressed and made anxious by
the things of this world, because he does not care for them; if one is
still to feel their burden, he must be narrow enough to attach _weight_
to them — as is evidently the case, _e.g._, when one is still concerned
for his “dear life.” He to whom everything centers in knowing and
conducting himself as a free spirit gives little heed to how scantily he
is supplied meanwhile, and does not reflect at all on how he must make
his arrangements to have a thoroughly inconveniences of the life that
depends on things, because he lives only spiritually and on spiritual
food, while aside from this he only gulps things down like a beast,
hardly knowing it, and dies bodily, to be sure, when his fodder gives
out, but knows himself immortal as spirit, and closes his eyes with an
adoration or a thought.  His life is occupation with the spiritual, is —
thinking; the rest does not bother him; let him busy himself with the
spiritual in any way that he can and chooses — in devotion, in
contemplation, or in philosophic cognition — his doing is always
thinking; and therefore Descartes, to whom this had at last become quite
clear, could lay down the proposition: “I think, that is — I am.” This
means, my thinking is my being or my life; only when I live spiritually
do I live; only as spirit am I really, or — I am spirit through and
through and nothing but spirit.  Unlucky Peter Schlemihl, who has lost
his shadow, is the portrait of this man become a spirit; for the
spirit’s body is shadowless.  — Over against this, how different among
the ancients!  Stoutly and manfully as they might bear themselves
against the might of things, they must yet acknowledge the might itself,
and got no farther than to protect their _life_ against it as well as
possible.  Only at a late hour did they recognize that their “true life”
was not that which they led in the fight against the things of the
world, but the “spiritual life,” “turned away” from these things; and,
when they saw this, they became Christians, _i.e._ the moderns, and
innovators upon the ancients.  But the life turned away from things, the
spiritual life, no longer draws any nourishment from nature, but “lives
only on thoughts,” and therefore is no longer “life,” but — _thinking_.

Yet it must not be supposed now that the ancients were _without
thoughts_, just as the most spiritual man is not to be conceived of as
if he could be without life.  Rather, they had their thoughts about
everything, about the world, man, the gods, etc., and showed themselves
keenly active in bringing all this to their consciousness.  But they did
not know _thought_, even though they thought of all sorts of things and
“worried themselves with their thoughts.” Compare with their position
the Christian saying, “My thoughts are not your thoughts; as the heaven
is higher than the earth, so are my thoughts higher than your thoughts,”
and remember what was said above about our child-thoughts.

What is antiquity seeking, then?  The true _enjoyment of life!_ You will
find that at bottom it is all the same as “the true life.”

The Greek poet Simonides sings: “Health is the noblest good for mortal
man, the next to this is beauty, the third riches acquired without
guile, the fourth the enjoyment of social pleasures in the company of
young friends.” These are all _good things of life_, pleasures of life.
What else was Diogenes of Sinope seeking for than the true enjoyment of
life, which he discovered in having the least possible wants?  What else
Aristippus, who found it in a cheery temper under all circumstances?
They are seeking for cheery, unclouded _life-courage_, for _cheeriness_;
they are seeking to “be of good _cheer_.”

The Stoics want to realize the _wise man_, the man with _practical
philosophy_, the man who _knows how to live —_ a wise life, therefore;
they find him in contempt for the world, in a life without development,
without spreading out, without friendly relations with the world, thus
in the _isolated life_, in life as life, not in life with others; only
the Stoic _lives_, all else is dead for him.  The Epicureans, on the
contrary, demand a moving life.

The ancients, as they want to be of good cheer, desire _good living_
(the Jews especially a long life, blessed with children and goods),
_eudaemonia_, well-being in the most various forms.  Democritus, _e.g._,
praises as such the “calm of the soul” in which one _“lives_ smoothly,
without fear and without excitement.”

So what he thinks is that with this he gets on best, provides for
himself the best lot, and gets through the world best.  But as he cannot
get rid of the world — and in fact cannot for the very reason that his
whole activity is taken up in the effort to get rid of it, _i.  e._, in
_repelling the world_ (for which it is yet necessary that what can be
and is repelled should remain existing, otherwise there would be no
longer anything to repel) — he reaches at most an extreme degree of
liberation, and is distinguishable only in degree from the less
liberated.  If he even got as far as the deadening of the earthly sense,
which at last admits only the monotonous whisper of the word “Brahm,” he
nevertheless would not be essentially distinguishable from the _sensual_
man.

Even the stoic attitude and manly virtue amounts only to this — that one
must maintain and assert himself against the world; and the ethics of
the Stoics (their only science, since they could tell nothing about the
spirit but how it should behave toward the world, and of nature
(physics) only this, that the wise man must assert himself against it)
is not a doctrine of the spirit, but only a doctrine of the repelling of
the world and of self-assertion against the world.  And this consists in
“imperturbability and equanimity of life,” and so in the most explicit
Roman virtue.

The Romans too (Horace, Cicero, etc.) went no further than this
_practical philosophy_.

The _comfort_ (_hedone_) of the Epicureans is the same _practical
philosophy_ the Stoics teach, only trickier, more deceitful.  They teach
only another _behavior_ toward the world, exhort us only to take a
shrewd attitude toward the world; the world must be deceived, for it is
my enemy.

The break with the world is completely carried through by the Skeptics.
My entire relation to the world is “worthless and truthless.” Timon
says, “The feelings and thoughts which we draw from the world contain no
truth.” “What is truth?” cries Pilate.  According to Pyrrho’s doctrine
the world is neither good nor bad, neither beautiful nor ugly, etc., but
these are predicates which I give it.  Timon says that “in itself
nothing is either good or bad, but man only _thinks_ of it thus or
thus”; to face the world only _ataraxia_ (unmovedness) and _aphasia_
(speechlessness — or, in other words, isolated _inwardness)_ are left.
There is “no longer any truth to be recognized” in the world; things
contradict themselves; thoughts about things are without distinction
(good and bad are all the same, so that what one calls good another
finds bad); here the recognition of “truth” is at an end, and only the
man _without power of recognition_, the _man_ who finds in the world
nothing to recognize, is left, and this man just leaves the truth-vacant
world where it is and takes no account of it.

So antiquity gets through with the _world of things_, the order of the
world, the world as a whole; but to the order of the world, or the
things of this world, belong not only nature, but all relations in which
man sees himself placed by nature, _e.g._ the family, the community — in
short, the so-called “natural bonds.” With the _world of the spirit_
Christianity then begins.  The man who still faces the world _armed_ is
the ancient, the — _heathen_ (to which class the Jew, too, as
non-Christian, belongs); the man who has come to be led by nothing but
his “heart’s pleasure,” the interest he takes, his fellow-feeling, his
—_spirit_, is the modern, the — Christian.

As the ancients worked toward the _conquest of the world_ and strove to
release man from the heavy trammels of connection with _other things_,
at last they came also to the dissolution of the State and giving
preference to everything private.  Of course community, family, etc., as
_natural_ relations, are burdensome hindrances which diminish my
_spiritual freedom._

*** II.  The Moderns

“If any man be in Christ, he is a _new creature_; the old is passed
away, behold, all is become new.”[6]

As it was said above, “To the ancients the world was a truth,” we must
say here, “To the moderns the spirit was a truth”; but here, as there,
we must not omit the supplement, “a truth whose untruth they tried to
get back of, and at last they really do.”

A course similar to that which antiquity took may be demonstrated in
Christianity also, in that the _understanding_ was held a prisoner under
the dominion of the Christian dogmas up to the time preparatory to the
Reformation, but in the pre-Reformation century asserted itself
_sophistically_ and played heretical pranks with all tenets of the
faith.  And the talk then was, especially in Italy and at the Roman
court, “If only the heart remains Christian-minded, the understanding
may go right on taking its pleasure.”

Long before the Reformation, people were so thoroughly accustomed to
fine-spun “wranglings” that the pope, and most others, looked on
Luther’s appearance too as a mere “wrangling of monks” at first.
Humanism corresponds to Sophisticism, and, as in the time of the
Sophists Greek life stood in its fullest bloom (the Periclean age), so
the most brilliant things happened in the time of Humanism, or, as one
might perhaps also say, of Machiavellianism (printing, the New World,
etc.).  At this time the heart was still far from wanting to relieve
itself of its Christian contents.

But finally the Reformation, like Socrates, took hold seriously of the
_heart_ itself, and since then hearts have kept growing visibly — more
unchristian.  As with Luther people began to take the matter to heart,
the outcome of this step of the Reformation must be that the heart also
gets lightened of the heavy burden of Christian faith.  The heart, from
day to day more unchristian, loses the contents with which it had busied
itself, till at last nothing but empty _warmheartedness_ is left it, the
quite general love of men, the love of _Man_, the consciousness of
freedom, “self-consciousness.”

Only so is Christianity complete, because it has become bald, withered,
and void of contents.  There are now no contents whatever against which
the heart does not mutiny, unless indeed the heart unconsciously or
without “self- consciousness” lets them slip in.  The heart _criticises_
to death with _hard-hearted_ mercilessness everything that wants to make
its way in, and is capable (except, as before, unconsciously or taken by
surprise) of no friendship, no love.  What could there be in men to
love, since they are all alike “egoists,” none of them man as such,
_i.e._ none _spirit only_?  The Christian loves only the spirit; but
where could one be found who should be really nothing but spirit?

To have a liking for the corporeal man with hide and hair — why, that
would no longer be a “spiritual” warmheartedness, it would be treason
against “pure” warmheartedness, the “theoretical regard.” For pure
warmheartedness is by no means to be conceived as like that kindliness
that gives everybody a friendly hand-shake; on the contrary, pure
warmheartedness is warm-hearted toward nobody, it is only a theoretical
interest, concern for man as man, not as a person.  The person is
repulsive to it because of being “egoistic,” because of not being that
abstraction, Man.  But it is only for the abstraction that one can have
a theoretical regard.  To pure warmheartedness or pure theory men exist
only to be criticized, scoffed at, and thoroughly despised; to it, no
less than to the fanatical parson, they are only “filth” and other such
nice things.

Pushed to this extremity of disinterested warmheartedness, we must
finally become conscious that the spirit, which alone the Christian
loves, is nothing; in other words, that the spirit is — a lie.

What has here been set down roughly, summarily, and doubtless as yet
incomprehensibly, will, it is to be hoped, become clear as we go on.

Let us take up the inheritance left by the ancients, and, as active
workmen, do with it as much as — can be done with it!  The world lies
despised at our feet, far beneath us and our heaven, into which its
mighty arms are no longer thrust and its stupefying breath does not
come.  Seductively as it may pose, it can delude nothing but our
_sense_; it cannot lead astray the spirit — and spirit alone, after all,
we really are.  Having once got _back of_ things, the spirit has also
got _above_ them, and become free from their bonds, emancipated,
supernal, free.  So speaks “spiritual freedom.”

To the spirit which, after long toil, has got rid of the world, the
worldless spirit, nothing is left after the loss of the world and the
worldly but — the spirit and the spiritual.

Yet, as it has only moved away from the world and made of itself a being
_free from the world_, without being able really to annihilate the
world, this remains to it a stumbling-block that cannot be cleared away,
a discredited existence; and, as, on the other hand, it knows and
recognizes nothing but the spirit and the spiritual, it must perpetually
carry about with it the longing to spiritualize the world, _i.e._ to
redeem it from the “black list.” Therefore, like a youth, it goes about
with plans for the redemption or improvement of the world.

The ancients, we saw, served the natural, the worldly, the natural order
of the world, but they incessantly asked themselves of this service;
and, when they had tired themselves to death in ever-renewed attempts at
revolt, then, among their last sighs, was born to them the _God_, the
“conqueror of the world.” All their doing had been nothing but _wisdom
of the world_, an effort to get back of the world and above it.  And
what is the wisdom of the many following centuries?  What did the
moderns try to get back of?  No longer to get back of the world, for the
ancients had accomplished that; but back of the God whom the ancients
bequeathed to them, back of the God who “is spirit,” back of everything
that is the spirit’s, the spiritual.  But the activity of the spirit,
which “searches even the depths of the Godhead,” is _theology_.  If the
ancients have nothing to show but wisdom of the world, the moderns never
did nor do make their way further than to theology.  We shall see later
that even the newest revolts against God are nothing but the extremest
efforts of “theology,” _i.  e._, theological insurrections.

**** 1.  The Spirit

The realm of spirits is monstrously great, there is an infinite deal of
the spiritual; yet let us look and see what the spirit, this bequest of
the ancients, properly is.

Out of their birth-pangs it came forth, but they themselves could not
utter themselves as spirit; they could give birth to it, it itself must
speak.  The “born God, the Son of Man,” is the first to utter the word
that the spirit, _i.e._ he, God, has to do with nothing earthly and no
earthly relationship, but solely, with the spirit and spiritual
relationships.

Is my courage, indestructible under all the world’s blows, my
inflexibility and my obduracy, perchance already spirit in the full
sense, because the world cannot touch it?  Why, then it would not yet be
at enmity with the world, and all its action would consist merely in not
succumbing to the world!  No, so long as it does not busy itself with
itself alone, so long as it does not have to do with _its_ world, the
spiritual, alone, it is not _free_ spirit, but only the “spirit of this
world,” the spirit fettered to it.  The spirit is free spirit, _i.  e._,
really spirit, only in a world of _its own_; in “this,” the earthly
world, it is a stranger.  Only through a spiritual world is the spirit
really spirit, for “this” world does not understand it and does not know
how to keep “the maiden from a foreign land”[7] from departing.

But where is it to get this spiritual world?  Where but out of itself?
It must reveal itself; and the words that it speaks, the revelations in
which it unveils itself, these are _its_ world.  As a visionary lives
and has his world only in the visionary pictures that he himself
creates, as a crazy man generates for himself his own dream-world,
without which he could not be crazy, so the spirit must create for
itself its spirit world, and is not spirit till it creates it.

Thus its creations make it spirit, and by its creatures we know it, the
creator; in them it lives, they are its world.

Now, what is the spirit?  It is the creator of a spiritual world!  Even
in you and me people do not recognize spirit till they see that we have
appropriated to ourselves something spiritual, — _i.e._ though thoughts
may have been set before us, we have at least brought them to live in
ourselves; for, as long as we were children, the most edifying thoughts
might have been laid before us without our wishing, or being able, to
reproduce them in ourselves.  So the spirit also exists only when it
creates something spiritual; it is real only together with the
spiritual, its creature.

As, then, we know it by its works, the question is what these works are.
But the works or children of the spirit are nothing else but — spirits.

If I had before me Jews, Jews of the true metal, I should have to stop
here and leave them standing before this mystery as for almost two
thousand years they have remained standing before it, unbelieving and
without knowledge.  But, as you, my dear reader, are at least not a
full-blooded Jew — for such a one will not go astray as far as this — we
will still go along a bit of road together, till perhaps you too turn
your back on me because I laugh in your face.

If somebody told you were altogether spirit, you would take hold of your
body and not believe him, but answer: “I _have_ a spirit, no doubt, but
do not exist only as spirit, but as a man with a body.” You would still
distinguish _yourself_ from “your spirit.” “But,” replies he, “it is
your destiny, even though now you are yet going about in the fetters of
the body, to be one day a ‘blessed spirit,’ and, however you may
conceive of the future aspect of your spirit, so much is yet certain,
that in death you will put off this body and yet keep yourself, _i.e._
your spirit, for all eternity; accordingly your spirit is the eternal
and true in you, the body only a dwelling here below, which you may
leave and perhaps exchange for another.”

Now you believe him!  For the present, indeed, you are not spirit only;
but, when you emigrate from the mortal body, as one day you must, then
you will have to help yourself without the body, and therefore it is
needful that you be prudent and care in time for your proper self.
“What should it profit a man if he gained the whole world and yet
suffered damage in his soul?”

But, even granted that doubts, raised in the course of time against the
tenets of the Christian faith, have long since robbed you of faith in
the immortality of your spirit, you have nevertheless left one tenet
undisturbed, and still ingenuously adhere to the one truth, that the
spirit is your better part, and that the spiritual has greater claims on
you than anything else.  Despite all your atheism, in zeal against
_egoism_ you concur with the believers in immortality.

But whom do you think of under the name of egoist?  A man who, instead
of living to an idea, _i.  e._, a spiritual thing, and sacrificing to it
his personal advantage, serves the latter.  A good patriot brings his
sacrifice to the altar of the fatherland; but it cannot be disputed that
the fatherland is an idea, since for beasts incapable of mind,[8] or
children as yet without mind, there is no fatherland and no patriotism.
Now, if any one does not approve himself as a good patriot, he betrays
his egoism with reference to the fatherland.  And so the matter stands
in innumerable other cases: he who in human society takes the benefit of
a prerogative sins egoistically against the idea of equality; he who
exercises dominion is blamed as an egoist against the idea of liberty, —
etc.

You despise the egoist because he puts the spiritual in the background
as compared with the personal, and has his eyes on himself where you
would like to see him act to favor an idea.  The distinction between you
is that he makes himself the central point, but you the spirit; or that
you cut your identity in two and exalt your “proper self,” the spirit,
to be ruler of the paltrier remainder, while he will hear nothing of
this cutting in two, and pursues spiritual and material interests just
_as he pleases_.  You think, to be sure, that you are falling foul of
those only who enter into no spiritual interest at all, but in fact you
curse at everybody who does not look on the spiritual interest as his
“true and highest” interest.  You carry your knightly service for this
beauty so far that you affirm her to be the only beauty of the world.
You live not to _yourself_, but to your _spirit_ and to what is the
spirit’s, _i.  e._ ideas.

As the spirit exists only in its creating of the spiritual, let us take
a look about us for its first creation.  If only it has accomplished
this, there follows thenceforth a natural propagation of creations, as
according to the myth only the first human beings needed to be created,
the rest of the race propagating of itself.  The first creation, on the
other hand, must come forth “out of nothing” — _i.e._ the spirit has
toward its realization nothing but itself, or rather it has not yet even
itself, but must create itself; hence its first creation is itself, _the
spirit_.  Mystical as this sounds, we yet go through it as an every-day
experience.  Are you a thinking being before you think?  In creating the
first thought you create yourself, the thinking one; for you do not
think before you think a thought, _i.e._ have a thought.  Is it not your
singing that first makes you a singer, your talking that makes you a
talker?  Now, so too it is the production of the spiritual that first
makes you a spirit.

Meantime, as you distinguish _yourself_ from the thinker, singer, and
talker, so you no less distinguish yourself from the spirit, and feel
very clearly that you are something beside spirit.  But, as in the
thinking ego hearing and sight easily vanish in the enthusiasm of
thought, so you also have been seized by the spirit-enthusiasm, and you
now long with all your might to become wholly spirit and to be dissolved
in spirit.  The spirit is your _ideal_, the unattained, the
other-worldly; spirit is the name of your — god, “God is spirit.”

Against all that is not spirit you are a zealot, and therefore you play
the zealot against _yourself_ who cannot get rid of a remainder of the
non-spiritual.  Instead of saying, “I am _more_ than spirit,” you say
with contrition, “I am less than spirit; and spirit, pure spirit, or the
spirit that is nothing but spirit, I can only think of, but am not; and,
since I am not it, it is another, exists as another, whom I call ‘God’.”

It lies in the nature of the case that the spirit that is to exist as
pure spirit must be an otherworldly one, for, since I am not it, it
follows that it can only be _outside_ me; since in any case a human
being is not fully comprehended in the concept “spirit,” it follows that
the pure spirit, the spirit as such, can only be outside of men, beyond
the human world — not earthly, but heavenly.

Only from this disunion in which I and the spirit lie; only because “I”
and “spirit” are not names for one and the same thing, but different
names for completely different things; only because I am not spirit and
spirit not I — only from this do we get a quite tautological explanation
of the necessity that the spirit dwells in the other world, _i.  e._ is
God.

But from this it also appears how thoroughly theological is the
liberation that Feuerbach[9] is laboring to give us.  What he says is
that we had only mistaken our own essence, and therefore looked for it
in the other world, but that now, when we see that God was only our
human essence, we must recognize it again as ours and move it back out
of the other world into this.  To God, who is spirit, Feuerbach gives
the name “Our Essence.” Can we put up with this, that “Our Essence” is
brought into opposition to _us_ — that we are split into an essential
and an unessential self?  Do we not therewith go back into the dreary
misery of seeing ourselves banished out of ourselves?

What have we gained, then, when for a variation we have transferred into
ourselves the divine outside us?  _Are we_ that which is in us?  As
little as we are that which is outside us.  I am as little my heart as I
am my sweetheart, this “other self” of mine.  Just because we are not
the spirit that dwells in us, just for that reason we had to take it and
set it outside us; it was not we, did not coincide with us, and
therefore we could, not think of it as existing otherwise than outside
us, on the other side from us, in the other world.

With the strength of _despair_ Feuerbach clutches at the total substance
of Christianity, not to throw it away, no, to drag it to himself, to
draw it, the long-yearned-for, ever-distant, out of its heaven with a
last effort, and keep it by him forever.  Is not that a clutch of the
uttermost despair, a clutch for life or death, and is it not at the same
time the Christian yearning and hungering for the other world?  The hero
wants not to go into the other world, but to draw the other world to
him, and compel it to become this world!  And since then has not all the
world, with more or less consciousness, been crying that “this world” is
the vital point, and heaven must come down on earth and be experienced
even here?

Let us, in brief, set Feuerbach’s theological view and our contradiction
over against each other!  “The essence of man is man’s supreme
being;[10] now by religion, to be sure, the _supreme being is_ called
_God_ and regarded as an objective essence, but in truth it is only
man’s own essence; and therefore the turning point of the world’s
history is that henceforth no longer _God_, but man, is to appear to man
as God.”[11]

To this we reply: The supreme being is indeed the essence of man, but,
just because it is his _essence_ and not he himself, it remains quite
immaterial whether we see it outside him and view it as “God,” or find
it in him and call it “Essence of Man” or “Man.” I am neither God nor
Man,[12] neither the supreme essence nor my essence, and therefore it is
all one in the main whether I think of the essence as in me or outside
me.  Nay, we really do always think of the supreme being as in both
kinds of otherworldliness, the inward and outward, at once; for the
“Spirit of God” is, according to the Christian view, also “our spirit,”
and “dwells in us.”[13] It dwells in heaven and dwells in us; we poor
things are just its “dwelling,” and, if Feuerbach goes on to destroy its
heavenly dwelling and force it to move to us bag and baggage, then we,
its earthly apartments, will be badly overcrowded.

But after this digression (which, if we were at all proposing to work by
line and level, we should have had to save for later pages in order to
avoid repetition) we return to the spirit’s first creation, the spirit
itself.

The spirit is something other than myself.  But this other, what is it?

**** 2.  The Possessed

Have you ever seen a spirit?  “No, not I, but my grandmother.” Now, you
see, it’s just so with me too; I myself haven’t seen any, but my
grandmother had them running between her feet all sorts of ways, and out
of confidence in our grandmothers’ honesty we believe in the existence
of spirits.

But had we no grandfathers then, and did they not shrug their shoulders
every time our grandmothers told about their ghosts?  Yes, those were
unbelieving men who have harmed our good religion much, those
rationalists!  We shall feel that!  What else lies at the bottom of this
warm faith in ghosts, if not the faith in “the existence of spiritual
beings in general,” and is not this latter itself disastrously unsettled
if saucy men of the understanding may disturb the former?  The
Romanticists were quite conscious what a blow the very belief in God
suffered by the laying aside of the belief in spirits or ghosts, and
they tried to help us out of the baleful consequences not only by their
reawakened fairy world, but at last, and especially, by the “intrusion
of a higher world,” by their somnambulists of Prevorst, etc.  The good
believers and fathers of the church did not suspect that with the belief
in ghosts the foundation of religion was withdrawn, and that since then
it had been floating in the air.  He who no longer believes in any ghost
needs only to travel on consistently in his unbelief to see that there
is no separate being at all concealed behind things, no ghost or — what
is naively reckoned as synonymous even in our use of words — no
_“spirit.”_

“Spirits exist!” Look about in the world, and say for yourself whether a
spirit does not gaze upon you out of everything.  Out of the lovely
little flower there speaks to you the spirit of the Creator, who has
shaped it so wonderfully; the stars proclaim the spirit that established
their order; from the mountain-tops a spirit of sublimity breathes down;
out of the waters a spirit of yearning murmurs up; and — out of men
millions of spirits speak.  The mountains may sink, the flowers fade,
the world of stars fall in ruins, the men die — what matters the wreck
of these visible bodies?  The spirit, the “invisible spirit,” abides
eternally!

Yes, the whole world is haunted!  Only is haunted?  Nay, it itself
“walks,” it is uncanny through and through, it is the wandering
seeming-body of a spirit, it is a spook.  What else should a ghost be,
then, than an apparent body, but real spirit?  Well, the world is
“empty,” is “naught,” is only glamorous “semblance”; its truth is the
spirit alone; it is the seeming-body of a spirit.

Look out near or far, a _ghostly_ world surrounds you everywhere; you
are always having “apparitions” or visions.  Everything that appears to
you is only the phantasm of an indwelling spirit, is a ghostly
“apparition”; the world is to you only a “world of appearances,” behind
which the spirit walks.  You “see spirits.”

Are you perchance thinking of comparing yourself with the ancients, who
saw gods everywhere?  Gods, my dear modern, are not spirits; gods do not
degrade the world to a semblance, and do not spiritualize it.

But to you the whole world is spiritualized, and has become an
enigmatical ghost; therefore do not wonder if you likewise find in
yourself nothing but a spook.  Is not your body haunted by your spirit,
and is not the latter alone the true and real, the former only the
“transitory, naught” or a “semblance”?  Are we not all ghosts, uncanny
beings that wait for “deliverance” — to wit, “spirits”?

Since the spirit appeared in the world, since “the Word became flesh,”
since then the world has been spiritualized, enchanted, a spook.

You have spirit, for you have thoughts.  What are your thoughts?
“Spiritual entities.” Not things, then?  “No, but the spirit of things,
the main point in all things, the inmost in them, their — idea.”
Consequently what you think is not only your thought?  “On the contrary,
it is that in the world which is most real, that which is properly to be
called true; it is the truth itself; if I only think truly, I think the
truth.  I may, to be sure, err with regard to the truth, and _fail to
recognize_ it; but, if I _recognize_ truly, the object of my cognition
is the truth.” So, I suppose, you strive at all times to recognize the
truth?  “To me the truth is sacred.  It may well happen that I find a
truth incomplete and replace it with a better, but _the_ truth I cannot
abrogate.  I _believe_ in the truth, therefore I search in it; nothing
transcends it, it is eternal.”

Sacred, eternal is the truth; it is the Sacred, the Eternal.  But you,
who let yourself be filled and led by this sacred thing, are yourself
hallowed.  Further, the sacred is not for your senses — and you never as
a sensual man discover its trace — but for your faith, or, more
definitely still, for your _spirit_; for it itself, you know, is a
spiritual thing, a spirit — is spirit for the spirit.

The sacred is by no means so easily to be set aside as many at present
affirm, who no longer take this “unsuitable” word into their mouths.  If
even in a single respect I am still _upbraided_ as an “egoist,” there is
left the thought of something else which I should serve more than
myself, and which must be to me more important than everything; in
short, somewhat in which I should have to seek my true welfare,[_Heil_]
something — “sacred.”[_heiling_] However human this sacred thing may
look, though it be the Human itself, that does not take away its
sacredness, but at most changes it from an unearthly to an earthly
sacred thing, from a divine one to a human.

Sacred things exist only for the egoist who does not acknowledge
himself, the _involuntary egoist_, for him who is always looking after
his own and yet does not count himself as the highest being, who serves
only himself and at the same time always thinks he is serving a higher
being, who knows nothing higher than himself and yet is infatuated about
something higher; in short, for the egoist who would like not to be an
egoist, and abases himself (_i.e._ combats his egoism), but at the same
time abases himself only for the sake of “being exalted,” and therefore
of gratifying his egoism.  Because he would like to cease to be an
egoist, he looks about in heaven and earth for higher beings to serve
and sacrifice himself to; but, however much he shakes and disciplines
himself, in the end he does all for his own sake, and the disreputable
egoism will not come off him.  On this account I call him the
involuntary egoist.

His toil and care to get away from himself is nothing but the
misunderstood impulse to self-dissolution.  If you are bound to your
past hour, if you must babble today because you babbled yesterday,[14]
if you cannot transform yourself each instant, you feel yourself
fettered in slavery and benumbed.  Therefore over each minute of your
existence a fresh minute of the future beckons to you, and, developing
yourself, you get away “from yourself,” _i.  e._, from the self that was
at that moment.  As you are at each instant, you are your own creature,
and in this very “creature” you do not wish to lose yourself, the
creator.  You are yourself a higher being than you are, and surpass
yourself.  But that you are the one who is higher than you, _i.  e._,
that you are not only creature, but likewise your creator — just this,
as an involuntary egoist, you fail to recognize; and therefore the
“higher essence” is to you — an alien [_fremd_] essence.  Every higher
essence, _e.g._ truth, mankind, etc., is an essence _over_ us.

Alienness is a criterion of the “sacred.” In everything sacred there
lies something “uncanny,” _i.e._ strange,[_fremd_] _e.g._ we are not
quite familiar and at home in.  What is sacred to me is _not my own_;
and if, _e.g.,_, the property of others was not sacred to me, I should
look on it as _mine_, which I should take to myself when occasion
offered.  Or, on the other side, if I regard the face of the Chinese
emperor as sacred, it remains strange to my eye, which I close at its
appearance.

Why is an incontrovertible mathematical truth, which might even be
called eternal according to the common understanding of words, not —
sacred?  Because it is not revealed, or not the revelation of, a higher
being.  If by revealed we understand only the so-called religious
truths, we go far astray, and entirely fail to recognize the breadth of
the concept “higher being.” Atheists keep up their scoffing at the
higher being, which was also honored under the name of the “highest” or
_Être suprême_, and trample in the dust one “proof of his existence”
after another, without noticing that they themselves, out of need for a
higher being, only annihilate the old to make room for a new.  Is “Man”
perchance not a higher essence than an individual man, and must not the
truths, rights, and ideas which result from the concept of him be
honored and —counted sacred, as revelations of this very concept?  For,
even though we should abrogate again many a truth that seemed to be made
manifest by this concept, yet this would only evince a misunderstanding
on our part, without in the least degree harming the sacred concept
itself or taking their sacredness from those truths that must “rightly”
be looked upon as its revelations.  _Man_ reaches beyond every
individual man, and yet — though he be “his essence” — is not in fact
_his_ essence (which rather would be as single [_einzig_] as he the
individual himself), but a general and “higher,” yes, for atheists “the
highest essence.”[“_the supreme being_”] And, as the divine revelations
were not written down by God with his own hand, but made public through
“the Lord’s instruments,” so also the new highest essence does not write
out its revelations itself, but lets them come to our knowledge through
“true men.” Only the new essence betrays, in fact, a more spiritual
style of conception than the old God, because the latter was still
represented in a sort of embodiedness or form, while the undimmed
spirituality of the new is retained, and no special material body is
fancied for it.  And withal it does not lack corporeity, which even
takes on a yet more seductive appearance because it looks more natural
and mundane and consists in nothing less than in every bodily man — yes,
or outright in “humanity” or “all men.” Thereby the spectralness of the
spirit in a seeming body has once again become really solid and popular.

Sacred, then, is the highest essence and everything in which this
highest essence reveals or will reveal itself; but hallowed are they who
recognize this highest essence together with its own, _i.e._ together
with its revelations.  The sacred hallows in turn its reverer, who by
his worship becomes himself a saint, as Likewise what he does is
saintly, a saintly walk, saintly thoughts and actions, imaginations and
aspirations.

It is easily understood that the conflict over what is revered as the
highest essence can be significant only so long as even the most
embittered opponents concede to each other the main point — that there
is a highest essence to which worship or service is due.  If one should
smile compassionately at the whole struggle over a highest essence, as a
Christian might at the war of words between a Shiite and a Sunnite or
between a Brahman and a Buddhist, then the hypothesis of a highest
essence would be null in his eyes, and the conflict on this basis an
idle play.  Whether then the one God or the three in one.  whether the
Lutheran God or the _Être suprême_ or not God at all, but “Man,” may
represent the highest essence, that makes no difference at all for him
who denies the highest essence itself, for in his eyes those servants of
a highest essence are one and all-pious people, the most raging atheist
not less than the most faith-filled Christian.

In the foremost place of the sacred,[_heilig_] then, stands the highest
essence and the faith in this essence, our “holy [_heilig_] faith.”

**** The spook

With ghosts we arrive in the spirit-realm, in the realm of _essences_.

What haunts the universe, and has its occult, “incomprehensible” being
there, is precisely the mysterious spook that we call highest essence.
And to get to the bottom of this _spook_, to comprehend it, to discover
_reality_ in it (to prove “the existence of God”) — this task men set to
themselves for thousands of years; with the horrible impossibility, the
endless Danaid-labor, of transforming the spook into a non-spook, the
unreal into something real, the _spirit_ into an entire and _corporeal_
person — with this they tormented themselves to death.  Behind the
existing world they sought the “thing in itself,” the essence; behind
the _thing_ they sought the _un-thing_.

When one looks to the _bottom_ of anything, _i.e._ searches out its
_essence_, one often discovers something quite other than what it
_seems_ to be; honeyed speech and a lying heart, pompous words and
beggarly thoughts, etc.  By bringing the essence into prominence one
degrades the hitherto misapprehended appearance to a bare _semblance_, a
deception.  The essence of the world, so attractive and splendid, is for
him who looks to the bottom of it — emptiness; emptiness is = world’s
essence (world’s doings).  Now, he who is religious does not occupy
himself with the deceitful semblance, with the empty appearances, but
looks upon the essence, and in the essence has — the truth.

The essences which are deduced from some appearances are the evil
essences, and conversely from others the good.  The essence of human
feeling, _e.g._, is love; the essence of human will is the good; that of
one’s thinking, the true, etc.

What at first passed for existence, _e.g._ the world and its like,
appears now as bare semblance, and the _truly existent_ is much rather
the essence, whose realm is filled with gods, spirits, demons, with good
or bad essences.  Only this inverted world, the world of essences, truly
exists now.  The human heart may be loveless, but its essence exists,
God, “who is love”; human thought may wander in error, but its essence,
truth, exists; “God is truth,” and the like.

To know and acknowledge essences alone and nothing but essences, that is
religion; its realm is a realm of essences, spooks, and ghosts.

The longing to make the spook comprehensible, or to realize _non-sense_,
has brought about a _corporeal ghost_, a ghost or spirit with a real
body, an embodied ghost.  How the strongest and most talented Christians
have tortured themselves to get a conception of this ghostly apparition!
But there always remained the contradiction of two natures, the divine
and human, _i.  e.,_ the ghostly and sensual; there remained the most
wondrous spook, a thing that was not a thing.  Never yet was a ghost
more soul torturing, and no shaman, who pricks himself to raving fury
and nerve-lacerating cramps to conjure a ghost, can endure such
soul-torment as Christians suffered from that most incomprehensible
ghost.

But through Christ the truth of the matter had at the same time come to
light, that the veritable spirit or ghost is — man.  The _corporeal_ or
embodied spirit is just man; he himself is the ghostly being and at the
same time the being’s appearance and existence.  Henceforth man no
longer, in typical cases, shudders at ghosts _outside_ him, but at
himself; he is terrified at himself.  In the depth of his breast dwells
the _spirit of sin_; even the faintest thought (and this is itself a
spirit, you know) may be a _devil_, etc.  — The ghost has put on a body,
God has become man, but now man is himself the gruesome spook which he
seeks to get back of, to exorcise, to fathom, to bring to reality and to
speech; man is — _spirit_.  What matter if the body wither, if only the
spirit is saved?  Everything rests on the spirit, and the spirit’s or
“soul’s” welfare becomes the exclusive goal.  Man has become to himself
a ghost, an uncanny spook, to which there is even assigned a distinct
seat in the body (dispute over the seat of the soul, whether in the
head, etc.).

You are not to me, and I am not to you, a higher essence.  Nevertheless
a higher essence may be hidden in each of us, and call forth a mutual
reverence.  To take at once the most general, Man lives in you and me.
If I did not see Man in you, what occasion should I have to respect you?
To be sure, you are not Man and his true and adequate form, but only a
mortal veil of his, from which he can withdraw without himself ceasing;
but yet for the present this general and higher essence is housed in
you, and you present before me (because an imperishable spirit has in
you assumed a perishable body, so that really your form is only an
“assumed” one) a spirit that appears, appears in you, without being
bound to your body and to this particular mode of appearance — therefore
a spook.  Hence I do not regard you as a higher essence but only respect
that higher essence which “walks” in you; I “respect Man in you.” The
ancients did not observe anything of this sort in their slaves, and the
higher essence “Man” found as yet little response.  To make up for this,
they saw in each other ghosts of another sort.  The People is a higher
essence than an individual, and, like Man or the Spirit of Man, a spirit
haunting the individual — the Spirit of the People.  For this reason
they revered this spirit, and only so far as he served this or else a
spirit related to it (_e.g._ the Spirit of the Family) could the
individual appear significant; only for the sake of the higher essence,
the People, was consideration allowed to the “member of the people.” As
you are hallowed to us by “Man” who haunts you, so at every time men
have been hallowed by some higher essence or other, like People, Family,
and such.  Only for the sake of a higher essence has any one been
honored from of old, only as a ghost has he been regarded in the light
of a hallowed, _i.e._, protected and recognized person.  If I cherish
you because I hold you dear, because in you my heart finds nourishment,
my need satisfaction, then it is not done for the sake of a higher
essence, whose hallowed body you are, not on account of my beholding in
you a ghost, _i.e._ an appearing spirit, but from egoistic pleasure; you
yourself with _your_ essence are valuable to me, for your essence is not
a higher one, is not higher and more general than you, is
unique[_einzig_] like you yourself, because it is you.

But it is not only man that “haunts”; so does everything.  The higher
essence, the spirit, that walks in everything, is at the same time bound
to nothing, and only — “appears” in it.  Ghosts in every corner!

Here would be the place to pass the haunting spirits in review, if they
were not to come before us again further on in order to vanish before
egoism.  Hence let only a few of them be particularized by way of
example, in order to bring us at once to our attitude toward them.

Sacred above all, _e.g._, is the “holy Spirit,” sacred the truth, sacred
are right, law, a good cause, majesty, marriage, the common good, order,
the fatherland, etc.

**** Wheels in the Head

Man, your head is haunted; you have wheels in your head!  You imagine
great things, and depict to yourself a whole world of gods that has an
existence for you, a spirit-realm to which you suppose yourself to be
called, an ideal that beckons to you.  You have a fixed idea!

Do not think that I am jesting or speaking figuratively when I regard
those persons who cling to the Higher, and (because the vast majority
belongs under this head) almost the whole world of men, as veritable
fools, fools in a madhouse.  What is it, then, that is called a “fixed
idea”?  An idea that has subjected the man to itself.  When you
recognize, with regard to such a fixed idea, that it is a folly, you
shut its slave up in an asylum.  And is the truth of the faith, say,
which we are not to doubt; the majesty of (_e.g._) the people, which we
are not to strike at (he who does is guilty of — lese-majesty); virtue,
against which the censor is not to let a word pass, that morality may be
kept pure; — are these not “fixed ideas”?  Is not all the stupid chatter
of (_e.g._) most of our newspapers the babble of fools who suffer from
the fixed idea of morality, legality, Christianity, etc., and only seem
to go about free because the madhouse in which they walk takes in so
broad a space?  Touch the fixed idea of such a fool, and you will at
once have to guard your back against the lunatic’s stealthy malice.  For
these great lunatics are like the little so-called lunatics in this
point too — that they assail by stealth him who touches their fixed
idea.  They first steal his weapon, steal free speech from him, and then
they fall upon him with their nails.  Every day now lays bare the
cowardice and vindictiveness of these maniacs, and the stupid populace
hurrahs for their crazy measures.  One must read the journals of this
period, and must hear the Philistines talk, to get the horrible
conviction that one is shut up in a house with fools.  “Thou shalt not
call thy brother a fool; if thou dost — etc.” But I do not fear the
curse, and I say, my brothers are arch-fools.  Whether a poor fool of
the insane asylum is possessed by the fancy that he is God the Father,
Emperor of Japan, the Holy Spirit, etc., or whether a citizen in
comfortable circumstances conceives that it is his mission to be a good
Christian, a faithful Protestant, a loyal citizen, a virtuous man — both
these are one and the same “fixed idea.” He who has never tried and
dared not to be a good Christian, a faithful Protestant, a virtuous man,
etc., is _possessed_ and prepossessed [_gefangen und befangen_,
literally “imprisoned and prepossessed”] by faith, virtuousness, etc.
Just as the schoolmen philosophized only _inside_ the belief of the
church; as Pope Benedict XIV wrote fat books _inside_ the papist
superstition, without ever throwing a doubt upon this belief; as authors
fill whole folios on the State without calling in question the fixed
idea of the State itself; as our newspapers are crammed with politics
because they are conjured into the fancy that man was created to be a
_zoon politicon_ — so also subjects vegetate in subjection, virtuous
people in virtue, liberals in humanity, without ever putting to these
fixed ideas of theirs the searching knife of criticism.  Undislodgeable,
like a madman’s delusion, those thoughts stand on a firm footing, and he
who doubts them — lays hands on the _sacred!_ Yes, the “fixed idea,”
that is the truly sacred!

Is it perchance only people possessed by the devil that meet us, or do
we as often come upon people _possessed_ in the contrary way — possessed
by “the good,” by virtue, morality, the law, or some “principle” or
other?  Possessions of the devil are not the only ones.  God works on
us, and the devil does; the former “workings of grace,” the latter
“workings of the devil.” Possessed [_besessene_] people are set
[_versessen_] in their opinions.

If the word “possession” displeases you, then call it prepossession;
yes, since the spirit possesses you, and all “inspirations” come from
it, call it — inspiration and enthusiasm.  I add that complete
enthusiasm — for we cannot stop with the sluggish, half-way kind — is
called fanaticism.

It is precisely among cultured people that _fanaticism_ is at home; for
man is cultured so far as he takes an interest in spiritual things, and
interest in spiritual things, when it is alive, is and must be
_fanaticism_; it is a fanatical interest in the sacred _(fanum)_.
Observe our liberals, look into the _Sächsischen Vaterlandsblätter_,
hear what Schlosser says:[15] “Holbach’s company constituted a regular
plot against the traditional doctrine and the existing system, and its
members were as fanatical on behalf of their unbelief as monks and
priests, Jesuits and Pietists, Methodists, missionary and Bible
societies, commonly are for mechanical worship and orthodoxy.”

Take notice how a “moral man” behaves, who today often thinks he is
through with God and throws off Christianity as a bygone thing.  If you
ask him whether he has ever doubted that the copulation of brother and
sister is incest, that monogamy is the truth of marriage, that filial
piety is a sacred duty, then a moral shudder will come over him at the
conception of one’s being allowed to touch his sister as wife also, etc.
And whence this shudder?  Because he _believes_ in those moral
commandments.  This moral _faith_ is deeply rooted in his breast.  Much
as he rages against the _pious_ Christians, he himself has nevertheless
as thoroughly remained a Christian — to wit, a _moral_ Christian.  In
the form of morality Christianity holds him a prisoner, and a prisoner
under _faith_.  Monogamy is to be something sacred, and he who may live
in bigamy is punished as a _criminal_; he who commits incest suffers as
a _criminal_.  Those who are always crying that religion is not to be
regarded in the State, and the Jew is to be a citizen equally with the
Christian, show themselves in accord with this.  Is not this of incest
and monogamy a _dogma of faith?_ Touch it, and you will learn by
experience how this moral man is a _hero of faith_ too, not less than
Krummacher, not less than Philip II.  These fight for the faith of the
Church, he for the faith of the State, or the moral laws of the State;
for articles of faith, both condemn him who acts otherwise than _their
faith will_ allow.  The brand of “crime” is stamped upon him, and he may
languish in reformatories, in jails.  Moral faith is as fanatical as
religious faith!  They call that “liberty of faith” then, when brother
and sister, on account of a relation that they should have settled with
their “conscience,” are thrown into prison.  “But they set a pernicious
example.” Yes, indeed: others might have taken the notion that the State
had no business to meddle with their relation, and thereupon “purity of
morals” would go to ruin.  So then the religious heroes of faith are
zealous for the “sacred God,” the moral ones for the “sacred good.”

Those who are zealous for something sacred often look very little like
each other.  How the strictly orthodox or old-style believers differ
from the fighters for “truth, light, and justice,” from the Philalethes,
the Friends of Light, the Rationalists, and others.  And yet, how
utterly unessential is this difference!  If one buffets single
traditional truths (_i.e._ miracles, unlimited power of princes), then
the Rationalists buffet them too, and only the old-style believers wail.
But, if one buffets truth itself, he immediately has both, as
_believers_, for opponents.  So with moralities; the strict believers
are relentless, the clearer heads are more tolerant.  But he who attacks
morality itself gets both to deal with.  “Truth, morality, justice,
light, etc.,” are to be and remain “sacred.” What any one finds to
censure in Christianity is simply supposed to be “unchristian” according
to the view of these rationalists, but Christianity must remain a
“fixture,” to buffet it is outrageous, “an outrage.” To be sure, the
heretic against pure faith no longer exposes himself to the earlier fury
of persecution, but so much the more does it now fall upon the heretic
against pure morals.


	* * *

Piety has for a century received so many blows, and had to hear its
superhuman essence reviled as an “inhuman” one so often, that one cannot
feel tempted to draw the sword against it again.  And yet it has almost
always been only moral opponents that have appeared in the arena, to
assail the supreme essence in favor of — another supreme essence.  So
Proudhon, unabashed, says:[16] “Man is destined to live without
religion, but the moral law is eternal and absolute.  Who would dare
today to attack morality?” Moral people skimmed off the best fat from
religion, ate it themselves, and are now having a tough job to get rid
of the resulting scrofula.  If, therefore, we point out that religion
has not by any means been hurt in its inmost part so long as people
reproach it only with its superhuman essence, and that it takes its
final appeal to the “spirit” alone (for God is spirit), then we have
sufficiently indicated its final accord with morality, and can leave its
stubborn conflict with the latter lying behind us.  It is a question of
a supreme essence with both, and whether this is a superhuman or a human
one can make (since it is in any case an essence over me, a super-mine
one, so to speak) but little difference to me.  In the end the relation
to the human essence, or to “Man,” as soon as ever it has shed the
snake-skin of the old religion, will yet wear a religious snake-skin
again.

So Feuerbach instructs us that, “if one only _inverts_ speculative
philosophy, _i.e._ always makes the predicate the subject, and so makes
the subject the object and principle, one has the undraped truth, pure
and clean.”[17] Herewith, to be sure, we lose the narrow religious
standpoint, lost the _God_, who from this standpoint is subject; but we
take in exchange for it the other side of the religious standpoint, the
_moral_ standpoint.  Thus we no longer say “God is love,” but “Love is
divine.” If we further put in place of the predicate “divine” the
equivalent “sacred,” then, as far as concerns the sense, all the old
comes back-again.  According to this, love is to be the _good_ in man,
his divineness, that which does him honor, his true _humanity_ (it
“makes him Man for the first time,” makes for the first time a man out
of him).  So then it would be more accurately worded thus: Love is what
is _human_ in man, and what is inhuman is the loveless egoist.  But
precisely all that which Christianity and with it speculative philosophy
(_i.e._, theology) offers as the good, the absolute, is to
self-ownership simply not the good (or, what means the same, it is _only
the good)_.  Consequently, by the transformation of the predicate into
the subject, the Christian _essence_ (and it is the predicate that
contains the essence, you know) would only be fixed yet more
oppressively.  God and the divine would entwine themselves all the more
inextricably with me.  To expel God from his heaven and to rob him of
his _“transcendence”_ cannot yet support a claim of complete victory, if
therein he is only chased into the human breast and gifted with
indelible _immanence_.  Now they say, “The divine is the truly human!”

The same people who oppose Christianity as the basis of the State,
_i.e._ oppose the so-called Christian State, do not tire of repeating
that morality is “the fundamental pillar of social life and of the
State.” As if the dominion of morality were not a complete dominion of
the sacred, a “hierarchy.”

So we may here mention by the way that rationalist movement which, after
theologians had long insisted that only faith was capable of grasping
religious truths, that only to believers did God reveal himself, and
that therefore only the heart, the feelings, the believing fancy was
religious, broke out with the assertion that the “natural
understanding,” human reason, was also capable of discerning God.  What
does that mean but that the reason laid claim to be the same visionary
as the fancy?[_dieselbe Phantastin wie die Phantasie._] In this sense
Reimarus wrote his _Most Notable Truths of Natural Religion_.  It had to
come to this — that the _whole_ man with all his faculties was found to
be _religious_; heart and affections, understanding and reason, feeling,
knowledge, and will — in short, everything in man — appeared religious.
Hegel has shown that even philosophy is religious.  And what is not
called religion today?  The “religion of love,” the “religion of
freedom,” “political religion” — in short, every enthusiasm.  So it is,
too, in fact.

To this day we use the Romance word “religion,” which expresses the
concept of a condition of being _bound_.  To be sure, _we_ remain bound,
so far as religion takes possession of our inward parts; but is the mind
also bound?  On the contrary, that is free, is sole lord, is not our
mind, but absolute.  Therefore the correct affirmative translation of
the word religion would be _“freedom of mind”_!  In whomsoever the mind
is free, he is religious in just the same way as he in whom the senses
have free course is called a sensual man.  The mind binds the former,
the desires the latter.  Religion, therefore, is boundness or _religion_
with reference to me — I am bound; it is freedom with reference to the
mind — the mind is free, or has freedom of mind.  Many know from
experience how hard it is on _us_ when the desires run away with us,
free and unbridled; but that the free mind, splendid intellectuality,
enthusiasm for intellectual interests, or however this jewel may in the
most various phrase be named, brings _us_ into yet more grievous straits
than even the wildest impropriety, people will not perceive; nor can
they perceive it without being consciously egoists.

Reimarus, and all who have shown that our reason, our heart, etc., also
lead to God, have therewithal shown that we are possessed through and
through.  To be sure, they vexed the theologians, from whom they took
away the prerogative of religious exaltation; but for religion, for
freedom of mind, they thereby conquered yet more ground.  For, when the
mind is no longer limited to feeling or faith, but also, as
understanding, reason, and thought in general, belongs to itself the
mind — when therefore, it may take part in the spiritual [_The same word
as “intellectual”, as “mind” and “spirit” are the same._] and heavenly
truths in the form of understanding, as well as in its other forms —
then the whole mind is occupied only with spiritual things, _i.  e._,
with itself, and is therefore free.  Now we are so through-and-through
religious that “jurors,” _i.e._ “sworn men,” condemn us to death, and
every policeman, as a good Christian, takes us to the lock-up by virtue
of an “oath of office.”

Morality could not come into opposition with piety till after the time
when in general the boisterous hate of everything that looked like an
“order” (decrees, commandments, etc.) spoke out in revolt, and the
personal “absolute lord” was scoffed at and persecuted; consequently it
could arrive at independence only through liberalism, whose first form
acquired significance in the world’s history as “citizenship,” and
weakened the specifically religious powers (see “Liberalism” below).
For, when morality not merely goes alongside of piety, but stands on
feet of its own, then its principle lies no longer in the divine
commandments, but in the law of reason, from which the commandments, so
far as they are still to remain valid, must first await justification
for their validity.  In the law of reason man determines himself out of
himself, for “Man” is rational, and out of the “essence of Man” those
laws follow of necessity.  Piety and morality part company in this —
that the former makes God the law-giver, the latter Man.

From a certain standpoint of morality people reason about as follows:
Either man is led by his sensuality, and is, following it, _immoral_, or
he is led by the good, which, taken up into the will, is called moral
sentiment (sentiment and prepossession in favor of the good); then he
shows himself _moral_.  From this point of view how, _e.g._, can Sand’s
act against Kotzebue be called immoral?  What is commonly understood by
unselfish it certainly was, in the same measure as (among other things)
St.  Crispin’s thieveries in favor of the poor.  “He should not have
murdered, for it stands written, Thou shalt not murder!” Then to serve
the good, the welfare of the people, as Sand at least intended, or the
welfare of the poor, like Crispin — is moral; but murder and theft are
immoral; the purpose moral, the means immoral.  Why?  “Because murder,
assassination, is something absolutely bad.” When the Guerrillas enticed
the enemies of the country into ravines and shot them down unseen from
the bushes, do you suppose that was assassination?  According to the
principle of morality, which commands us to serve the good, you could
really ask only whether murder could never in any case be a realization
of the good, and would have to endorse that murder which realized the
good.  You cannot condemn Sand’s deed at all; it was moral, because in
the service of the good, because unselfish; it was an act of punishment,
which the individual inflicted, an — _execution_ inflicted at the risk
of the executioner’s life.  What else had his scheme been, after all,
but that he wanted to suppress writings by brute force?  Are you not
acquainted with the same procedure as a “legal” and sanctioned one?  And
what can be objected against it from your principle of morality?  — “But
it was an illegal execution.” So the immoral thing in it was the
illegality, the disobedience to law?  Then you admit that the good is
nothing else than — law, morality nothing else than _loyalty_.  And to
this externality of “loyalty” your morality must sink, to this
righteousness of works in the fulfillment of the law, only that the
latter is at once more tyrannical and more revolting than the old-time
righteousness of works.  For in the latter only the _act_ is needed, but
you require the _disposition_ too; one must carry _in himself_ the law,
the statute; and he who is most legally disposed is the most moral.
Even the last vestige of cheerfulness in Catholic life must perish in
this Protestant legality.  Here at last the domination of the law is for
the first time complete.  “Not I live, but the law lives in me.” Thus I
have really come so far to be only the “vessel of its glory.” “Every
Prussian carries his _gendarme_ in his breast,” says a high Prussian
officer.

Why do certain _opposition parties_ fail to flourish?  Solely for the
reason that they refuse to forsake the path of morality or legality.
Hence the measureless hypocrisy of devotion, love, etc., from whose
repulsiveness one may daily get the most thorough nausea at this rotten
and hypocritical relation of a “lawful opposition.” — In the _moral_
relation of love and fidelity a divided or opposed will cannot have
place; the beautiful relation is disturbed if the one wills this and the
other the reverse.  But now, according to the practice hitherto and the
old prejudice of the opposition, the moral relation is to be preserved
above all.  What is then left to the opposition?  Perhaps the will to
have a liberty, if the beloved one sees fit to deny it?  Not a bit!  It
may not _will_ to have the freedom, it can only _wish_ for it,
“petition” for it, lisp a “Please, please!” What would come of it, if
the opposition really _willed_, willed with the full energy of the will?
No, it must renounce will in order to live to _love_, renounce liberty —
for love of morality.  It may never “claim as a right” what it is
permitted only to “beg as a favor.” Love, devotion.  etc., demand with
undeviating definiteness that there be only one will to which the others
devote themselves, which they serve, follow, love.  Whether this will is
regarded as reasonable or as unreasonable, in both cases one acts
morally when one follows it, and immorally when one breaks away from it.
The will that commands the censorship seems to many unreasonable; but he
who in a land of censorship evades the censoring of his book acts
immorally, and he who submits it to the censorship acts morally.  If
some one let his moral judgment go, and set up _e.g._ a secret press,
one would have to call him immoral, and imprudent in the bargain if he
let himself be caught; but will such a man lay claim to a value in the
eyes of the “moral”?  Perhaps!  — That is, if he fancied he was serving
a “higher morality.”

The web of the hypocrisy of today hangs on the frontiers of two domains,
between which our time swings back and forth, attaching its fine threads
of deception and self-deception.  No longer vigorous enough to serve
_morality_ without doubt or weakening, not yet reckless enough to live
wholly to egoism, it trembles now toward the one and now toward the
other in the spider-web of hypocrisy, and, crippled by the curse of
_halfness_, catches only miserable, stupid flies.  If one has once dared
to make a “free” motion, immediately one waters it again with assurances
of love, and — _shams resignation_; if, on the other side, they have had
the face to reject the free motion with _moral_ appeals to confidence,
immediately the moral courage also sinks, and they assure one how they
hear the free words with special pleasure, etc.; they — _sham approval_.
In short, people would like to have the one, but not go without the
other; they would like to have a _free will_, but not for their lives
lack the _moral will_.  Just come in contact with a servile loyalist,
you Liberals.  You will sweeten every word of freedom with a look of the
most loyal confidence, and he will clothe his servilism in the most
flattering phrases of freedom.  Then you go apart, and he, like you,
thinks “I know you, fox!” He scents the devil in you as much as you do
the dark old Lord God in him.

A Nero is a “bad” man only in the eyes of the “good”; in mine he is
nothing but a _possessed_ man, as are the good too.  The good see in him
an arch-villain, and relegate him to hell.  Why did nothing hinder him
in his arbitrary course?  Why did people put up with so much?  Do you
suppose the tame Romans, who let all their will be bound by such a
tyrant, were a hair the better?  In old Rome they would have put him to
death instantly, would never have been his slaves.  But the contemporary
“good” among the Romans opposed to him only moral demands, not their
_will_; they sighed that their emperor did not do homage to morality,
like them; they themselves remained “moral subjects,” till at last one
found courage to give up “moral, obedient subjection.” And then the same
“good Romans” who, as “obedient subjects,” had borne all the ignominy of
having no will, hurrahed over the nefarious, immoral act of the rebel.
Where then in the “good” was the courage for the _revolution_, that
courage which they now praised, after another had mustered it up?  The
good could not have this courage, for a revolution, and an insurrection
into the bargain, is always something “immoral,” which one can resolve
upon only when one ceases to be “good” and becomes either “bad” or —
neither of the two.  Nero was no viler than his time, in which one could
only be one of the two, good or bad.  The judgment of his time on him
had to be that he was bad, and this in the highest degree: not a
milksop, but an arch-scoundrel.  All moral people can pronounce only
this judgment on him.  Rascals _e.g._ he was are still living here and
there today (see _e.g._ the _Memoirs_ of Ritter von Lang) in the midst
of the moral.  It is not convenient to live among them certainly, as one
is not sure of his life for a moment; but can you say that it is more
convenient to live among the moral?  One is just as little sure of his
life there, only that one is hanged “in the way of justice,” but least
of all is one sure of his honor, and the national cockade is gone before
you can say Jack Robinson.  The hard fist of morality treats the noble
nature of egoism altogether without compassion.

“But surely one cannot put a rascal and an honest man on the same
level!” Now, no human being does that oftener than you judges of morals;
yes, still more than that, you imprison as a criminal an honest man who
speaks openly against the existing constitution, against the hallowed
institutions, and you entrust portfolios and still more important things
to a crafty rascal.  So _in praxi_ you have nothing to reproach me with.
“But in theory!” Now there I do put both on the same level, as two
opposite poles — to wit, both on the level of the moral law.  Both have
meaning only in the “moral world, just as in the pre-Christian time a
Jew who kept the law and one who broke it had meaning and significance
only in respect to the Jewish law; before Jesus Christ, on the contrary,
the Pharisee was no more than the “sinner and publican.” So before
self-ownership the moral Pharisee amounts to as much as the immoral
sinner.

Nero became very inconvenient by his possessedness.  But a self-owning
man would not sillily oppose to him the “sacred,” and whine if the
tyrant does not regard the sacred; he would oppose to him his will.  How
often the sacredness of the inalienable rights of man has been held up
to their foes, and some liberty or other shown and demonstrated to be a
“sacred right of man!” Those who do that deserve to be laughed out of
court — as they actually are — were it not that in truth they do, even
though unconsciously, take the road that leads to the goal.  They have a
presentiment that, if only the majority is once won for that liberty, it
will also will the liberty, and will then take what it _will_ have.  The
sacredness of the liberty, and all possible proofs of this sacredness,
will never procure it; lamenting and petitioning only shows beggars.

The moral man is necessarily narrow in that he knows no other enemy than
the “immoral” man.  “He who is not moral is immoral!” and accordingly
reprobate, despicable, etc.  Therefore the moral man can never
comprehend the egoist.  Is not unwedded cohabitation an immorality?  The
moral man may turn as he pleases, he will have to stand by this verdict;
Emilia Galotti gave up her life for this moral truth.  And it is true,
it is an immorality.  A virtuous girl may become an old maid; a virtuous
man may pass the time in fighting his natural impulses till he has
perhaps dulled them, he may castrate himself for the sake of virtue as
St.  Origen did for the sake of heaven: he thereby honors sacred
wedlock, sacred chastity, as inviolable; he is — moral.  Unchastity can
never become a moral act.  However indulgently the moral man may judge
and excuse him who committed it, it remains a transgression, a sin
against a moral commandment; there clings to it an indelible stain.  As
chastity once belonged to the monastic vow, so it does to moral conduct.
Chastity is a — good.  — For the egoist, on the contrary, even chastity
is not a good without which he could not get along; he cares nothing at
all about it.  What now follows from this for the judgment of the moral
man?  This: that he throws the egoist into the only class of men that he
knows besides moral men, into that of the — immoral.  He cannot do
otherwise; he must find the egoist immoral in everything in which the
egoist disregards morality.  If he did not find him so, then he would
already have become an apostate from morality without confessing it to
himself, he would already no longer be a truly moral man.  One should
not let himself be led astray by such phenomena, which at the present
day are certainly no longer to be classed as rare, but should reflect
that he who yields any point of morality can as little be counted among
the truly moral as Lessing was a pious Christian when, in the well-known
parable, he compared the Christian religion, as well as the Mohammedan
and Jewish, to a “counterfeit ring.” Often people are already further
than they venture to confess to themselves.  For Socrates, because in
culture he stood on the level of morality, it would have been an
immorality if he had been willing to follow Crito’s seductive incitement
and escape from the dungeon; to remain was the only moral thing.  But it
was solely because Socrates was — a moral man.  The “unprincipled,
sacrilegious” men of the Revolution, on the contrary, had sworn fidelity
to Louis XVI, and decreed his deposition, yes, his death; but the act
was an immoral one, at which moral persons will be horrified to all
eternity.

Yet all this applies, more or less, only to “civic morality,” on which
the freer look down with contempt.  For it (like civism, its native
ground, in general) is still too little removed and free from the
religious heaven not to transplant the latter’s laws without criticism
or further consideration to its domain instead of producing independent
doctrines of its own.  Morality cuts a quite different figure when it
arrives at the consciousness of its dignity, and raises its principle,
the essence of man, or “Man,” to be the only regulative power.  Those
who have worked their way through to such a decided consciousness break
entirely with religion, whose God no longer finds any place alongside
their “Man,” and, as they (see below) themselves scuttle the ship of
State, so too they crumble away that “morality” which flourishes only in
the State, and logically have no right to use even its name any further.
For what this “critical” party calls morality is very positively
distinguished from the so-called “civic or political morality,” and must
appear to the citizen like an “insensate and unbridled liberty.” But at
bottom it has only the advantage of the “purity of the principle,”
which, freed from its defilement with the religious, has now reached
universal power in its clarified definiteness as “humanity.”

Therefore one should not wonder that the name “morality” is retained
along with others, like freedom, benevolence, self-consciousness, and is
only garnished now and then with the addition, a “free” morality — just
as, though the civic State is abused, yet the State is to arise again as
a “free State,” or, if not even so, yet as a “free society.”

Because this morality completed into humanity has fully settled its
accounts with the religion out of which it historically came forth,
nothing hinders it from becoming a religion on its own account.  For a
distinction prevails between religion and morality only so long as our
dealings with the world of men are regulated and hallowed by our
relation to a superhuman being, or so long as our doing is a doing “for
God’s sake.” If, on the other hand, it comes to the point that “man is
to man the supreme being,” then that distinction vanishes, and morality,
being removed from its subordinate position, is completed into —
religion.  For then the higher being who had hitherto been subordinated
to the highest, Man, has ascended to absolute height, and we are related
to him as one is related to the highest being, _i.e._ religiously.
Morality and piety are now as synonymous as in the beginning of
Christianity, and it is only because the supreme being has come to be a
different one that a holy walk is no longer called a “holy” one, but a
“human” one.  If morality has conquered, then a complete — _change of
masters_ has taken place.

After the annihilation of faith Feuerbach thinks to put in to the
supposedly safe harbor of _love_.  “The first and highest law must be
the love of man to man.  _Homo homini Deus est —_ this is the supreme
practical maxim, this is the turning point of the world’s history.”[18]
But, properly speaking, only the god is changed — the _deus_; love has
remained: there love to the superhuman God, here love to the human God,
to _homo as Deus_.  Therefore man is to me — sacred.  And everything
“truly human” is to me — sacred!  “Marriage is sacred of itself.  And so
it is with all moral relations.  Friendship is and must be _sacred_ for
you, and property, and marriage, and the good of every man, but sacred
_in and of itself_.[19] “Haven’t we the priest again there?  Who is his
God?  Man with a great M!  What is the divine?  The human!  Then the
predicate has indeed only been changed into the subject, and, instead of
the sentence “God is love,” they say “love is divine”; instead of “God
has become man,” “Man has become God,” etc.  It is nothing more or less
than a new — _religion_.  “All moral relations are ethical, are
cultivated with a moral mind, only where of themselves (without
religious consecration by the priest’s blessing) they are counted
_religious_.” Feuerbach’s proposition, “Theology is anthropology,” means
only “religion must be ethics, ethics alone is religion.”

Altogether Feuerbach accomplishes only a transposition of subject and
predicate, a giving of preference to the latter.  But, since he himself
says, “Love is not (and has never been considered by men) sacred through
being a predicate of God, but it is a predicate of God because it is
divine in and of itself,” he might judge that the fight against the
predicates themselves, against love and all sanctities, must be
commenced.  How could he hope to turn men away from God when he left
them the divine?  And if, as Feuerbach says, God himself has never been
the main thing to them, but only his predicates, then he might have gone
on leaving them the tinsel longer yet, since the doll, the real kernel,
was left at any rate.  He recognizes, too, that with him it is “only a
matter of annihilating an illusion”;[20] he thinks, however, that the
effect of the illusion on men is “downright ruinous, since even love, in
itself the truest, most inward sentiment, becomes an obscure, illusory
one through religiousness, since religious love loves man [Literally
“the man”] only for God’s sake, therefore loves man only apparently, but
in truth God only.” Is this different with moral love?  Does it love the
man, _this_ man for _this_ man’s sake, or for morality’s sake, and so —
for _homo homini Deus_ — for God’s sake?


	* * *

The wheels in the head have a number of other formal aspects, some of
which it may be useful to indicate here.

Thus _self-renunciation is_ common to the holy with the unholy, to the
pure and the impure.  The impure man _renounces_ all “better feelings,”
all shame, even natural timidity, and follows only the appetite that
rules him.  The pure man renounces his natural relation to the world
(“renounces the world”) and follows only the “desire” which rules him.
Driven by the thirst for money, the avaricious man renounces all
admonitions of conscience, all feeling of honor, all gentleness and all
compassion; he puts all considerations out of sight; the appetite drags
him along.  The holy man behaves similarly.  He makes himself the
“laughing-stock of the world,” is hard-hearted and “strictly just”; for
the desire drags him along.  As the unholy man renounces _himself_
before Mammon, so the holy man renounces _himself_ before God and the
divine laws.  We are now living in a time when the _shamelessness_ of
the holy is every day more and more felt and uncovered, whereby it is at
the same time compelled to unveil itself, and lay itself bare, more and
more every day.  Have not the shamelessness and stupidity of the reasons
with which men antagonize the “progress of the age” long surpassed all
measure and all expectation?  But it must be so.  The self-renouncers
must, as holy men, take the same course that they do so as unholy men;
as the latter little by little sink to the fullest measure of
self-renouncing vulgarity and _lowness_, so the former must ascend to
the most dishonorable _exaltation_.  The mammon of the earth and the
_God_ of heaven both demand exactly the same degree of —
self-renunciation.  The low man, like the exalted one, reaches out for a
“good” — the former for the material good, the latter for the ideal, the
so-called “supreme good”; and at last both complete each other again
too, as the “materially-minded” man sacrifices everything to an ideal
phantasm, his _vanity_, and the “spiritually-minded” man to a material
gratification, the _life of enjoyment_.

Those who exhort men to “unselfishness”[_uneigennützigkeit_, literally
“un-self-benefitingness”] think they are saying an uncommon deal.  What
do they understand by it?  Probably something like what they understand
by “self-renunciation.” But who is this self that is to be renounced and
to have no benefit?  It seems that you yourself are supposed to be it.
And for whose benefit is unselfish self-renunciation recommended to you?
Again for _your_ benefit and behoof, only that through unselfishness you
are procuring your “true benefit.”

You are to benefit _yourself_, and yet you are not to seek _your_
benefit.

People regard as unselfish the _benefactor_ of men, a Francke who
founded the orphan asylum, an O’Connell who works tirelessly for his
Irish people; but also the _fanatic_ who, like St.  Boniface, hazards
his life for the conversion of the heathen, or, like Robespierre,”
sacrifices everything to virtue — like Körner, dies for God, king, and
fatherland.  Hence, among others, O’Connell’s opponents try to trump up
against him some selfishness or mercenariness, for which the O’Connell
fund seemed to give them a foundation; for, if they were successful in
casting suspicion on his “unselfishness,” they would easily separate him
from his adherents.

Yet what could they show further than that O’Connell was working for
another _end_ than the ostensible one?  But, whether he may aim at
making money or at liberating the people, it still remains certain, in
one case as in the other, that he is striving for an end, and that _his_
end; selfishness here as there, only that his national self-interest
would be beneficial to _others too_, and so would be for the _common_
interest.

Now, do you suppose unselfishness is unreal and nowhere extant?  On the
contrary, nothing is more ordinary!  One may even call it an article of
fashion in the civilized world, which is considered so indispensable
that, if it costs too much in solid material, people at least adorn
themselves with its tinsel counterfeit and feign it.  Where does
unselfishness begin?  Right where an end ceases to be _our_ end and our
_property_, which we, as owners, can dispose of at pleasure; where it
becomes a fixed end or a — fixed idea; where it begins to inspire,
enthuse, fantasize us; in short, where it passes into our _stubbornness_
and becomes our — master.  One is not unselfish so long as he retains
the end in his power; one becomes so only at that “Here I stand, I
cannot do otherwise,” the fundamental maxim of all the possessed; one
becomes so in the case of a _sacred_ end, through the corresponding
sacred zeal.

I am not unselfish so long as the end remains my own, and I, instead of
giving myself up to be the blind means of its fulfillment, leave it
always an open question.  My zeal need not on that account be slacker
than the most fanatical, but at the same time I remain toward it
frostily cold, unbelieving, and its most irreconcilable enemy; I remain
its _judge_, because I am its owner.

Unselfishness grows rank as far as possessedness reaches, as much on
possessions of the devil as on those of a good spirit; there vice,
folly, etc.; here humility, devotion, etc.

Where could one look without meeting victims of self-renunciation?
There sits a girl opposite me, who perhaps has been making bloody
sacrifices to her soul for ten years already.  Over the buxom form
droops a deathly-tired head, and pale cheeks betray the slow bleeding
away of her youth.  Poor child, how often the passions may have beaten
at your heart, and the rich powers of youth have demanded their right!
When your head rolled in the soft pillow, how awakening nature quivered
through your limbs, the blood swelled your veins, and fiery fancies
poured the gleam of voluptuousness into your eyes!  Then appeared the
ghost of the soul and its eternal bliss.  You were terrified, your hands
folded themselves, your tormented eyes turned their look upward, you —
prayed.  The storms of nature were hushed, a calm glided over the ocean
of your appetites.  Slowly the weary eyelids sank over the life
extinguished under them, the tension crept out unperceived from the
rounded limbs, the boisterous waves dried up in the heart, the folded
hands themselves rested a powerless weight on the unresisting bosom, one
last faint “Oh dear!” moaned itself away, and — _the soul was at rest_.
You fell asleep, to awake in the morning to a new combat and a new —
prayer.  Now the habit of renunciation cools the heat of your desire,
and the roses of your youth are growing pale in the — chlorosis of your
heavenliness.  The soul is saved, the body may perish!  O Lais, O Ninon,
how well you did to scorn this pale virtue!  One free _grisette_ against
a thousand virgins grown gray in virtue!

The fixed idea may also be perceived as “maxim,” “principle,”
“standpoint,” etc.  Archimedes, to move the earth, asked for a
standpoint _outside_ it.  Men sought continually for this standpoint,
and every one seized upon it as well as he was able.  This foreign
standpoint is the _world of mind_, of ideas, thoughts, concepts,
essences; it is _heaven_.  Heaven is the “standpoint” from which the
earth is moved, earthly doings surveyed and — despised.  To assure to
themselves heaven, to occupy the heavenly standpoint firmly and for ever
— how painfully and tirelessly humanity struggled for this!

Christianity has aimed to deliver us from a life determined by nature,
from the appetites as actuating us, and so has meant that man should not
let himself be determined by his appetites.  This does not involve the
idea that _he_ was not to have appetites, but that the appetites were
not to have him, that they were not to become _fixed_, uncontrollable,
indissoluble.  Now, could not what Christianity (religion) contrived
against the appetites be applied by us to its own precept that _mind_
(thought, conceptions, ideas, faith) must determine us; could we not ask
that neither should mind, or the conception, the idea, be allowed to
determine us, to become fixed and inviolable or “sacred”?  Then it would
end in the _dissolution of mind_, the dissolution of all thoughts, of
all conceptions.  As we there had to say, “We are indeed to have
appetites, but the appetites are not to have us,” so we should now say,
“We are indeed to have _mind_, but mind is not to have us.” If the
latter seems lacking in sense, think _e.g._ of the fact that with so
many a man a thought becomes a “maxim,” whereby he himself is made
prisoner to it, so that it is not he that has the maxim, but rather it
that has him.  And with the maxim he has a “permanent standpoint” again.
The doctrines of the catechism become our _principles_ before we find it
out, and no longer brook rejection.  Their thought, or — mind, has the
sole power, and no protest of the “flesh” is further listened to.
Nevertheless it is only through the “flesh” that I can break tyranny of
mind; for it is only when a man hears his flesh along with the rest of
him that he hears himself wholly, and it is only when he wholly hears
_himself_ that he is a hearing or rational[_vernünftig_, derived from
_vernehmen_, to hear] being.  The Christian does not hear the agony of
his enthralled nature, but lives in “humility”; therefore he does not
grumble at the wrong which befalls his _person_; he thinks himself
satisfied with the “freedom of the spirit.” But, if the flesh once takes
the floor, and its tone is “passionate,” “indecorous,” “not
well-disposed,” “spiteful” (as it cannot be otherwise), then he thinks
he hears voices of devils, voices _against the spirit_ (for decorum,
passionlessness, kindly disposition, and the like, is — spirit), and is
justly zealous against them.  He could not be a Christian if he were
willing to endure them.  He listens only to morality, and slaps
unmorality in the mouth; he listens only to legality, and gags the
lawless word.  The _spirit_ of morality and legality holds him a
prisoner; a rigid, unbending _master_.  They call that the “mastery of
the spirit” — it is at the same time the _standpoint_ of the spirit.

And now whom do the ordinary liberal gentlemen mean to make free?  Whose
freedom is it that they cry out and thirst for?  The _spirit’s!_ That of
the spirit of morality, legality, piety, the fear of God.  That is what
the anti-liberal gentlemen also want, and the whole contention between
the two turns on a matter of advantage — whether the latter are to be
the only speakers, or the former are to receive a “share in the
enjoyment of the same advantage.” The _spirit_ remains the absolute
_lord_ for both, and their only quarrel is over who shall occupy the
hierarchical throne that pertains to the “Viceregent of the Lord.” The
best of it is that one can calmly look upon the stir with the certainty
that the wild beasts of history will tear each other to pieces just like
those of nature; their putrefying corpses fertilize the ground for — our
crops.

We shall come back later to many another wheel in the head — _e.g._,
those of vocation, truthfulness, love, etc.


	* * *

When one’s own is contrasted with what is _imparted_ to him, there is no
use in objecting that we cannot have anything isolated, but receive
everything as a part of the universal order, and therefore through the
impression of what is around us, and that consequently we have it as
something “imparted”; for there is a great difference between the
feelings and thoughts which are _aroused_ in me by other things and
those which are _given_ to me.  God, immortality, freedom, humanity,
etc.  are drilled into us from childhood as thoughts and feelings which
move our inner being more or less strongly, either ruling us without our
knowing it, or sometimes in richer natures manifesting themselves in
systems and works of art; but are always not aroused, but imparted,
feelings, because we must believe in them and cling to them.  That an
Absolute existed, and that it must be taken in, felt, and thought by us,
was settled as a faith in the minds of those who spent all the strength
of their mind on recognizing it and setting it forth.  The _feeling_ for
the Absolute exists there as an imparted one, and thenceforth results
only in the most manifold revelations of its own self.  So in Klopstock
the religious feeling was an imparted one, which in the _Messiad_ simply
found artistic expression.  If, on the other hand, the religion with
which he was confronted had been for him only an incitation to feeling
and thought, and if he had known how to take an attitude completely _his
own_ toward it, then there would have resulted, instead of religious
inspiration, a dissolution and consumption of the religion itself.
Instead of that, he only continued in mature years his childish feelings
received in childhood, and squandered the powers of his manhood in
decking out his childish trifles.

The difference is, then, whether feelings are imparted to me or only
aroused.  Those which are aroused are my own, egoistic, because they are
not _as feelings_ drilled into me, dictated to me, and pressed upon me;
but those which are imparted to me I receive, with open arms — I cherish
them in me as a heritage, cultivate them, and am _possessed_ by them.
Who is there that has never, more or less consciously, noticed that our
whole education is calculated to produce _feelings_ in us, _i.e._ impart
them to us, instead of leaving their production to ourselves however
they may turn out?  If we hear the name of God, we are to feel
veneration; if we hear that of the prince’s majesty, it is to be
received with reverence, deference, submission; if we hear that of
morality, we are to think that we hear something inviolable; if we hear
of the Evil One or evil ones, we are to shudder.  The intention is
directed to these _feelings_, and he who _e.g._ should hear with
pleasure the deeds of the “bad” would have to be “taught what’s what”
with the rod of discipline.  Thus stuffed with _imparted feelings_, we
appear before the bar of majority and are “pronounced of age.” Our
equipment consists of “elevating feelings, lofty thoughts, inspiring
maxims, eternal principles,” etc.  The young are of age when they
twitter like the old; they are driven through school to learn the old
song, and, when they have this by heart, they are declared of age.

We _must not_ feel at every thing and every name that comes before us
what we could and would like to feel thereat; _e.g._ at the name of God
we must think of nothing laughable, feel nothing disrespectful, it being
prescribed and imparted to us what and how we are to feel and think at
mention of that name.

That is the meaning of the _care of souls —_ that my soul or my mind be
tuned as others think right, not as I myself would like it.  How much
trouble does it not cost one, finally to secure to oneself a feeling of
one’s own at the mention of at least this or that name, and to laugh in
the face of many who expect from us a holy face and a composed
expression at their speeches.  What is imparted is _alien_ to us, is not
our own, and therefore is “sacred,” and it is hard work to lay aside the
“sacred dread of it.”

Today one again hears “seriousness” praised, “seriousness in the
presence of highly important subjects and discussions,” “German
seriousness,” etc.  This sort of seriousness proclaims clearly how old
and grave lunacy and possession have already become.  For there is
nothing more serious than a lunatic when he comes to the central point
of his lunacy; then his great earnestness incapacitates him for taking a
joke.  (See madhouses.)

**** 3.  The Hierarchy

The historical reflections on our Mongolism which I propose to insert
episodically at this place are not given with the claim of thoroughness,
or even of approved soundness, but solely because it seems to me that
they may contribute toward making the rest clear.

The history of the world, whose shaping properly belongs altogether to
the Caucasian race, seems till now to have run through two Caucasian
ages, in the first of which we had to work out and work off our innate
_negroidity_; this was followed in the second by _Mongoloidity_
(Chineseness), which must likewise be terribly made an end of.
Negroidity represents _antiquity_, the time of dependence on _things_
(on cocks’ eating, birds’ flight, on sneezing, on thunder and lightning,
on the rustling of sacred trees, etc.); Mongoloidity the time of
dependence on thoughts, the _Christian_ time.  Reserved for the future
are the words, “I am the owner of the world of things, I am the owner of
the world of mind.”

In the negroid age fall the campaigns of Sesostris and the importance of
Egypt and of northern Africa in general.  To the Mongoloid age belong
the invasions of the Huns and Mongols, up to the Russians.

The value of _me_ cannot possibly be rated high so long as the hard
diamond of the _not-me_ bears so enormous a price as was the case both
with God and with the world.  The not-me is still too stony and
indomitable to be consumed and absorbed by me; rather, men only creep
about with extraordinary _bustle_ on this _immovable_ entity, on this
_substance_, like parasitic animals on a body from whose juices they
draw nourishment, yet without consuming it.  It is the bustle of vermin,
the assiduity of Mongolians.  Among the Chinese, we know, everything
remains as it used to be, and nothing “essential” or “substantial”
suffers a change; all the more actively do they work away _at_ that
which remains, which bears the name of the “old,” “ancestors,” etc.

Accordingly, in our Mongolian age all change has been only reformatory
or ameliorative, not destructive or consuming and annihilating.  The
substance, the object, _remains_.  All our assiduity was only the
activity of ants and the hopping of fleas, jugglers’ tricks on the
immovable tight-rope of the objective, _corvée_ -service under the
leadership of the unchangeable or “eternal.” The Chinese are doubtless
the most _positive_ nation, because totally buried in precepts; but
neither has the Christian age come out from the _positive_, _i.e._ from
“limited freedom,” freedom “within certain limits.” In the most advanced
stage of civilization this activity earns the name of _scientific_
activity, of working on a motionless presupposition, a _hypothesis_ that
is not to be upset.

In its first and most unintelligible form morality shows itself as
_habit_.  To act according to the habit and usage _(mores)_ of one’s
country — is to be moral there.  Therefore pure moral action, clear,
unadulterated morality, is most straightforwardly practiced in China;
they keep to the old habit and usage, and hate each innovation as a
crime worthy of death.  For _innovation_ is the deadly enemy of _habit_,
of the _old_, of _permanence_.  In fact, too, it admits of no doubt that
through habit man secures himself against the obtrusiveness of things,
of the world, and founds a world of his own in which alone he is and
feels at home, builds himself a _heaven_.  Why, heaven has no other
meaning than that it is man’s proper home, in which nothing alien
regulates and rules him any longer, no influence of the earthly any
longer makes him himself alien; in short, in which the dross of the
earthly is thrown off, and the combat against the world has found an end
— in which, therefore, nothing is any longer _denied_ him.  Heaven is
the end of _abnegation_, it is _free enjoyment_.  There man no longer
denies himself anything, because nothing is any longer alien and hostile
to him.  But now habit is a “second nature,” which detaches and frees
man from his first and original natural condition, in securing him
against every casualty of it.  The fully elaborated habit of the Chinese
has provided for all emergencies, and everything is “looked out for”;
whatever may come, the Chinaman always knows how he has to behave, and
does not need to decide first according to the circumstances; no
unforeseen case throws him down from the heaven of his rest.  The
morally habituated and inured Chinaman is not surprised and taken off
his guard; he behaves with equanimity (_i.  e._, with equal spirit or
temper) toward everything, because his temper, protected by the
precaution of his traditional usage, does not lose its balance.  Hence,
on the ladder of culture or civilization humanity mounts the first round
through habit; and, as it conceives that, in climbing to culture, it is
at the same time climbing to heaven, the realm of culture or second
nature, it really mounts the first round of the — ladder to heaven.

If Mongoldom has settled the existence of spiritual beings — if it has
created a world of spirits, a heaven — the Caucasians have wrestled for
thousands of years with these spiritual beings, to get to the bottom of
them.  What were they doing, then, but building on Mongolian ground?
They have not built on sand, but in the air; they have wrestled with
Mongolism, stormed the Mongolian heaven, Tien.  When will they at last
annihilate this heaven?  When will they at last become _really
Caucasians_, and find themselves?  When will the “immortality of the
soul,” which in these latter days thought it was giving itself still
more security if it presented itself as “immortality of mind,” at last
change to the _mortality of mind?_

It was when, in the industrious struggle of the Mongolian race, men had
_built a heaven_, that those of the Caucasian race, since in their
Mongolian complexion they have to do with heaven, took upon themselves
the opposite task, the task of storming that heaven of custom,
_heaven-storming_ [A German idiom for destructive radicalism] activity.
To dig under all human ordinance, in order to set up a new and — better
one on the cleared site, to wreck all customs in order to put new and —
better customs in their place — their act is limited to this.  But is it
thus already purely and really what it aspires to be, and does it reach
its final aim?  No, in this creation of _a “better”_ it is tainted with
Mongolism.  It storms heaven only to make a heaven again, it overthrows
an old power only to legitimate a new power, it only — _improves_.
Nevertheless the point aimed at, often as it may vanish from the eyes at
every new attempt, is the real, complete downfall of heaven, customs,
etc.  — in short, of man secured only against the world, of the
_isolation_ or _inwardness_ of man.  Through the heaven of culture man
seeks to isolate himself from the world, to break its hostile power.
But this isolation of heaven must likewise be broken, and the true end
of heaven-storming is the — downfall of heaven, the annihilation of
heaven.  _Improving_ and _reforming_ is the Mongolism of the Caucasian,
because thereby he is always getting up again what already existed — to
wit, a _precept_, a generality, a heaven.  He harbors the most
irreconcilable enmity to heaven, and yet builds new heavens daily;
piling heaven on heaven, he only crushes one by another; the Jews’
heaven destroys the Greeks’, the Christians’ the Jews’, the Protestants’
the Catholics’, etc.  — If the _heaven-storming_ men of Caucasian blood
throw off their Mongolian skin, they will bury the emotional man under
the ruins of the monstrous world of emotion, the isolated man under his
isolated world, the paradisiacal man under his heaven.  And heaven is
the _realm of spirits_, the realm _of freedom of the spirit_.

The realm of heaven, the realm of spirits and ghosts, has found its
right standing in the speculative philosophy.  Here it was stated as the
realm of thoughts, concepts, and ideas; heaven is peopled with thoughts
and ideas, and this “realm of spirits” is then the true reality.

To want to win freedom for the _spirit_ is Mongolism; freedom of the
spirit is Mongolian freedom, freedom of feeling, moral freedom, etc.

We may find the word “morality” taken as synonymous with spontaneity,
self-determination.  But that is not involved in it; rather has the
Caucasian shown himself spontaneous only _in spite_ of his Mongolian
morality.  The Mongolian heaven, or morals,[_The same word that has been
translated “custom” several times in this section_] remained the strong
castle, and only by storming incessantly at this castle did the
Caucasian show himself moral; if he had not had to do with morals at all
any longer, if he had not had therein his indomitable, continual enemy,
the relation to morals would cease, and consequently morality would
cease.  That his spontaneity is still a moral spontaneity, therefore, is
just the Mongoloidity of it — is a sign that in it he has not arrived at
himself.  “Moral spontaneity” corresponds entirely with “religious and
orthodox philosophy,” “constitutional monarchy,” “the Christian State,”
“freedom within certain limits,” “the limited freedom of the press,” or,
in a figure, to the hero fettered to a sick-bed.

Man has not really vanquished Shamanism and its spooks till he possesses
the strength to lay aside not only the belief in ghosts or in spirits,
but also the belief in the spirit.

He who believes in a spook no more assumes the “introduction of a higher
world” than he who believes in the spirit, and both seek behind the
sensual world a supersensual one; in short, they produce and believe
_another_ world, and this other _world, the product of their mind_, is a
spiritual world; for their senses grasp and know nothing of another, a
non-sensual world, only their spirit lives in it.  Going on from this
Mongolian belief in the _existence of spiritual beings_ to the point
that the _proper being_ of man too is his _spirit_, and that all care
must be directed to this alone, to the “welfare of his soul,” is not
hard.  Influence on the spirit, so-called “moral influence,” is hereby
assured.

Hence it is manifest that Mongolism represents utter absence of any
rights of the sensuous, represents non-sensuousness and unnature, and
that sin and the consciousness of sin was our Mongolian torment that
lasted thousands of years.

But who, then, will dissolve the spirit into its _nothing?_ He who by
means of the spirit set forth nature as the _null_, finite, transitory,
he alone can bring down the spirit too to like nullity.  I can; each one
among you can, who does his will as an absolute I; in a word, the
_egoist_ can.


	* * *

Before the sacred, people lose all sense of power and all confidence;
they occupy a _powerless_ and _humble_ attitude toward it.  And yet no
thing is sacred of itself, but by my _declaring it sacred_, by my
declaration, my judgment, my bending the knee; in short, by my —
conscience.

Sacred is everything which for the egoist is to be unapproachable, not
to be touched, outside his _power —_ _i.e._ above _him_; sacred, in a
word, is every _matter of conscience_, for “this is a matter of
conscience to me” means simply, “I hold this sacred.”

For little children, just as for animals, nothing sacred exists,
because, in order to make room for this conception, one must already
have progressed so far in understanding that he can make distinctions
like “good and bad,” “warranted and unwarranted”; only at such a level
of reflection or intelligence — the proper standpoint of religion — can
unnatural (_i.  e._, brought into existence by thinking) _reverence_,
“sacred dread,” step into the place of natural fear.  To this sacred
dread belongs holding something outside oneself for mightier, greater,
better warranted, better, etc.; _i.e._ the attitude in which one
acknowledges the might of something alien — not merely feels it, then,
but expressly acknowledges it, _i.e._ admits it, yields, surrenders,
lets himself be tied (devotion, humility, servility, submission).  Here
walks the whole ghostly troop of the “Christian virtues.”

Everything toward which you cherish any respect or reverence deserves
the name of sacred; you yourselves, too, say that you would feel a
_“sacred dread”_ of laying hands on it.  And you give this tinge even to
the unholy (gallows, crime, etc.).  You have a horror of touching it.
There lies in it something uncanny, that is, unfamiliar or not _your
own_.

“If something or other did not rank as sacred in a man’s mind, why, then
all bars would be let down to self-will, to unlimited subjectivity!”
Fear makes the beginning, and one can make himself fearful to the
coarsest man; already, therefore, a barrier against his insolence.  But
in fear there always remains the attempt to liberate oneself from what
is feared, by guile, deception, tricks, etc.  In reverence,[_Ehrfurcht_]
on the contrary, it is quite otherwise.  Here something is not only
feared,[_gefürchtet_] but also honored [_geehrt_]: what is feared has
become an inward power which I can no longer get clear of; I honor it,
am captivated by it and devoted to it, belong to it; by the honor which
I pay it I am completely in its power, and do not even attempt
liberation any longer.  Now I am attached to it with all the strength of
faith; I _believe_.  I and what I fear are one; “not I live, but the
respected lives in me!” Because the spirit, the infinite, does not allow
of coming to any end, therefore it is stationary; it fears _dying_, it
cannot let go its dear Jesus, the greatness of finiteness is no longer
recognized by its blinded eye; the object of fear, now raised to
veneration, may no longer be handled; reverence is made eternal, the
respected is deified.  The man is now no longer employed in creating,
but in _learning_ (knowing, investigating, etc.), _i.e._ occupied with a
fixed _object_, losing himself in its depths, without return to himself.
The relation to this object is that of knowing, fathoming, basing, not
that of _dissolution_ (abrogation, etc.).  “Man is to be religious,”
that is settled; therefore people busy themselves only with the question
how this is to be attained, what is the right meaning of religiousness,
etc.  Quite otherwise when one makes the axiom itself doubtful and calls
it in question, even though it should go to smash.  Morality too is such
a sacred conception; one must be moral, and must look only for the right
“how,” the right way to be so.  One dares not go at morality itself with
the question whether it is not itself an illusion; it remains exalted
above all doubt, unchangeable.  And so we go on with the sacred, grade
after grade, from the “holy” to the “holy of holies.”


	* * *

Men are sometimes divided into two classes: _cultured_ and _uncultured_.
The former, so far as they were worthy of their name, occupied
themselves with thoughts, with mind, and (because in the time since
Christ, of which the very principle is thought, they were the ruling
ones) demanded a servile respect for the thoughts recognized by them.
State, emperor, church, God, morality, order, are such thoughts or
spirits, that exist only for the mind.  A merely living being, an
animal, cares as little for them as a child.  But the uncultured are
really nothing but children, and he who attends only to the necessities
of his life is indifferent to those spirits; but, because he is also
weak before them, he succumbs to their power, and is ruled by —
thoughts.  This is the meaning of hierarchy.

_Hierarchy is dominion of thoughts, dominion of mind!_

We are hierarchic to this day, kept down by those who are supported by
thoughts.  Thoughts are the sacred.

But the two are always clashing, now one and now the other giving the
offence; and this clash occurs, not only in the collision of two men,
but in one and the same man.  For no cultured man is so cultured as not
to find enjoyment in things too, and so be uncultured; and no uncultured
man is totally without thoughts.  In Hegel it comes to light at last
what a longing for things even the most cultured man has, and what a
horror of every “hollow theory” he harbors.  With him reality, the world
of things, is altogether to correspond to the thought, and no concept is
to be without reality.  This caused Hegel’s system to be known as the
most objective, as if in it thought and thing celebrated their union.
But this was simply the extremest case of violence on the part of
thought, its highest pitch of despotism and sole dominion, the triumph
of mind, and with it the triumph of _philosophy_.  Philosophy cannot
hereafter achieve anything higher, for its highest is the _omnipotence
of mind_, the almightiness of mind.[21]

Spiritual men have _taken into their head_ something that is to be
realized.  They have _concepts_ of love, goodness, etc., which they
would like to see _realized_; therefore they want to set up a kingdom of
love on earth, in which no one any longer acts from selfishness, but
each one “from love.” Love is to _rule_.  What they have taken into
their head, what shall we call it but — _fixed idea?_ Why, “their head
is _haunted.”_ The most oppressive spook is _Man_.  Think of the
proverb, “The road to ruin is paved with good intentions.” The intention
to realize humanity altogether in oneself, to become altogether man, is
of such ruinous kind; here belong the intentions to become good, noble,
loving, etc.

In the sixth part of the _Denkwürdigkeiten,_ p.  7, Bruno Bauer says:
“That middle class, which was to receive such a terrible importance for
modern history, is capable of no self-sacrificing action, no enthusiasm
for an idea, no exaltation; it devotes itself to nothing but the
interests of its mediocrity; _i.e._ it remains always limited to itself,
and conquers at last only through its bulk, with which it has succeeded
in tiring out the efforts of passion, enthusiasm, consistency — through
its surface, into which it absorbs a part of the new ideas.” And (p.  6)
“It has turned the revolutionary ideas, for which not it, but unselfish
or impassioned men sacrificed themselves, solely to its own profit, has
turned spirit into money.  — That is, to be sure, after it had taken
away from those ideas their point, their consistency, their destructive
seriousness, fanatical against all egoism.” These people, then, are not
self-sacrificing, not enthusiastic, not idealistic, not consistent, not
zealots; they are egoists in the usual sense, selfish people, looking
out for their advantage, sober, calculating, etc.

Who, then, is “self-sacrificing?”[_Literally, “sacrificing”; the German
word has not the prefix “self.”_] In the full sense, surely, he who
ventures everything else for _one thing_, one object, one will, one
passion.  Is not the lover self-sacrificing who forsakes father and
mother, endures all dangers and privations, to reach his goal?  Or the
ambitious man, who offers up all his desires, wishes, and satisfactions
to the single passion, or the avaricious man who denies himself
everything to gather treasures, or the pleasure-seeker, etc.?  He is
ruled by a passion to which he brings the rest as sacrifices.

And are these self-sacrificing people perchance not selfish, not egoist?
As they have only one ruling passion, so they provide for only one
satisfaction, but for this the more strenuously, they are wholly
absorbed in it.  Their entire activity is egoistic, but it is a
one-sided, unopened, narrow egoism; it is possessedness.

“Why, those are petty passions, by which, on the contrary, man must not
let himself be enthralled.  Man must make sacrifices for a great idea, a
great cause!” A “great idea,” a “good cause,” is, it may be, the honor
of God, for which innumerable people have met death; Christianity, which
has found its willing martyrs; the Holy Catholic Church, which has
greedily demanded sacrifices of heretics; liberty and equality, which
were waited on by bloody guillotines.

He who lives for a great idea, a good cause, a doctrine, a system, a
lofty calling, may not let any worldly lusts, any self-seeking interest,
spring up in him.  Here we have the concept of _clericalism_, or, as it
may also be called in its pedagogic activity, school-masterliness; for
the idealists play the schoolmaster over us.  The clergyman is
especially called to live to the idea and to work for the idea, the
truly good cause.  Therefore the people feel how little it befits him to
show worldly haughtiness, to desire good living, to join in such
pleasures as dancing and gaming — in short, to have any other than a
“sacred interest.” Hence, too, doubtless, is derived the scanty salary
of teachers, who are to feel themselves repaid by the sacredness of
their calling alone, and to “renounce” other enjoyments.

Even a directory of the sacred ideas, one or more of which man is to
look upon as his calling, is not lacking.  Family, fatherland, science,
etc., may find in me a servant faithful to his calling.

Here we come upon the old, old craze of the world, which has not yet
learned to do without clericalism — that to live and work _for an idea_
is man’s calling, and according to the faithfulness of its fulfillment
his _human_ worth is measured.

This is the dominion of the idea; in other words, it is clericalism.
Thus Robespierre and St.  Just were priests through and through,
inspired by the idea, enthusiasts, consistent instruments of this idea,
idealistic men.  So St.  Just exclaims in a speech, “There is something
terrible in the sacred love of country; it is so exclusive that it
sacrifices everything to the public interest without mercy, without
fear, without human consideration.  It hurls Manlius down the precipice;
it sacrifices its private inclinations; it leads Regulus to Carthage,
throws a Roman into the chasm, and sets Marat, as a victim of his
devotion, in the Pantheon.”

Now, over against these representatives of ideal or sacred interests
stands a world of innumerable “personal” profane interests.  No idea, no
system, no sacred cause is so great as never to be outrivaled and
modified by these personal interests.  Even if they are silent
momentarily, and in times of rage, and fanaticism, yet they soon come
uppermost again through “the sound sense of the people.” Those ideas do
not completely conquer till they are no longer hostile to personal
interests, till they satisfy egoism.

The man who is just now crying herrings in front of my window has a
personal interest in good sales, and, if his wife or anybody else wishes
him the like, this remains a personal interest all the same.  If, on the
other hand, a thief deprived him of his basket, then there would at once
arise an interest of many, of the whole city, of the whole country, or,
in a word, of all who abhor theft; an interest in which the
herring-seller’s person would become indifferent, and in its place the
category of the “robbed man” would come into the foreground.  But even
here all might yet resolve itself into a personal interest, each of the
partakers reflecting that he must concur in the punishment of the thief
because unpunished stealing might otherwise become general and cause him
too to lose his own.  Such a calculation, however, can hardly be assumed
on the part of many, and we shall rather hear the cry that the thief is
a “criminal.” Here we have before us a judgment, the thief’s action
receiving its expression in the concept “crime.” Now the matter stands
thus: even if a crime did not cause the slightest damage either to me or
to any of those in whom I take an interest, I should nevertheless
denounce it.  Why?  Because I am enthusiastic for _morality_, filled
with the _idea_ of morality; what is hostile to it I everywhere assail.
Because in his mind theft ranks as abominable without any question,
Proudhon, _e.g._, thinks that with the sentence “Property is theft” he
has at once put a brand on property.  In the sense of the priestly,
theft is always a _crime_, or at least a misdeed.

Here the personal interest is at an end.  This particular person who has
stolen the basket is perfectly indifferent to my person; it is only the
thief, this concept of which that person presents a specimen, that I
take an interest in.  The thief and man are in my mind irreconcilable
opposites; for one is not truly man when one is a thief; one degrades
_Man_ or “humanity” in himself when one steals.  Dropping out of
personal concern, one gets into _philanthropy_, friendliness to man,
which is usually misunderstood as if it was a love to men, to each
individual, while it is nothing but a love of _Man_, the unreal concept,
the spook.  It is not _tous anthropous,_ men, but _ton anthropon_, Man,
that the philanthropist carries in his heart.  To be sure, he cares for
each individual, but only because he wants to see his beloved ideal
realized everywhere.

So there is nothing said here of care for me, you, us; that would be
personal interest, and belongs under the head of “worldly love.”
Philanthropy is a heavenly, spiritual, a — priestly love.  _Man_ must be
restored in us, even if thereby we poor devils should come to grief.  It
is the same priestly principle as that famous _fiat justitia, pereat
mundus_; man and justice are ideas, ghosts, for love of which everything
is sacrificed; therefore, the priestly spirits are the
“self-sacrificing” ones.

He who is infatuated with _Man_ leaves persons out of account so far as
that infatuation extends, and floats in an ideal, sacred interest.
_Man_, you see, is not a person, but an ideal, a spook.

Now, things as different as possible can belong to _Man_ and be so
regarded.  If one finds Man’s chief requirement in piety, there arises
religious clericalism; if one sees it in morality, then moral
clericalism raises its head.  On this account the priestly spirits of
our day want to make a “religion” of everything, a “religion of
liberty,” “religion of equality,” etc., and for them every idea becomes
a “sacred cause,” _e.g._ even citizenship, politics, publicity, freedom
of the press, trial by jury, etc.

Now, what does “unselfishness” mean in this sense?  Having only an ideal
interest, before which no respect of persons avails!

The stiff head of the worldly man opposes this, but for centuries has
always been worsted at least so far as to have to bend the unruly neck
and “honor the higher power”; clericalism pressed it down.  When the
worldly egoist had shaken off a higher power (_e.g._ the Old Testament
law, the Roman pope, etc.), then at once a seven times higher one was
over him again, _e.g._ faith in the place of the law, the transformation
of all laymen into divines in place of the limited body of clergy, etc.
His experience was like that of the possessed man into whom seven devils
passed when he thought he had freed himself from one.

In the passage quoted above, all ideality is denied to the middle class.
It certainly schemed against the ideal consistency with which
Robespierre wanted to carry out the principle.  The instinct of its
interest told it that this consistency harmonized too little with what
its mind was set on, and that it would be acting against itself if it
were willing to further the enthusiasm for principle.  Was it to behave
so unselfishly as to abandon all its aims in order to bring a harsh
theory to its triumph?  It suits the priests admirably, to be sure, when
people listen to their summons, “Cast away everything and follow me,” or
“Sell all that thou hast and give to the poor, and thou shalt have
treasure in heaven; and come, follow me.” Some decided idealists obey
this call; but most act like Ananias and Sapphira, maintaining a
behavior half clerical or religious and half worldly, serving God and
Mammon.

I do not blame the middle class for not wanting to let its aims be
frustrated by Robespierre, _i.e._ for inquiring of its egoism how far it
might give the revolutionary idea a chance.  But one might blame (if
blame were in place here anyhow) those who let their own interests be
frustrated by the interests of the middle class.  However, will not they
likewise sooner or later learn to understand what is to their advantage?
August Becker says:[22] “To win the producers (proletarians) a negation
of the traditional conception of right is by no means enough.  Folks
unfortunately care little for the theoretical victory of the idea.  One
must demonstrate to them _ad oculos_ how this victory can be practically
utilized in life.” And (p.32): “You must get hold of folks by their real
interests if you want to work upon them.” Immediately after this he
shows how a fine looseness of morals is already spreading among our
peasants, because they prefer to follow their real interests rather than
the commands of morality.

Because the revolutionary priests or schoolmasters served _Man_, they
cut off the heads of _men_.  The revolutionary laymen, those outside the
sacred circle, did not feel any greater horror of cutting off heads, but
were less anxious about the rights of Man than about their own.

How comes it, though, that the egoism of those who affirm personal
interest, and always inquire of it, is nevertheless forever succumbing
to a priestly or schoolmasterly (_i.  e._ an ideal) interest?  Their
person seems to them too small, too insignificant — and is so in fact —
to lay claim to everything and be able to put itself completely in
force.  There is a sure sign of this in their dividing themselves into
two persons, an eternal and a temporal, and always caring either only
for the one or only for the other, on Sunday for the eternal, on the
work-day for the temporal, in prayer for the former, in work for the
latter.  They have the priest in themselves, therefore they do not get
rid of him, but hear themselves lectured inwardly every Sunday.

How men have struggled and calculated to get at a solution regarding
these dualistic essences!  Idea followed upon idea, principle upon
principle, system upon system, and none knew how to keep down
permanently the contradiction of the “worldly” man, the so-called
“egoist.” Does not this prove that all those ideas were too feeble to
take up my whole will into themselves and satisfy it?  They were and
remained hostile to me, even if the hostility lay concealed for a
considerable time.  Will it be the same with _self-ownership?_ Is it too
only an attempt at mediation?  Whatever principle I turned to, it might
be to that of _reason_, I always had to turn away from it again.  Or can
I always be rational, arrange my life according to reason in everything?
I can, no doubt, _strive_ after rationality, I can _love_ it, just as I
can also love God and every other idea.  I can be a philosopher, a lover
of wisdom, as I love God.  But what I love, what I strive for, is only
in my idea, my conception, my thoughts; it is in my heart, my head, it
is in me like the heart, but it is not I, I am not it.

To the activity of priestly minds belongs especially what one often
hears called _“moral influence.”_

Moral influence takes its start where _humiliation_ begins; yes, it is
nothing else than this humiliation itself, the breaking and bending of
the temper [_Muth_] down to humility.[_Demuth_] If I call to some one to
run away when a rock is to be blasted, I exert no moral influence by
this demand; if I say to a child “You will go hungry if you will not eat
what is put on the table,” this is not moral influence.  But, if I say
to it, “You will pray, honor your parents, respect the crucifix, speak
the truth, for this belongs to man and is man’s calling,” or even “this
is God’s will,” then moral influence is complete; then a man is to bend
before the _calling_ of man, be tractable, become humble, give up his
will for an alien one which is set up as rule and law; he is to _abase_
himself before something _higher_ : self-abasement.  “He that abaseth
himself shall be exalted.” Yes, yes, children must early be _made_ to
practice piety, godliness, and propriety; a person of good breeding is
one into whom “good maxims” have been _instilled_ and _impressed_,
poured in through a funnel, thrashed in and preached in.

If one shrugs his shoulders at this, at once the good wring their hands
despairingly, and cry: “But, for heaven’s sake, if one is to give
children no good instruction, why, then they will run straight into the
jaws of sin, and become good-for-nothing hoodlums!” Gently, you prophets
of evil.  Good-for-nothing in your sense they certainly will become; but
your sense happens to be a very good-for-nothing sense.  The impudent
lads will no longer let anything be whined and chattered into them by
you, and will have no sympathy for all the follies for which you have
been raving and driveling since the memory of man began; they will
abolish the law of inheritance; they will not be willing to _inherit_
your stupidities as you inherited them from your fathers; they destroy
_inherited sin_.[23] If you command them, “Bend before the Most High,”
they will answer: “If he wants to bend us, let him come himself and do
it; we, at least, will not bend of our own accord.” And, if you threaten
them with his wrath and his punishment, they will take it like being
threatened with the bogie-man.  If you are no more successful in making
them afraid of ghosts, then the dominion of ghosts is at an end, and
nurses’ tales find no — _faith_.

And is it not precisely the liberals again that press for good education
and improvement of the educational system?  For how could their
liberalism, their “liberty within the bounds of law,” come about without
discipline?  Even if they do not exactly educate to the fear of God, yet
they demand the _fear of Man_ all the more strictly, and awaken
“enthusiasm for the truly human calling” by discipline.


	* * *

A long time passed away, in which people were satisfied with the fancy
that they had the _truth_, without thinking seriously whether perhaps
they themselves must be true to possess the truth.  This time was the
_Middle Ages_.  With the common consciousness — _i.e._ the consciousness
which deals with things, that consciousness which has receptivity only
for things, or for what is sensuous and sense-moving — they thought to
grasp what did not deal with things and was not perceptible by the
senses.  As one does indeed also exert his eye to see the remote, or
laboriously exercise his hand till its fingers have become dexterous
enough to press the keys correctly, so they chastened themselves in the
most manifold ways, in order to become capable of receiving the
supersensual wholly into themselves.  But what they chastened was, after
all, only the sensual man, the common consciousness, so-called finite or
objective thought.  Yet as this thought, this understanding, which
Luther decries under the name of reason, is incapable of comprehending
the divine, its chastening contributed just as much to the understanding
of the truth as if one exercised the feet year in and year out in
dancing, and hoped that in this way they would finally learn to play the
flute.  Luther, with whom the so-called Middle Ages end, was the first
who understood that the man himself must become other than he was if he
wanted to comprehend truth — must become as true as truth itself.  Only
he who already has truth in his belief, only he who _believes_ in it,
can become a partaker of it; _i.e._ only the believer finds it
accessible and sounds its depths.  Only that organ of man which is able
to blow can attain the further capacity of flute-playing, and only that
man can become a partaker of truth who has the right organ for it.  He
who is capable of thinking only what is sensuous, objective, pertaining
to things, figures to himself in truth only what pertains to things.
But truth is spirit, stuff altogether inappreciable by the senses, and
therefore only for the “higher consciousness,” not for that which is
“earthly-minded.”

With Luther, accordingly, dawns the perception that truth, because it is
a _thought_, is only for the _thinking_ man.  And this is to say that
man must henceforth take an utterly different standpoint, to wit, the
heavenly, believing, scientific standpoint, or that of _thought_ in
relation to its object, the — _thought —_ that of mind in relation to
mind.  Consequently: only the like apprehend the like.  “You are like
the spirit that you understand.”[24]

Because Protestantism broke the medieval hierarchy, the opinion could
take root that hierarchy in general had been shattered by it, and it
could be wholly overlooked that it was precisely a “reformation,” and so
a reinvigoration of the antiquated hierarchy.  That medieval hierarchy
had been only a weakly one, as it had to let all possible barbarism of
unsanctified things run on uncoerced beside it, and it was the
Reformation that first steeled the power of hierarchy.  If Bruno Bauer
thinks:[25] “As the Reformation was mainly the abstract rending of the
religious principle from art, State, and science, and so its liberation
from those powers with which it had joined itself in the antiquity of
the church and in the hierarchy of the Middle Ages, so too the
theological and ecclesiastical movements which proceeded from the
Reformation are only the consistent carrying out of this abstraction of
the religious principle from the other powers of humanity,” I regard
precisely the opposite as correct, and think that the dominion of
spirits, or freedom of mind (which comes to the same thing), was never
before so all-embracing and all-powerful, because the present one,
instead of rending the religious principle from art, State, and science,
lifted the latter altogether out of secularity into the “realm of
spirit” and made them religious.

Luther and Descartes have been appropriately put side by side in their
“He who believes in God” and “I think, therefore I am” (_cogito, ergo
sum_).  Man’s heaven is thought — mind.  Everything can be wrested from
him, except thought, except faith.  _Particular_ faith, like faith of
Zeus, Astarte, Jehovah, Allah, may be destroyed, but faith itself is
indestructible.  In thought is freedom.  What I need and what I hunger
for is no longer granted to me by any _grace_, by the Virgin Mary.  by
intercession of the saints, or by the binding and loosing church, but I
procure it for myself.  In short, my being (the _sum_) is a living in
the heaven of thought, of mind, a _cogitare_.  But I myself am nothing
else than mind, thinking mind (according to Descartes), believing mind
(according to Luther).  My body I am not; my flesh may _suffer_ from
appetites or pains.  I am not my flesh, but I am _mind_, only mind.

This thought runs through the history of the Reformation till today.

Only by the more modern philosophy since Descartes has a serious effort
been made to bring Christianity to complete efficacy, by exalting the
“scientific consciousness.” to be the only true and valid one.  Hence it
begins with absolute _doubt, dubitare_, with grinding common
consciousness to atoms, with turning away from everything that “mind,”
“thought,” does not legitimate.  To it _Nature_ counts for nothing; the
opinion of men, their “human precepts,” for nothing: and it does not
rest till it has brought reason into everything, and can say “The real
is the rational, and only the rational is the real.” Thus it has at last
brought mind, reason, to victory; and everything is mind, because
everything is rational, because all nature, as well as even the most
perverse opinions of men, contains reason; for “all must serve for the
best,” _i.  e._, lead to the victory of reason.

Descartes’s _dubitare_ contains the decided statement that only
_cogitare_, thought, mind — _is_.  A complete break with “common”
consciousness, which ascribes reality to _irrational_ things!  Only the
rational is, only mind is!  This is the principle of modern philosophy,
the genuine Christian principle.  Descartes in his own time
discriminated the body sharply from the mind, and “the spirit ‘tis that
builds itself the body,” says Goethe.

But this philosophy itself, Christian philosophy, still does not get rid
of the rational, and therefore inveighs against the “merely subjective,”
against “fancies, fortuities, arbitrariness,” etc.  What it wants is
that the _divine_ should become visible in everything, and all
consciousness become a knowing of the divine, and man behold God
everywhere; but God never is, without the _devil_.

For this very reason the name of philosopher is not to be given to him
who has indeed open eyes for the things of the world, a clear and
undazzled gaze, a correct judgment about the world, but who sees in the
world just the world, in objects only objects, and, in short, everything
prosaically as it is; but he alone is a philosopher who sees, and points
out or demonstrates, heaven in the world, the supernal in the earthly,
the — _divine_ in the mundane.  The former may be ever so wise, there is
no getting away from this:

<quote>

What wise men see not by their wisdom’s art

Is practiced simply by a childlike heart.[26]

</quote>

It takes this childlike heart, this eye for the divine, to make a
philosopher.  The first-named man has only a “common” consciousness, but
he who knows the divine, and knows how to tell it, has a “scientific”
one.  On this ground Bacon was turned out of the realm of philosophers.
And certainly what is called English philosophy seems to have got no
further than to the discoveries of so-called “clear heads,” _e.g._ Bacon
and Hume.  The English did not know how to exalt the simplicity of the
childlike heart to philosophic significance, did not know how to make —
philosophers out of childlike hearts.  This is as much as to say, their
philosophy was not able to become _theological_ or _theology_, and yet
it is only as theology that it can really _live itself_ out, complete
itself.  The field of its battle to the death is in theology.  Bacon did
not trouble himself about theological questions and cardinal points.

Cognition has its object in life.  German thought seeks, more than that
of others, to reach the beginnings and fountain-heads of life, and sees
no life till it sees it in cognition itself.  Descartes’s _cogito, ergo
sum_ has the meaning “One lives only when one thinks.” Thinking life is
called “intellectual life”!  Only mind lives, its life is the true life.
Then, just so in nature only the “eternal laws,” the mind or the reason
of nature, are its true life.  In man, as in nature, only the thought
lives; everything else is dead!  To this abstraction, to the life of
generalities or of that which is _lifeless_, the history of mind had to
come.  God, who is spirit, alone lives.  Nothing lives but the ghost.

How can one try to assert of modern philosophy or modern times that they
have reached freedom, since they have not freed us from the power of
objectivity?  Or am I perhaps free from a despot when I am not afraid of
the personal potentate, to be sure, but of every infraction of the
loving reverence which I fancy I owe him?  The case is the same with
modern times.  They only changed the _existing_ objects, the real ruler,
into _conceived_ objects, _i.e._ into _ideas_, before which the old
respect not only was not lost, but increased in intensity.  Even if
people snapped their fingers at God and the devil in their former crass
reality, people devoted only the greater attention to their ideas.
“They are rid of the Evil One; evil is left.”[27] The decision having
once been made not to let oneself be imposed on any longer by the extant
and palpable, little scruple was felt about revolting against the
existing State or overturning the existing laws; but to sin against the
_idea_ of the State, not to submit to the _idea_ of law, who would have
dared that?  So one remained a “citizen” and a “law-respecting,” loyal
man; yes, one seemed to himself to be only so much more law-respecting,
the more rationalistically one abrogated the former defective law in
order to do homage to the “spirit of the law.” In all this the objects
had only suffered a change of form; they had remained in their
preponderance and pre-eminence; in short, one was still involved in
obedience and possessedness, lived in reflection, and had an object on
which one reflected, which one respected, and before which one felt
reverence and fear.  One had done nothing but transform the _things_
into _conceptions_ of the things, into thoughts and ideas, whereby one’s
_dependence_ became all the more intimate and indissoluble.  So, _e.g._,
it is not hard to emancipate oneself from the commands of parents, or to
set aside the admonitions of uncle and aunt, the entreaties of brother
and sister; but the renounced obedience easily gets into one’s
conscience, and the less one does give way to the individual demands,
because he rationalistically, by his own reason, recognizes them to be
unreasonable, so much the more conscientiously does he hold fast to
filial piety and family love, and so much the harder is it for him to
forgive himself a trespass against the _conception_ which he has formed
of family love and of filial duty.  Released from dependence as regards
the existing family, one falls into the more binding dependence on the
idea of the family; one is ruled by the spirit of the family.  The
family consisting of John, Maggie, etc., whose dominion has become
powerless, is only internalized, being left as “family” in general, to
which one just applies the old saying, “We must obey God rather than
man,” whose significance here is this: “I cannot, to be sure,
accommodate myself to your senseless requirements, but, as my ‘family,’
you still remain the object of my love and care”; for “the family” is a
sacred idea, which the individual must never offend against.  — And this
family internalized and desensualized into a thought, a conception, now
ranks as the “sacred,” whose despotism is tenfold more grievous because
it makes a racket in my conscience.  This despotism is broken when the
conception, family, also becomes a _nothing_ to me The Christian dicta,
“Woman, what have I to do with thee?”[28] “I am come to stir up a man
against his father, and a daughter against her mother,”[29] and others,
are accompanied by something that refers us to the heavenly or true
family, and mean no more than the State’s demand, in case of a collision
between it and the family, that we obey _its_ commands.

The case of morality is like that of the family.  Many a man renounces
morals, but with great difficulty the conception, “morality.” Morality
is the “idea” of morals, their intellectual power, their power over the
conscience; on the other hand, morals are too material to rule the mind,
and do not fetter an “intellectual” man, a so-called independent, a
“freethinker.”

The Protestant may put it as he will, the “holy [_heilig_] Scripture,”
the “Word of God,” still remains sacred [_heilig_] for him.  He for whom
this is no longer “holy” has ceased to — be a Protestant.  But herewith
what is “ordained” in it, the public authorities appointed by God, etc.,
also remain sacred for him.  For him these things remain indissoluble,
unapproachable, “raised above all doubt”; and, as _doubt_, which in
practice becomes a _buffeting_, is what is most man’s own, these things
remain “raised” above himself.  He who cannot _get away_ from them will
— _believe_; for to believe in them is to be _bound_ to them.  Through
the fact that in Protestantism the _faith_ becomes a more inward faith,
the _servitude_ has also become a more inward servitude; one has taken
those sanctities up into himself, entwined them with all his thoughts
and endeavors, made them a _“matter of conscience”_, constructed out of
them a _“sacred duty”_ for himself.  Therefore what the Protestant’s
conscience cannot get away from is sacred to him, and
_conscientiousness_ most clearly designates his character.

Protestantism has actually put a man in the position of a country
governed by secret police.  The spy and eavesdropper, “conscience,”
watches over every motion of the mind, and all thought and action is for
it a “matter of conscience,” _i.  e._, police business.  This tearing
apart of man into “natural impulse” and “conscience” (inner populace and
inner police) is what constitutes the Protestant.  The reason of the
Bible (in place of the Catholic “reason of the church”) ranks as sacred,
and this feeling and consciousness that the word of the Bible is sacred
is called — conscience.  With this, then, sacredness is “laid upon one’s
conscience.” If one does not free himself from conscience, the
consciousness of the sacred, he may act unconscientiously indeed, but
never consciencelessly.

The Catholic finds himself satisfied when he fulfills the _command_; the
Protestant acts according to his “best judgment and conscience.” For the
Catholic is only a _layman_; the Protestant is himself a
_clergyman_.[_Geistlicher_, literally “spiritual man”] Just this is the
progress of the Reformation period beyond the Middle Ages, and at the
same time its curse — that the _spiritual_ became complete.

What else was the Jesuit moral philosophy than a continuation of the
sale of indulgences?  Only that the man who was relieved of his burden
of sin now gained also an _insight_ into the remission of sins, and
convinced himself how really his sin was taken from him, since in this
or that particular case (casuists) it was so clearly no sin at all that
he committed.  The sale of indulgences had made all sins and
transgressions permissible, and silenced every movement of conscience.
All sensuality might hold sway, if it was only purchased from the
church.  This favoring of sensuality was continued by the Jesuits, while
the strictly moral, dark, fanatical, repentant, contrite, praying
Protestants (as the true completers of Christianity, to be sure)
acknowledged only the intellectual and spiritual man.  Catholicism,
especially the Jesuits, gave aid to egoism in this way, found
involuntary and unconscious adherents within Protestantism itself, and
saved us from the subversion and extinction of _sensuality_.
Nevertheless the Protestant spirit spreads its dominion farther and
farther; and, as, beside it the “divine,” the Jesuit spirit represents
only the “diabolic” which is inseparable from everything divine, the
latter can never assert itself alone, but must look on and see how in
France, _e.g._, the Philistinism of Protestantism wins at last, and mind
is on top.

Protestantism is usually complimented on having brought the mundane into
repute again, _e.g._ marriage, the State, etc.  But the mundane itself
as mundane, the secular, is even more indifferent to it than to
Catholicism, which lets the profane world stand, yes, and relishes its
pleasures, while the rational, consistent Protestant sets about
annihilating the mundane altogether, and that simply by _hallowing_ it.
So marriage has been deprived of its naturalness by becoming sacred, not
in the sense of the Catholic sacrament, where it only receives its
consecration from the church and so is unholy at bottom, but in the
sense of being something sacred in itself to begin with, a sacred
relation.  Just so the State, also.  Formerly the pope gave consecration
and his blessing to it and its princes, now the State is intrinsically
sacred, majesty is sacred without needing the priest’s blessing.  The
order of nature, or natural law, was altogether hallowed as “God’s
ordinance.” Hence it is said _e.g._ in the Augsburg Confession, Art.
II: “So now we reasonably abide by the saying, as the jurisconsults have
wisely and rightly said: that man and woman should be with each other is
a natural law.  Now, if it is a _natural law, then it is God’s
ordinance_, therefore implanted in nature, and therefore a _divine_ law
also.” And is it anything more than Protestantism brought up to date,
when Feuerbach pronounces moral relations sacred, not as God’s ordinance
indeed, but, instead, for the sake of the _spirit_ that dwells in them?
“But marriage as a free alliance of love, of course — is _sacred of
itself_, by the nature of the union that is formed here.  _That_
marriage alone is a _religious_ one that is a _true_ one, that
corresponds to the _essence_ of marriage, love.  And so it is with all
moral relations.  They are _ethical_, are cultivated with a moral mind,
only where they rank as _religious of themselves_.  True friendship is
only where the _limits_ of friendship are preserved with religious
conscientiousness, with the same conscientiousness with which the
believer guards the dignity of his God.  Friendship is and must be
_sacred_ for you, and property, and marriage, and the good of every man,
but sacred _in and of itself.”_[30]

That is a very essential consideration.  In Catholicism the mundane can
indeed be _consecrated_ or _hallowed_, but it is not sacred without this
priestly blessing; in Protestantism, on the contrary, mundane relations
are sacred _of themselves_, sacred by their mere existence.  The Jesuit
maxim, “the end hallows the means,” corresponds precisely to the
consecration by which sanctity is bestowed.  No means are holy or unholy
in themselves, but their relation to the church, their use for the
church, hallows the means.  Regicide was named as such; if it was
committed for the church’s behoof, it could be certain of being hallowed
by the church, even if the hallowing was not openly pronounced.  To the
Protestant, majesty ranks as sacred; to the Catholic only that majesty
which is consecrated by the pontiff can rank as such; and it does rank
as such to him only because the pope, even though it be without a
special act, confers this sacredness on it once for all.  If he
retracted his consecration, the king would be left only a “man of the
world or layman,” an “unconsecrated” man, to the Catholic.

If the Protestant seeks to discover a sacredness in the sensual itself,
that he may then be linked only to what is holy, the Catholic strives
rather to banish the sensual from himself into a separate domain, where
it, like the rest of nature, keeps its value for itself.  The Catholic
church eliminated mundane marriage from its consecrated order, and
withdrew those who were its own from the mundane family; the Protestant
church declared marriage and family ties to be holy, and therefore not
unsuitable for its clergymen.

A Jesuit may, as a good Catholic, hallow everything.  He needs only,
_e.g._, to say to himself: “I as a priest am necessary to the church,
but serve it more zealously when I appease my desires properly;
consequently I will seduce this girl, have my enemy there poisoned,
etc.; my end is holy because it is a priest’s, consequently it hallows
the means.” For in the end it is still done for the benefit of the
church.  Why should the Catholic priest shrink from handing Emperor
Henry VII the poisoned wafer for the — church’s welfare?

The genuinely churchly Protestants inveighed against every “innocent
pleasure,” because only the sacred, the spiritual, could be innocent.
What they could not point out the holy spirit in, the Protestants had to
reject — dancing, the theatre, ostentation (_e.g._ in the church), and
the like.

Compared with this puritanical Calvinism, Lutheranism is again more on
the religious, spiritual, track — is more radical.  For the former
excludes at once a great number of things as sensual and worldly, and
_purifies_ the church; Lutheranism, on the contrary, tries to bring
_spirit_ into all things as far as possible, to recognize the holy
spirit as an essence in everything, and so to _hallow_ everything
worldly.  (“No one can forbid a kiss in honor.” The spirit of honor
hallows it.) Hence it was that the Lutheran Hegel (he declares himself
such in some passage or other: he “wants to remain a Lutheran”) was
completely successful in carrying the idea through everything.  In
everything there is reason, _i.e._ holy spirit, or “the real is
rational.” For the real is in fact everything; as in each thing, _e.g._,
each lie, the truth can be detected: there is no absolute lie, no
absolute evil, etc.

Great “works of mind” were created almost solely by Protestants, as they
alone were the true disciples and consummators of _mind_.


	* * *

How little man is able to control!  He must let the sun run its course,
the sea roll its waves, the mountains rise to heaven.  Thus he stands
powerless before the _uncontrollable_.  Can he keep off the impression
that he is helpless against this gigantic world?  It is a fixed _law_ to
which he must submit, it determines his _fate_.  Now, what did
pre-Christian humanity work toward?  Toward getting rid of the
irruptions of the destinies, not letting oneself be vexed by them.  The
Stoics attained this in apathy, declaring the attacks of nature
_indifferent_, and not letting themselves be affected by them.  Horace
utters the famous _Nil admirari_, by which he likewise announces the
indifference of the _other_, the world; it is not to influence us, not
to rouse our astonishment.  And that _impavidum ferient ruinae_
expresses the very same _imperturbability_ as Ps.  46.3: “We do not
fear, though the earth should perish.” In all this there is room made
for the Christian proposition that the world is empty, for the Christian
_contempt of the world_.

The _imperturbable_ spirit of “the wise man,” with which the old world
worked to prepare its end, now underwent an _inner perturbation_ against
which no ataraxia, no Stoic courage, was able to protect it.  The
spirit, secured against all influence of the world, insensible to its
shocks and _exalted_ above its attacks, admiring nothing, not to be
disconcerted by any downfall of the world — foamed over irrepressibly
again, because gases (spirits) were evolved in its own interior, and,
after the _mechanical shock_ that comes from without had become
ineffective, _chemical tensions_, that agitate within, began their
wonderful play.

In fact, ancient history ends with this — that _I_ have struggled till I
won my ownership of the world.  “All things have been delivered to me by
my Father” (Matt.  11.  27).  It has ceased to be overpowering,
unapproachable, sacred, divine, for me; it is _undeified_, and now I
treat it so entirely as I please that, if I cared, I could exert on it
all miracle-working power, _i.  e._, power of mind — remove mountains,
command mulberry trees to tear themselves up and transplant themselves
into the sea (Luke 17.6), and do everything possible, _thinkable_ : “All
things are possible to him who believes.”[31] I am the _lord_ of the
world, mine is the “glory.” [_Herrlichkeit_, which, according to its
derivation, means “lordliness”] The world has become prosaic, for the
divine has vanished from it: it is my property, which I dispose of as I
(to wit, the mind) choose.

When I had exalted myself to be the _owner of the world_, egoism had won
its first complete victory, had vanquished the world, had become
worldless, and put the acquisitions of a long age under lock and key.

The first property, the first “glory,” has been acquired!

But the lord of the world is not yet lord of his thoughts, his feelings,
his will: he is not lord and owner of the spirit, for the spirit is
still sacred, the “Holy Spirit,” and the “worldless” Christian is not
able to become “godless.” If the ancient struggle was a struggle against
the _world_, the medieval (Christian) struggle is a struggle against
self, the mind; the former against the outer world, the latter against
the inner world.  The medieval man is the man “whose gaze is turned
inward,” the thinking, meditative

All wisdom of the ancients is _the science of the world_, all wisdom of
the moderns is _the science of God_.

The heathen (Jews included) got through with the _world_; but now the
thing was to get through with self, the spirit, too; _i.e._ to become
spiritless or godless.

For almost two thousand years we have been working at subjecting the
Holy Spirit to ourselves, and little by little we have torn off and
trodden under foot many bits of sacredness; but the gigantic opponent is
constantly rising anew under a changed form and name.  The spirit has
not yet lost its divinity, its holiness, its sacredness.  To be sure, it
has long ceased to flutter over our heads as a dove; to be sure, it no
longer gladdens its saints alone, but lets itself be caught by the laity
too; but as spirit of humanity, as spirit of Man, it remains still an
_alien_ spirit to me or you, still far from becoming our unrestricted
_property_, which we dispose of at our pleasure.  However, one thing
certainly happened, and visibly guided the progress of post-Christian
history: this one thing was the endeavor to make the Holy Spirit _more
human_, and bring it nearer to men, or men to it.  Through this it came
about that at last it could be conceived as the “spirit of humanity,”
and, under different expressions like “idea of humanity, mankind,
humaneness, general philanthropy,” appeared more attractive, more
familiar, and more accessible.

Would not one think that now everybody could possess the Holy Spirit,
take up into himself the idea of humanity, bring mankind to form and
existence in himself?

No, the spirit is not stripped of its holiness and robbed of its
unapproachableness, is not accessible to us, not our property; for the
spirit of humanity is not _my_ spirit.  My _ideal_ it may be, and as a
thought I call it mine; the _thought_ of humanity is my property, and I
prove this sufficiently by propounding it quite according to my views,
and shaping it today so, tomorrow otherwise; we represent it to
ourselves in the most manifold ways.  But it is at the same time an
entail, which I cannot alienate nor get rid of.

Among many transformations, the Holy Spirit became in time the
_“absolute idea”_, which again in manifold refractions split into the
different ideas of philanthropy, reasonableness, civic virtue, etc.

But can I call the idea my property if it is the idea of humanity, and
can I consider the Spirit as vanquished if I am to serve it, “sacrifice
myself” to it?  Antiquity, at its close, had gained its ownership of the
world only when it had broken the world’s overpoweringness and
“divinity,” recognized the world’s powerlessness and “vanity.”

The case with regard to the _spirit_ corresponds.  When I have degraded
it to a _spook_ and its control over me to a _cranky notion_, then it is
to be looked upon as having lost its sacredness, its holiness, its
divinity, and then I _use_ it, as one uses _nature_ at pleasure without
scruple.

The “nature of the case,” the “concept of the relationship,” is to guide
me in dealing with the case or in contracting the relation.  As if a
concept of the case existed on its own account, and was not rather the
concept that one forms of the case!  As if a relation which we enter
into was not, by the uniqueness of those who enter into it, itself
unique!  As if it depended on how others stamp it!  But, as people
separated the “essence of Man” from the real man, and judged the latter
by the former, so they also separate his action from him, and appraise
it by “human value.” _Concepts_ are to decide everywhere, concepts to
regulate life, concepts to _rule_.  This is the religious world, to
which Hegel gave a systematic expression, bringing method into the
nonsense and completing the conceptual precepts into a rounded,
firmly-based dogmatic.  Everything is sung according to concepts, and
the real man, _i.e._ I, am compelled to live according to these
conceptual laws.  Can there be a more grievous dominion of law, and did
not Christianity confess at the very beginning that it meant only to
draw Judaism’s dominion of law tighter?  (“Not a letter of the law shall
be lost!”)

Liberalism simply brought other concepts on the carpet; human instead of
divine, political instead of ecclesiastical, “scientific” instead of
doctrinal, or, more generally, real concepts and eternal laws instead of
“crude dogmas” and precepts.

Now nothing but _mind_ rules in the world.  An innumerable multitude of
concepts buzz about in people’s heads, and what are those doing who
endeavor to get further?  They are negating these concepts to put new
ones in their place!  They are saying: “You form a false concept of
right, of the State, of man, of liberty, of truth, of marriage, etc.;
the concept of right, etc., is rather that one which we now set up.”
Thus the confusion of concepts moves forward.

The history of the world has dealt cruelly with us, and the spirit has
obtained an almighty power.  You must have regard for my miserable
shoes, which could protect your naked foot, my salt, by which your
potatoes would become palatable, and my state-carriage, whose possession
would relieve you of all need at once; you must not reach out after
them.  Man is to recognize the _independence_ of all these and
innumerable other things: they are to rank in his mind as something that
cannot be seized or approached, are to be kept away from him.  He must
have regard for it, respect it; woe to him if he stretches out his
fingers desirously; we call that “being light-fingered!”

How beggarly little is left us, yes, how really nothing!  Everything has
been removed, we must not venture on anything unless it is given us; we
continue to live only by the _grace_ of the giver.  You must not pick up
a pin, unless indeed you have got _leave_ to do so.  And got it from
whom?  From _respect!_ Only when this lets you have it as property, only
when you can _respect_ it as property, only then may you take it.  And
again, you are not to conceive a thought, speak a syllable, commit an
action, that should have their warrant in you alone, instead of
receiving it from morality or reason or humanity.  Happy _unconstraint_
of the desirous man, how mercilessly people have tried to slay you on
the altar of _constraint!_

But around the altar rise the arches of a church, and its walls keep
moving further and further out.  What they enclose is _sacred_.  You can
no longer get to it, no longer touch it.  Shrieking with the hunger that
devours you, you wander round about these walls in search of the little
that is profane, and the circles of your course keep growing more and
more extended.  Soon that church will embrace the whole world, and you
be driven out to the extreme edge; another step, and the _world of the
sacred_ has conquered: you sink into the abyss.  Therefore take courage
while it is yet time, wander about no longer in the profane where now it
is dry feeding, dare the leap, and rush in through the gates into the
sanctuary itself.  If you _devour the sacred_, you have made it your
_own!_ Digest the sacramental wafer, and you are rid of it!

*** III.  The Free

The ancients and the moderns having been presented above in two
divisions, it may seem as if the free were here to be described in a
third division as independent and distinct.  This is not so.  The free
are only the more modern and most modern among the “moderns,” and are
put in a separate division merely because they belong to the present,
and what is present, above all, claims our attention here.  I give “the
free” only as a translation of “the liberals,” but must with regard to
the concept of freedom (as in general with regard to so many other
things whose anticipatory introduction cannot be avoided) refer to what
comes later.

**** 1.  Political Liberalism

After the chalice of so-called absolute monarchy had been drained down
to the dregs, in the eighteenth century people became aware that their
drink did not taste human — too clearly aware not to begin to crave a
different cup.  Since our fathers were “human beings” after all, they at
last desired also to be regarded as such.

Whoever sees in us something else than human beings, in him we likewise
will not see a human being, but an inhuman being, and will meet him as
an unhuman being; on the other hand, whoever recognizes us as human
beings and protects us against the danger of being treated inhumanly,
him we will honor as our true protector and guardian.

Let us then hold together and protect the man in each other; then we
find the necessary protection in our _holding together_, and in
ourselves, _those who hold together_, a fellowship of those who know
their human dignity and hold together as “human beings.” Our holding
together is the _State_; we who hold together are the _nation_.

In our being together as nation or State we are only human beings.  How
we deport ourselves in other respects as individuals, and what
self-seeking impulses we may there succumb to, belongs solely to our
_private_ life; our public or State life is a _purely human_ one.
Everything un-human or “egoistic” that clings to us is degraded to a
“private matter” and we distinguish the State definitely from “civil
society,” which is the sphere of “egoism’s” activity.

The true man is the nation, but the individual is always an egoist.
Therefore strip off your individuality or isolation wherein dwells
discord and egoistic inequality, and consecrate yourselves wholly to the
true man — the nation or the State.  Then you will rank as men, and have
all that is man’s; the State, the true man, will entitle you to what
belongs to it, and give you the “rights of man”; Man gives you his
rights!

So runs the speech of the commonalty.

The commonalty[32] is nothing else than the thought that the State is
all in all, the true man, and that the individual’s human value consists
in being a citizen of the State.  In being a good citizen he seeks his
highest honor; beyond that he knows nothing higher than at most the
antiquated — “being a good Christian.”

The commonalty developed itself in the struggle against the privileged
classes, by whom it was cavalierly treated as “third estate” and
confounded with the _canaille_.  In other words, up to this time the
State had recognized caste.[_Man hatte im Staate “die ungleiche Person
angesehen,”_ there had been “respect of unequal persons” in the State]
The son of a nobleman was selected for posts to which the most
distinguished commoners aspired in vain.  The civic feeling revolted
against this.  No more distinction, no giving preference to persons, no
difference of classes!  Let all be alike!  No _separate interest_ is to
be pursued longer, but the _general interest of all_.  The State is to
be a fellowship of free and equal men, and every one is to devote
himself to the “welfare of the whole,” to be dissolved in the _State_,
to make the State his end and ideal.  State!  State!  so ran the general
cry, and thenceforth people sought for the “right form of State,” the
best constitution, and so the State in its best conception.  The thought
of the State passed into all hearts and awakened enthusiasm; to serve
it, this mundane god, became the new divine service and worship.  The
properly _political_ epoch had dawned.  To serve the State or the nation
became the highest ideal, the State’s interest the highest interest,
State service (for which one does not by any means need to be an
official) the highest honor.

So then the separate interests and personalities had been scared away,
and sacrifice for the State had become the shibboleth.  One must give up
_himself_, and live only for the State.  One must act “disinterestedly,”
not want to benefit _himself_, but the State.  Hereby the latter has
become the true person.  before whom the individual personality
vanishes; not I live, but it lives in me.  Therefore, in comparison with
the former self-seeking, this was unselfishness and _impersonality_
itself.  Before this god — State — all egoism vanished, and before it
all were equal; they were without any other distinction — men, nothing
but men.

The Revolution took fire from the inflammable material of _property_.
The government needed money.  Now it must prove the proposition that it
_is absolute_, and so master of all property, sole proprietor; it must
_take_ to itself _its_ money, which was only in the possession of the
subjects, not their property.  Instead of this, it calls States-general,
to have this money _granted_ to it.  The shrinking from strictly logical
action destroyed the illusion of an _absolute_ government; he who must
have something “granted” to him cannot be regarded as absolute.  The
subjects recognized that they were _real proprietors_, and that it was
_their_ money that was demanded.  Those who had hitherto been subjects
attained the consciousness that they were _proprietors_.  Bailly depicts
this in a few words: “If you cannot dispose of my property without my
assent, how much less can you of my person, of all that concerns my
mental and social position?  All this is my property, like the piece of
land that I till; and I have a right, an interest, to make the laws
myself.” Bailly’s words sound, certainly, as if _every one_ was a
proprietor now.  However, instead of the government, instead of the
prince, _the — nation_ now became proprietor and master.  From this time
on the ideal is spoken of as — “popular liberty” — “a free people,” etc.

As early as July 8, 1789, the declaration of the bishop of Autun and
Barrere took away all semblance of the importance of each and every
_individual_ in legislation; it showed the complete _powerlessness_ of
the constituents; the _majority of the representatives_ has become
_master_.  When on July 9 the plan for division of the work on the
constitution is proposed, Mirabeau remarks that “the government has only
power, no rights; only in the _people_ is the source of all _right_ to
be found.” On July 16 this same Mirabeau exclaims: “Is not the people
the source of all _power?”_ The source, therefore, of all right, and the
source of all — power![_Gewalt_, a word which is also commonly used like
the English “violence,” denoting especially unlawful violence] By the
way, here the substance of “right” becomes visible; it is — _power_.
“He who has power has right.”

The commonalty is the heir of the privileged classes.  In fact, the
rights of the barons, which were taken from them as “usurpations,” only
passed over to the commonalty.  For the commonalty was now called the
“nation.” “Into the hands of the nation” all _prerogatives_ were given
back.  Thereby they ceased to be “prerogatives”:[_Vorrechte_] they
became “rights.”[_Rechte_] From this time on the nation demands tithes,
compulsory services; it has inherited the lord’s court, the rights of
vert and venison, the — serfs.  The night of August 4 was the
death-night of privileges or “prerogatives” (cities, communes, boards of
magistrates, were also privileged, furnished with prerogatives and
seigniorial rights), and ended with the new morning of “right,” the
“rights of the State,” the “rights of the nation.”

The monarch in the person of the “royal master” had been a paltry
monarch compared with this new monarch, the “sovereign nation.” This
_monarchy_ was a thousand times severer, stricter, and more consistent.
Against the new monarch there was no longer any right, any privilege at
all; how limited the “absolute king” of the _ancien regime_ looks in
comparison!  The Revolution effected the transformation of _limited
monarchy_ into _absolute monarchy_.  From this time on every right that
is not conferred by this monarch is an “assumption”; but every
prerogative that he bestows, a “right.” The times demanded _absolute
royalty_, absolute monarchy; therefore down fell that so-called absolute
royalty which had so little understood how to become absolute that it
remained limited by a thousand little lords.

What was longed for and striven for through thousands of years — to wit,
to find that absolute lord beside whom no other lords and lordlings any
longer exist to clip his power — the _bourgeoisie_ has brought to pass.
It has revealed the Lord who alone confers “rightful titles,” and
without whose warrant _nothing is justified_.  “So now we know that an
idol is nothing in the world, and that there is no other god save the
one.”[33]

Against _right_ one can no longer, as against a right, come forward with
the assertion that it is “a wrong.” One can say now only that it is a
piece of nonsense, an illusion.  If one called it wrong, one would have
to set up _another right_ in opposition to it, and measure it by this.
If, on the contrary, one rejects right as such, right in and of itself,
altogether, then one also rejects the concept of wrong, and dissolves
the whole concept of right (to which the concept of wrong belongs).

What is the meaning of the doctrine that we all enjoy “equality of
political rights”?  Only this — that the State has no regard for my
person, that to it I, like every other, am only a man, without having
another significance that commands its deference.  I do not command its
deference as an aristocrat, a nobleman’s son, or even as heir of an
official whose office belongs to me by inheritance (as in the Middle
Ages countships, etc., and later under absolute royalty, where
hereditary offices occur).  Now the State has an innumerable multitude
of rights to give away, _e.g._ the right to lead a battalion, a company,
etc.; the right to lecture at a university, and so forth; it has them to
give away because they are its own, _i.e._, State rights or “political”
rights.  Withal, it makes no difference to it to whom it gives them, if
the receiver only fulfills the duties that spring from the delegated
rights.  To it we are all of us all right, and — _equal —_ one worth no
more and no less than another.  It is indifferent to me who receives the
command of the army, says the sovereign State, provided the grantee
understands the matter properly.  “Equality of political rights” has,
consequently, the meaning that every one may acquire every right that
the State has to give away, if only he fulfills the conditions annexed
thereto — conditions which are to be sought only in the nature of the
particular right, not in a predilection for the person (_persona
grata_): the nature of the right to become an officer brings with it,
_e.g._ the necessity that one possess sound limbs and a suitable measure
of knowledge, but it does not have noble birth as a condition; if, on
the other hand, even the most deserving commoner could not reach that
station, then an inequality of political rights would exist.  Among the
States of today one has carried out that maxim of equality more, another
less.

The monarchy of estates (so I will call absolute royalty, the time of
the kings before the revolution) kept the individual in dependence on a
lot of little monarchies.  These were fellowships (societies) like the
guilds, the nobility, the priesthood, the burgher class, cities,
communes.  Everywhere the individual must regard himself _first_ as a
member of this little society, and yield unconditional obedience to its
spirit, the _esprit de corps_, as his monarch.  More, _e.g._ than the
individual nobleman himself must his family, the honor of his race, be
to him.  Only by means of his _corporation_, his estate, did the
individual have relation to the greater corporation, the State — as in
Catholicism the individual deals with God only through the priest.  To
this the third estate now, showing courage to negate _itself as an
estate_, made an end.  It decided no longer to be and be called an
_estate_ beside other estates, but to glorify and generalize itself into
the _“nation.”_ Hereby it created a much more complete and absolute
monarchy,’ and the entire previously ruling _principle of estates_, the
principle of little monarchies inside the great, went down.  Therefore
it cannot be said that the Revolution was a revolution against the first
two privileged estates.  It was against the little monarchies of estates
in general.  But, if the estates and their despotism were broken (the
king too, we know, was only a king of estates, not a citizen-king), the
individuals freed from the inequality of estate were left.  Were they
now really to be without estate and “out of gear,” no longer bound by
any estate, without a general bond of union?  No, for the third estate
had declared itself the nation only in order not to remain an estate
_beside_ other estates, but to become the _sole estate_.  This sole
_estate_ is the nation, the _“State.”_ What had the individual now
become?  A political Protestant, for he had come into immediate
connection with his God, the State.  He was no longer, as an aristocrat,
in the monarchy of the nobility; as a mechanic, in the monarchy of the
guild; but he, like all, recognized and acknowledged only — _one lord_,
the State, as whose servants they all received the equal title of honor,
“citizen.”

The _bourgeoisie_ is the aristocracy of DESERT; its motto, “Let desert
wear its crowns.” It fought against the “lazy” aristocracy, for
according to it (the industrious aristocracy acquired by industry and
desert) it is not the “born” who is free, nor yet I who am free either,
but the “deserving” man, the honest _servant_ (of his king; of the
State; of the people in constitutional States).  Through _service_ one
acquires freedom, _i.  e._, acquires “deserts,” even if one served —
mammon.  One must deserve well of the State, _i.e._ of the principle of
the State, of its moral spirit.  He who _serves_ this spirit of the
State is a good citizen, let him live to whatever honest branch of
industry he will.  In its eyes innovators practice a “breadless art.”
Only the “shopkeeper” is “practical,” and the spirit that chases after
public offices is as much the shopkeeping spirit as is that which tries
in trade to feather its nest or otherwise to become useful to itself and
anybody else.

But, if the deserving count as the free (for what does the comfortable
commoner, the faithful office-holder, lack of that freedom that his
heart desires?), then the “servants” are the — free.  The obedient
servant is the free man!  What glaring nonsense!  Yet this is the sense
of the _bourgeoisie_, and its poet, Goethe, as well as its philosopher,
Hegel, succeeded in glorifying the dependence of the subject on the
object, obedience to the objective world.  He who only serves the cause,
“devotes himself entirely to it,” has the true freedom.  And among
thinkers the cause was — _reason_, that which, like State and Church,
gives — general laws, and puts the individual man in irons by the
_thought of humanity_.  It determines what is “true,” according to which
one must then act.  No more “rational” people than the honest servants,
who primarily are called good citizens as servants of the State.

Be rich as Croesus or poor as Job — the State of the commonalty leaves
that to your option; but only have a “good disposition.” This it demands
of you, and counts it its most urgent task to establish this in all.
Therefore it will keep you from “evil promptings,” holding the
“ill-disposed” in check and silencing their inflammatory discourses
under censors’ canceling-marks or press-penalties and behind dungeon
walls, and will, on the other hand, appoint people of “good disposition”
as censors, and in every way have a _moral influence_ exerted on you by
“well-disposed and well-meaning” people.  If it has made you deaf to
evil promptings, then it opens your ears again all the more diligently
to good _promptings_.

With the time of the _bourgeoisie_ begins that of _liberalism_.  People
want to see what is “rational,” “suited to the times,” etc., established
everywhere.  The following definition of liberalism, which is supposed
to be pronounced in its honor, characterizes it completely: “Liberalism
is nothing else than the knowledge of reason, applied to our existing
relations.”[34] Its aim is a “rational order,” a “moral behavior,” a
“limited freedom,” not anarchy, lawlessness, selfhood.  But, if reason
rules, then the _person_ succumbs.  Art has for a long time not only
acknowledged the ugly, but considered the ugly as necessary to its
existence, and takes it up into itself; it needs the villain.  In the
religious domain, too, the extremest liberals go so far that they want
to see the most religious man regarded as a citizen — _i.  e._, the
religious villain; they want to see no more of trials for heresy.  But
against the “rational law” no one is to rebel, otherwise he is
threatened with the severest penalty.  What is wanted is not free
movement and realization of the person or of me, but of reason — _i.e._
a dominion of reason, a dominion.  The liberals are _zealots_, not
exactly for the faith, for God, but certainly for _reason_, their
master.  They brook no lack of breeding, and therefore no
self-development and self- determination; they _play the guardian_ as
effectively as the most absolute rulers.

“Political liberty,” what are we to understand by that?  Perhaps the
individual’s independence of the State and its laws?  No; on the
contrary, the individual’s _subjection_ in the State and to the State’s
laws.  But why “liberty”?  Because one is no longer separated from the
State by intermediaries, but stands in direct and immediate relation to
it; because one is a — citizen, not the subject of another, not even of
the king as a person, but only in his quality as “supreme head of the
State.” Political liberty, this fundamental doctrine of liberalism, is
nothing but a second phase of — Protestantism, and runs quite parallel
with “religious liberty.”[35] Or would it perhaps be right to understand
by the latter an independence of religion?  Anything but that.
Independence of intermediaries is all that it is intended to express,
independence of mediating priests, the abolition of the “laity,” and so,
direct and immediate relation to religion or to God.  Only on the
supposition that one has religion can he enjoy freedom of religion;
freedom of religion does not mean being without religion, but inwardness
of faith, unmediated intercourse with God.  To him who is “religiously
free” religion is an affair of the heart, it is to him his _own affair_,
it is to him a “sacredly serious matter.” So, too, to the “politically
free” man the State is a sacredly serious matter; it is his heart’s
affair, his chief affair, his own affair.

Political liberty means that the _polis_, the State, is free; freedom of
religion that religion is free, as freedom of conscience signifies that
conscience is free; not, therefore, that I am free from the State, from
religion, from conscience, or that I am _rid_ of them.  It does not mean
_my_ liberty, but the liberty of a power that rules and subjugates me;
it means that one of my _despots_, like State, religion, conscience, is
free.  State, religion, conscience, these despots, make me a slave, and
_their_ liberty is my slavery.  That in this they necessarily follow the
principle, “the end hallows the means,” is self-evident.  If the welfare
of the State is the end, war is a hallowed means; if justice is the
State’s end, homicide is a hallowed means, and is called by its sacred
name, “execution”; the sacred State _hallows_ everything that is
serviceable to it.

“Individual liberty,” over which civic liberalism keeps jealous watch,
does not by any means signify a completely free self-determination, by
which actions become altogether _mine_, but only independence of
_persons_.  Individually free is he who is responsible to no _man_.
Taken in this sense — and we are not allowed to understand it otherwise
— not only the ruler is individually free, _i.e._, _irresponsible_
toward men (“before God,” we know, he acknowledges himself responsible),
but all who are “responsible only to the law.” This kind of liberty was
won through the revolutionary movement of the century — to wit,
independence of arbitrary will, or _tel est notre plaisir_.  Hence the
constitutional prince must himself be stripped of all personality,
deprived of all individual decision, that he may not as a person, as an
_individual man_, violate the “individual liberty” of others.  The
_personal will of the ruler_ has disappeared in the constitutional
prince; it is with a right feeling, therefore, that absolute princes
resist this.  Nevertheless these very ones profess to be in the best
sense “Christian princes.” For this, however, they must become a _purely
spiritual_ power, as the Christian is subject only to _spirit_ (“God is
spirit”).  The purely spiritual power is consistently represented only
by the constitutional prince, he who, without any personal significance,
stands there spiritualized to the degree that he can rank as a sheer,
uncanny “spirit,” as an _idea_.  The constitutional king is the truly
_Christian_ king, the genuine, consistent carrying-out of the Christian
principle.  In the constitutional monarchy individual dominion — _i.e._
a real ruler that _wills_ — has found its end; here, therefore,
_individual liberty_ prevails, independence of every individual
dictator, of everyone who could dictate to me with a _tel est notre
plaisir_.  It is the completed _Christian_ State-life, a spiritualized
life.

The behavior of the commonalty is _liberal_ through and through.  Every
_personal_ invasion of another’s sphere revolts the civic sense; if the
citizen sees that one is dependent on the humor, the pleasure, the will
of a man as individual (_i.e._ as not as authorized by a “higher
power”), at once he brings his liberalism to the front and shrieks about
“arbitrariness.” In fine, the citizen asserts his freedom from what is
called _orders_ (_ordonnance_)_: “No one has any business to give me —
orders!” Orders_ carries the idea that what I am to do is another man’s
will, while law does not express a personal authority of another.  The
liberty of the commonalty is liberty or independence from the will of
another person, so-called personal or individual liberty; for being
personally free means being only so free that no other person can
dispose of mine, or that what I may or may not do does not depend on the
personal decree of another.  The liberty of the press, _e.g._, is such a
liberty of liberalism, liberalism fighting only against the coercion of
the censorship as that of personal wilfulness, but otherwise showing
itself extremely inclined and willing to tyrannize over the press by
“press laws”; _i.e._ the civic liberals want liberty of writing _for
themselves_; for, as they are _law-abiding_, their writings will not
bring them under the law.  Only liberal matter, _i.e._ only lawful
matter, is to be allowed to be printed; otherwise the “press laws”
threaten “press-penalties.” If one sees personal liberty assured, one
does not notice at all how, if a new issue happens to arise, the most
glaring unfreedom becomes dominant.  For one is rid of _orders_ indeed,
and “no one has any business to give us orders,” but one has become so
much the more submissive to the — _law_.  One is enthralled now in due
legal form.

In the citizen-State there are only “free people,” who are _compelled_
to thousands of things (_e.g._ to deference, to a confession of faith,
etc.).  But what does that amount to?  Why, it is only the — State, the
law, not any man, that compels them!

What does the commonalty mean by inveighing against every personal
order, _i.e._ every order not founded on the “cause,” on “reason”?  It
is simply fighting in the interest of the “cause”[_Sache_, which
commonly means _thing_].  against the dominion of “persons”!  But the
mind’s cause is the rational, good, lawful, etc.; that is the “good
cause.” The commonalty wants an _impersonal_ ruler.

Furthermore, if the principle is this, that only the cause is to rule
man — to wit, the cause of morality, the cause of legality, etc., then
no personal balking of one by the other may be authorized either (as
formerly, _e.g._ the commoner was balked of the aristocratic offices,
the aristocrat of common mechanical trades, etc.); _free competition_
must exist.  Only through the thing[_Sache_] can one balk another
(_e.g._ the rich man balking the impecunious man by money, a thing), not
as a person.  Henceforth only one lordship, the lordship of the _State_,
is admitted; personally no one is any longer lord of another.  Even at
birth the children belong to the State, and to the parents only in the
name of the State, which _e.g._ does not allow infanticide, demands
their baptism etc.

But all the State’s children, furthermore, are of quite equal account in
its eyes (“civic or political equality”), and they may see to it
themselves how they get along with each other; they may _compete_.

Free competition means nothing else than that every one can present
himself, assert himself, fight, against another.  Of course the feudal
party set itself against this, as its existence depended on an absence
of competition.  The contests in the time of the Restoration in France
had no other substance than this — that the _bourgeoisie_ was struggling
for free competition, and the feudalists were seeking to bring back the
guild system.

Now, free competition has won, and against the guild system it had to
win.  (See below for the further discussion.)

If the Revolution ended in a reaction, this only showed what the
Revolution _really was_.  For every effort arrives at reaction when it
_comes to discreet reflection_, and storms forward in the original
action only so long as it is an _intoxication_, an “indiscretion.”
“Discretion” will always be the cue of the reaction, because discretion
sets limits, and liberates what was really wanted, _i.  e._, the
principle, from the initial “unbridledness” and “unrestrainedness.” Wild
young fellows, bumptious students, who set aside all considerations, are
_really_ Philistines, since with them, as with the latter,
considerations form the substance of their conduct; only that as
swaggerers they are mutinous against considerations and in negative
relations to them, but as Philistines, later, they give themselves up to
considerations and have positive relations to them.  In both cases all
their doing and thinking turns upon “considerations,” but the Philistine
is _reactionary_ in relation to the student; he is the wild fellow come
to discreet reflection, as the latter is the unreflecting Philistine.
Daily experience confirms the truth of this transformation, and shows
how the swaggerers turn to Philistines in turning gray.

So, too, the so-called reaction in Germany gives proof that it was only
the _discreet_ continuation of the warlike jubilation of liberty.

The Revolution was not directed against _the established_, but against
the _establishment in question_, against a _particular_ establishment.
It did away with _this_ ruler, not with _the_ ruler — on the contrary,
the French were ruled most inexorably; it killed the old vicious rulers,
but wanted to confer on the virtuous ones a securely established
position, _i.  e._, it simply set virtue in the place of vice.  (Vice
and virtue, again, are on their part distinguished from each other only
as a wild young fellow from a Philistine.) Etc.

To this day the revolutionary principle has gone no farther than to
assail only _one or another_ particular establishment, _i.e._ be
_reformatory_.  Much as may be _improved_, strongly as “discreet
progress” may be adhered to, always there is only a _new master_ set in
the old one’s place, and the overturning is a — building up.  We are
still at the distinction of the young Philistine from the old one.  The
Revolution began in _bourgeois_ fashion with the uprising of the third
estate, the middle class; in _bourgeois_ fashion it dries away.  It was
not the _individual man —_ and he alone is _Man —_ that became free, but
the _citizen_, the _citoyen_, the _political_ man, who for that very
reason is not _Man_ but a specimen of the human species, and more
particularly a specimen of the species Citizen, a _free citizen_.

In the Revolution it was not the _individual_ who acted so as to affect
the world’s history, but a _people_; the _nation_, the sovereign nation,
wanted to effect everything.  A fancied _I_, an idea, _e.g._ the nation
is, appears acting; the individuals contribute themselves as tools of
this idea, and act as “citizens.”

The commonalty has its power, and at the same time its limits, in the
_fundamental law of the State_, in a charter, in a legitimate [or
“righteous.” German _rechtlich_] or “just” [_gerecht_] prince who
himself is guided, and rules, according to “rational laws,” in short, in
_legality_.  The period of the _bourgeoisie_ is ruled by the British
spirit of legality.  An assembly of provincial estates, _e.g._ is ever
recalling that its authorization goes only so and so far, and that it is
called at all only through favor and can be thrown out again through
disfavor.  It is always reminding itself of its — _vocation_.  It is
certainly not to be denied that my father begot me; but, now that I am
once begotten, surely his purposes in begetting do not concern me a bit
and, whatever he may have _called_ me to, I do what I myself will.
Therefore even a called assembly of estates, the French assembly in the
beginning of the Revolution, recognized quite rightly that it was
independent of the caller.  It _existed_, and would have been stupid if
it did not avail itself of the right of existence, but fancied itself
dependent as on a father.  The called one no longer has to ask “what did
the caller want when he created me?” but “what do I want after I have
once followed the call?” Not the caller, not the constituents, not the
charter according to which their meeting was called out, nothing will be
to him a sacred, inviolable power.  He is _authorized_ for everything
that is in his power; he will know no restrictive “authorization,” will
not want to be _loyal_.  This, if any such thing could be expected from
chambers at all, would give a completely _egoistic_ chamber, severed
from all navel-string and without consideration.  But chambers are
always devout, and therefore one cannot be surprised if so much half-way
or undecided, _i.  e._, hypocritical, “egoism” parades in them.

The members of the estates are to remain within the _limits_ that are
traced for them by the charter, by the king’s will, etc.  If they will
not or can not do that, then they are to “step out.” What dutiful man
could act otherwise, could put himself, his conviction, and his will as
the _first_ thing?  Who could be so immoral as to want to assert
_himself_, even if the body corporate and everything should go to ruin
over it?  People keep carefully within the limits of their
_authorization_; of course one must remain within the limits of his
_power_ anyhow, because no one can do more than he can.  “My power, or,
if it be so, powerlessness, be my sole limit, but authorizations only
restraining — precepts?  Should I profess this all-subversive view?  No,
I am a — law-abiding citizen!”

The commonalty professes a morality which is most closely connected with
its essence.  The first demand of this morality is to the effect that
one should carry on a solid business, an honourable trade, lead a moral
life.  Immoral, to it, is the sharper, the, demirep, the thief, robber,
and murderer, the gamester, the penniless man without a situation, the
frivolous man.  The doughty commoner designates the feeling against
these “immoral” people as his “deepest indignation.”

All these lack settlement, the _solid_ quality of business, a solid,
seemly life, a fixed income, etc.; in short, they belong, because their
existence does not rest on a _secure basis_ to the dangerous
“individuals or isolated persons,” to the dangerous _proletariat_; they
are “individual bawlers” who offer no “guarantee” and have “nothing to
lose,” and so nothing to risk.  The forming of family ties, _e.g._,
_binds_ a man: he who is bound furnishes security, can be taken hold of;
not so the street-walker.  The gamester stakes everything on the game,
ruins himself and others — no guarantee.  All who appear to the commoner
suspicious, hostile, and dangerous might be comprised under the name
“vagabonds”; every vagabondish way of living displeases him.  For there
are intellectual vagabonds too, to whom the hereditary dwelling-place of
their fathers seems too cramped and oppressive for them to be willing to
satisfy themselves with the limited space any more: instead of keeping
within the limits of a temperate style of thinking, and taking as
inviolable truth what furnishes comfort and tranquillity to thousands,
they overlap all bounds of the traditional and run wild with their
impudent criticism and untamed mania for doubt, these extravagating
vagabonds.  They form the class of the unstable, restless, changeable,
_i.e._ of the _prolétariat_, and, if they give voice to their unsettled
nature, are called “unruly fellows.”

Such a broad sense has the so-called _proletariat_, or pauperism.  How
much one would err if one believed the commonalty to be desirous of
doing away with poverty (pauperism) to the best of its ability!  On the
contrary, the good citizen helps himself with the incomparably
comforting conviction that “the fact is that the good things of fortune
are unequally divided and will always remain so — according to God’s
wise decree.” The poverty which surrounds him in every alley does not
disturb the true commoner further than that at most he clears his
account with it by throwing an alms, or finds work and food for an
“honest and serviceable” fellow.  But so much the more does he feel his
quiet enjoyment clouded by _innovating_ and _discontented_ poverty, by
those poor who no longer behave quietly and endure, but begin to _run
wild_ and become restless.  Lock up the vagabond, thrust the breeder of
unrest into the darkest dungeon!  He wants to “arouse dissatisfaction
and incite people against existing institutions” in the State — stone
him, stone him!

But from these identical discontented ones comes a reasoning somewhat as
follows: It need not make any difference to the “good citizens” who
protects them and their principles, whether an absolute king or a
constitutional one, a republic, if only they are protected.  And what is
their principle, whose protector they always “love”?  Not that of labor;
not that of birth either.  But, that of _mediocrity_, of the golden
mean: a little birth and a little labor, _i.  e._, an _interest-bearing
possession_.  Possession is here the fixed, the given, inherited
(birth); interest-drawing is the exertion about it (labor); _laboring
capital_, therefore.  Only no immoderation, no ultra, no radicalism!
Right of birth certainly, but only hereditary possessions; labor
certainly, yet little or none at all of one’s own, but labor of capital
and of the — subject laborers.

If an age is imbued with an error, some always derive advantage from the
error, while the rest have to suffer from it.  In the Middle Ages the
error was general among Christians that the church must have all power,
or the supreme lordship on earth; the hierarchs believed in this “truth”
not less than the laymen, and both were spellbound in the like error.
But by it the hierarchs had the _advantage_ of power, the laymen had to
_suffer_ subjection.  However, as the saying goes, “one learns wisdom by
suffering”; and so the laymen at last learned wisdom and no longer
believed in the medieval “truth.” — A like relation exists between the
commonalty and the laboring class.  Commoner and laborer believe in the
“truth” of _money_; they who do not possess it believe in it no less
than those who possess it: the laymen, therefore, as well as the
priests.

“Money governs the world” is the keynote of the civic epoch.  A
destitute aristocrat and a destitute laborer, as “starvelings,” amount
to nothing so far as political consideration is concerned; birth and
labor do not do it, but _money_ brings _consideration_ [_das Geld gibt
Geltung_].  The possessors rule, but the State trains up from the
destitute its “servants,” to whom, in proportion as they are to rule
(govern) in its name, it gives money (a salary).

I receive everything from the State.  Have I anything without the
_State’s assent?_ What I have without this it _takes_ from me as soon as
it discovers the lack of a “legal title.” Do I not, therefore, have
everything through its grace, its assent?

On this alone, on the _legal title_, the commonalty rests.  The commoner
is what he is through the _protection of the State_, through the State’s
grace.  He would necessarily be afraid of losing everything if the
State’s power were broken.

But how is it with him who has nothing to lose, how with the
proletarian?  As he has nothing to lose, he does not need the protection
of the State for his “nothing.” He may gain, on the contrary, if that
protection of the State is withdrawn from the _protégé_.

Therefore the non-possessor will regard the State as a power protecting
the possessor, which privileges the latter, but does nothing for him,
the non-possessor, but to — suck his blood.  The State is _a —
commoners’ State_, is the estate of the commonalty.  It protects man not
according to his labor, but according to his tractableness (“loyalty”) —
to wit, according to whether the rights entrusted to him by the State
are enjoyed and managed in accordance with the will, _i.  e._, laws, of
the State.

Under the _regime_ of the commonalty the laborers always fall into the
hands of the possessors, of those who have at their disposal some bit of
the State domains (and everything possessible in State domain, belongs
to the State, and is only a fief of the individual), especially money
and land; of the capitalists, therefore.  The laborer cannot _realize_
on his labor to the extent of the value that it has for the consumer.
“Labor is badly paid!” The capitalist has the greatest profit from it.
— Well paid, and more than well paid, are only the labors of those who
heighten the splendor and _dominion_ of the State, the labors of high
State _servants_.  The State pays well that its “good citizens,” the
possessors, may be able to pay badly without danger; it secures to
itself by good payment its servants, out of whom it forms a protecting
power, a “police” (to the police belong soldiers, officials of all
kinds, _e.g._ those of justice, education, etc.  — in short, the whole
“machinery of the State”) for the “good citizens,” and the “good
citizens” gladly pay high tax-rates to it in order to pay so much lower
rates to their laborers.

But the class of laborers, because unprotected in what they essentially
are (for they do not enjoy the protection of the State as laborers, but
as its subjects they have a share in the enjoyment of the police, a
so-called protection of the law), remains a power hostile to this State,
this State of possessors, this “citizen kingship.” Its principle, labor,
is not recognized as to its _value_; it is exploited,[_ausgebeutet_] a
spoil [_Kriegsbeute_] of the possessors, the enemy.

The laborers have the most enormous power in their hands, and, if they
once became thoroughly conscious of it and used it, nothing would
withstand them; they would only have to stop labor, regard the product
of labor as theirs, and enjoy it.  This is the sense of the labor
disturbances which show themselves here and there.

The State rests on the — _slavery of labor_.  If _labor_ becomes _free_.
the State is lost.

**** 2.  Social Liberalism

We are freeborn men, and wherever we look we see ourselves made servants
of egoists!  Are we therefore to become egoists too!  Heaven forbid!  We
want rather to make egoists impossible!  We want to make them all
“ragamuffins”; all of us must have nothing, that “all may have.”

So say the Socialists.

Who is this person that you call “All”?  — It is “society”!  — But is it
corporeal, then?  — _We_ are its body!  — You?  Why, you are not a body
yourselves — you, sir, are corporeal to be sure, you too, and you, but
you all together are only bodies, not a body.  Accordingly the united
society may indeed have bodies at its service, but no one body of its
own.  Like the “nation of the politicians, it will turn out to be
nothing but a “spirit,” its body only semblance.

The freedom of man is, in political liberalism, freedom from _persons_,
from personal dominion, from the _master_; the securing of each
individual person against other persons, personal freedom.

No one has any orders to give; the law alone gives orders.

But, even if the persons have become _equal_, yet their _possessions_
have not.  And yet the poor man _needs the rich_, the rich the poor, the
former the rich man’s money, the latter the poor man’s labor.  So no one
needs another as a _person_, but needs him as a _giver_, and thus as one
who has something to give, as holder or possessor.  So what he _has_
makes the _man_.  And in _having_, or in “possessions,” people are
unequal.

Consequently, social liberalism concludes, _no one must have_, as
according to political liberalism _no one was to give orders_; _i.e._ as
in that case the _State_ alone obtained the command, so now _society_
alone obtains the possessions.

For the State, protecting each one’s person and property against the
other, _separates_ them from one another; each one _is_ his special part
and has his special part.  He who is satisfied with what he is and has
finds this state of things profitable; but he who would like to be and
have more looks around for this “more,” and finds it in the power of
other _persons_.  Here he comes upon a contradiction; as a person no one
is inferior to another, and yet one person _has_ what another has not
but would like to have.  So, he concludes, the one person is more than
the other, after all, for the former has what he needs, the latter has
not; the former is a rich man, the latter a poor man.

He now asks himself further, are we to let what we rightly buried come
to life again?  Are we to let this circuitously restored inequality of
persons pass?  No; on the contrary, we must bring quite to an end what
was only half accomplished.  Our freedom from another’s person still
lacks the freedom from what the other’s person can command, from what he
has in his personal power — in short, from “personal property.” Let us
then do away with _personal property_.  Let no one have anything any
longer, let every one be a — ragamuffin.  Let property be _impersonal_,
let it belong to — _society_.

Before the supreme _ruler_, the sole _commander_, we had all become
equal, equal persons, _i.  e._, nullities.

Before the supreme _proprietor_ we all become equal — ragamuffins.  For
the present, one is still in another’s estimation a “ragamuffin,” a
“have-nothing”; but then this estimation ceases.  We are all ragamuffins
together, and as the aggregate of Communistic society we might call
ourselves a “ragamuffin crew.”

When the proletarian shall really have founded his purposed “society” in
which the interval between rich and poor is to be removed, then he _will
be_ a ragamuffin, for then he will feel that it amounts to something to
be a ragamuffin, and might lift “Ragamuffin” to be an honourable form of
address, just as the Revolution did with the word “Citizen.” Ragamuffin
is his ideal; we are all to become ragamuffins.

This is the second robbery of the “personal” in the interest of
“humanity.” Neither command nor property is left to the individual; the
State took the former, society the latter.

Because in society the most oppressive evils make themselves felt,
therefore the oppressed especially, and consequently the members of the
lower regions of society, think they found the fault in society, and
make it their task to discover the _right society_.  This is only the
old phenomenon — that one looks for the fault first in everything but
_himself_, and consequently in the State, in the self-seeking of the
rich, etc., which yet have precisely our fault to thank for their
existence.

The reflections and conclusions of Communism look very simple.  As
matters lie at this time — in the present situation with regard to the
State, therefore — some, and they the majority, are at a disadvantage
compared to others, the minority.  In this _state_ of things the former
are in a _state of prosperity_, the latter in _state of need_.  Hence
the present _state_ of things, _i.e._ the State itself, must be done
away with.  And what in its place?  Instead of the isolated state of
prosperity — a _general state of prosperity_, a _prosperity of all_.

Through the Revolution the _bourgeoisie_ became omnipotent, and all
inequality was abolished by every one’s being raised or degraded to the
dignity of a _citizen_ : the common man — raised, the aristocrat —
degraded; the _third_ estate became sole estate, _viz._, namely, the
estate of — _citizens of the State_.  Now Communism responds: Our
dignity and our essence consist not in our being all — the _equal
children_ of our mother, the State, all born with equal claim to her
love and her protection, but in our all existing _for each other_.  This
is our equality, or herein we are _equal_, in that we, I as well as you
and you and all of you, are active or “labor” each one for the rest; in
that each of us is a _laborer_, then.  The point for us is not what we
are _for the State_ (citizens), not our _citizenship_ therefore, but
what we are _for each other_, that each of us exists only through the
other, who, caring for my wants, at the same time sees his own satisfied
by me.  He labors _e.g._ for my clothing (tailor), I for his need of
amusement (comedy-writer, rope-dancer), he for my food (farmer), I for
his instruction (scientist).  It is _labor_ that constitutes our dignity
and our — equality.

What advantage does citizenship bring us?  Burdens!  And how high is our
labor appraised?  As low as possible!  But labor is our sole value all
the same: that we are _laborers_ is the best thing about us, this is our
significance in the world, and therefore it must be our consideration
too and must come to receive _consideration_.  What can you meet us
with?  Surely nothing but — _labor_ too.  Only for labor or services do
we owe you a recompense, not for your bare existence; not for what you
are _for yourselves_ either, but only for what you are _for us_.  By
what have you claims on us?  Perhaps by your high birth?  No, only by
what you do for us that is desirable or useful.  Be it thus then: we are
willing to be worth to you only so much as we do for you; but you are to
be held likewise by us.  _Services_ determine value, — _i.e._ those
services that are worth something to us, and consequently _labors for
each other, labors for the common good_.  Let each one be in the other’s
eyes a _laborer_.  He who accomplishes something useful is inferior to
none, or — all laborers (laborers, of course, in the sense of laborers
“for the common good,” _i.  e._, communistic laborers) are equal.  But,
as the laborer is worth his wages,[36] let the wages too be equal.

As long as faith sufficed for man’s honor and dignity, no labor, however
harassing, could be objected to if it only did not hinder a man in his
faith.  Now, on the contrary, when every one is to cultivate himself
into man, condemning a man to _machine-like labor_ amounts to the same
thing as slavery.  If a factory worker must tire himself to death twelve
hours and more, he is cut off from becoming man.  Every labor is to have
the intent that the man be satisfied.  Therefore he must become a
_master_ in it too, _i.e._ be able to perform it as a totality.  He who
in a pin factory only puts on the heads, only draws the wire, works, as
it were, mechanically, like a machine; he remains half-trained, does not
become a master: his labor cannot _satisfy_ him, it can only _fatigue_
him.  His labor is nothing by itself, has no object _in itself_, is
nothing complete in itself; he labors only into another’s hands, and is
_used_ (exploited) by this other.  For this laborer in another’s service
there is no _enjoyment of a cultivated mind_, at most, crude amusements:
_culture_, you see, is barred against him.  To be a good Christian one
needs only to _believe_, and that can be done under the most oppressive
circumstances.  Hence the Christian-minded take care only of the
oppressed laborers’ piety, their patience, submission, etc.  Only so
long as the downtrodden classes were _Christians_ could they bear all
their misery: for Christianity does not let their murmurings and
exasperation rise.  Now the _hushing_ of desires is no longer enough,
but their _sating_ is demanded.  The _bourgeoisie_ has proclaimed the
gospel of the _enjoyment of the world_, of material enjoyment, and now
wonders that this doctrine finds adherents among us poor: it has shown
that not faith and poverty, but culture and possessions, make a man
blessed; we proletarians understand that too.

The commonalty freed us from the orders and arbitrariness of
individuals.  But that arbitrariness was left which springs from the
conjuncture of situations, and may be called the fortuity of
circumstances; favoring _.fortune_.  and those “favored by fortune,”
still remain.

When, _e.g._, a branch of industry is ruined and thousands of laborers
become breadless, people think reasonably enough to acknowledge that it
is not the individual who must bear the blame, but that “the evil lies
in the situation.” Let us change the situation then, but let us change
it thoroughly, and so that its fortuity becomes powerless and _a law!_
Let us no longer be slaves of chance!  Let us create a new order that
makes an end of _fluctuations_.  Let this order then be sacred!

Formerly one had to suit the _lords_ to come to anything; after the
Revolution the word was “Grasp _fortune!”_ Luck-hunting or
hazard-playing, civil life was absorbed in this.  Then, alongside this,
the demand that he who has obtained something shall not frivolously
stake it again.

Strange and yet supremely natural contradiction.  Competition, in which
alone civil or political life unrolls itself, is a game of luck through
and through, from the speculations of the exchange down to the
solicitation of offices, the hunt for customers, looking for work,
aspiring to promotion and decorations, the second-hand dealer’s petty
haggling, etc.  If one succeeds in supplanting and outbidding his
rivals, then the “lucky throw” is made; for it must be taken as a piece
of luck to begin with that the victor sees himself equipped with an
ability (even though it has been developed by the most careful industry)
against which the others do not know how to rise, consequently that — no
abler ones are found.  And now those who ply their daily lives in the
midst of these changes of fortune without seeing any harm in it are
seized with the most virtuous indignation when their own principle
appears in naked form and “breeds misfortune” as — _hazard-playing_.
Hazard-playing, you see, is too clear, too barefaced a competition, and,
like every decided nakedness, offends honourable modesty.

The Socialists want to put a stop to this activity of chance, and to
form a society in which men are no longer dependent on _fortune_, but
free.

In the most natural way in the world this endeavor first utters itself
as hatred of the “unfortunate” against the “fortunate,” _i.e._, of those
for whom fortune has done little or nothing, against those for whom it
has done everything.  But properly the ill- feeling is not directed
against the fortunate, but against _fortune_, this rotten spot of the
commonalty.

As the Communists first declare free activity to be man’s essence, they,
like all work-day dispositions, need a Sunday; like all material
endeavors, they need a God, an uplifting and edification alongside their
witless “labor.”

That the Communist sees in you the man, the brother, is only the Sunday
side of Communism.  According to the work-day side he does not by any
means take you as man simply, but as human laborer or laboring man.  The
first view has in it the liberal principle; in the second, illiberality
is concealed.  If you were a “lazy-bones,” he would not indeed fail to
recognize the man in you, but would endeavor to cleanse him as a “lazy
man” from laziness and to convert you to the _faith_ that labor is man’s
“destiny and calling.”

Therefore he shows a double face: with the one he takes heed that the
spiritual man be satisfied, with the other he looks about him for means
for the material or corporeal man.  He gives man a twofold _post_ — an
office of material acquisition and one of spiritual.

The commonalty had _thrown open_ spiritual and material goods, and left
it with each one to reach out for them if he liked.

Communism really procures them for each one, presses them upon him, and
compels him to acquire them.  It takes seriously the idea that, because
only spiritual and material goods make us men, we must unquestionably
acquire these goods in order to be man.  The commonalty made acquisition
free; Communism _compels_ to acquisition, and recognizes only the
acquirer, him who practices a trade.  It is not enough that the trade is
free, but you must _take it up_.

So all that is left for criticism to do is to prove that the acquisition
of these goods does not yet by any means make us men.

With the liberal commandment that every one is to make a man of himself,
or every one to make himself man, there was posited the necessity that
every one must gain time for this labor of humanization, _i.  e._, that
it should become possible for every one to labor on _himself_.

The commonalty thought it had brought this about if it handed over
everything human to competition, but gave the individual a right to
every human thing.  “Each may strive after everything!”

Social liberalism finds that _the_ matter is not settled with the “may,”
because may means only “it is forbidden to none” but not “it is made
possible to every one.” Hence it affirms that the commonalty is liberal
only with the mouth and in words, supremely illiberal in act.  It on its
part wants to give all of us the _means_ to be able to labor on
ourselves.

By the principle of labor that of fortune or competition is certainly
outdone.  But at the same time the laborer, in his consciousness that
the essential thing in him is “the laborer,” holds himself aloof from
egoism and subjects himself to the supremacy of a society of laborers,
as the commoner clung with self-abandonment to the competition-State.
The beautiful dream of a “social duty” still continues to be dreamed.
People think again that society _gives_ what we need, and we are _under
obligations_ to it on that account, owe it everything.[37] They are
still at the point of wanting to _serve_ a “supreme giver of all good.”
That society is no ego at all, which could give, bestow, or grant, but
an instrument or means, from which we may derive benefit; that we have
no social duties, but solely interests for the pursuance of which
society must serve us; that we owe society no sacrifice, but, if we
sacrifice anything, sacrifice it to ourselves — of this the Socialists
do not think, because they — as liberals — are imprisoned in the
religious principle, and zealously aspire after — a sacred society,
_e.g._ the State was hitherto.

Society, from which we have everything, is a new master, a new spook, a
new “supreme being,” which “takes us into its service and allegiance!”

The more precise appreciation of political as well as social liberalism
must wait to find its place further on.  For the present we pass this
over, in order first to summon them before the tribunal of humane or
critical liberalism.

**** 3.  Humane Liberalism

As liberalism is completed in self-criticizing, “critical”[38]
liberalism — in which the critic remains a liberal and does not go
beyond the principle of liberalism, Man — this may distinctively be
named after Man and called the “humane.”

The laborer is counted as the most material and egoistical man.  He does
nothing at all _for humanity_, does everything for _himself_, for his
welfare.

The commonalty, because it proclaimed the freedom of _Man_ only as to
his birth, had to leave him in the claws of the un-human man (the
egoist) for the rest of life.  Hence under the regime of political
liberalism egoism has an immense field for free utilization.

The laborer will _utilize_ society for his _egoistic_ ends as the
commoner does the State.  You have only an egoistic end after all, your
welfare, is the humane liberal’s reproach to the Socialist; take up a
_purely human interest_, then I will be your companion.  “But to this
there belongs a consciousness stronger, more comprehensive, than a
_laborer-consciousness”_.  “The laborer makes nothing, therefore he has
nothing; but he makes nothing because his labor is always a labor that
remains individual, calculated strictly for his own want, a labor day by
day.”[39] In opposition to this one might, _e.g._, consider the fact
that Gutenberg’s labor did not remain individual, but begot innumerable
children, and still lives today; it was calculated for the want of
humanity, and was an eternal, imperishable labor.

The humane consciousness despises the commoner-consciousness as well as
the laborer-consciousness: for the commoner is “indignant” only at
vagabonds (at all who have “no definite occupation”) and their
“immorality”; the laborer is “disgusted” by the idler (“lazy-bones”) and
his “immoral,” because parasitic and unsocial, principles.  To this the
humane liberal retorts: The unsettledness of many is only your product,
Philistine!  But that you, proletarian, demand the _grind_ of all, and
want to make _drudgery_ general, is a part, still clinging to you, of
your pack-mule life up to this time.  Certainly you want to lighten
drudgery itself by _all_ having to drudge equally hard, yet only for
this reason, that all may gain _leisure_ to an equal extent.  But what
are they to do with their leisure?  What does your “society” do, that
this leisure may be passed _humanly?_ It must leave the gained leisure
to egoistic preference again, and the very _gain_ that your society
furthers falls to the egoist, as the gain of the commonalty, the
_masterlessness of man_, could not be filled with a human element by the
State, and therefore was left to arbitrary choice.

It is assuredly necessary that man be masterless: but therefore the
egoist is not to become master over man again either, but man over the
egoist.  Man must assuredly find leisure: but, if the egoist makes use
of it, it will be lost for man; therefore you ought to have given
leisure a human significance.  But you laborers undertake even your
labor from an egoistic impulse, because you want to eat, drink, live;
how should you be less egoists in leisure?  You labor only because
having your time to yourselves (idling) goes well after work done, and
what you are to while away your leisure time with is left to _chance_.

But, if every door is to be bolted against egoism, it would be necessary
to strive after completely “disinterested” action, _total_
disinterestedness.  This alone is human, because only Man is
disinterested, the egoist always interested.


	* * *

If we let disinterestedness pass unchallenged for a while, then we ask,
do you mean not to take an interest in anything, not to be enthusiastic
for anything, not for liberty, humanity, etc.?  “Oh, yes, but that is
not an egoistic interest, not _interestedness_, but a human, _i.e._ a —
_theoretical_ interest, to wit, an interest not for an individual or
individuals (‘all’), but for the _idea_, for Man!”

And you do not notice that you too are enthusiastic only for _your_
idea, _your_ idea of liberty?

And, further, do you not notice that your disinterestedness is again,
like religious disinterestedness, a heavenly interestedness?  Certainly
benefit to the individual leaves you cold, and abstractly you could cry
_fiat libertas, pereat mundus_.  You do not take thought for the coming
day either, and take no serious care for the individual’s wants anyhow,
not for your own comfort nor for that of the rest; but you make nothing
of all this, because you are a — dreamer.

Do you suppose the humane liberal will be so liberal as to aver that
everything possible to man is _human?_ On the contrary!  He does not,
indeed, share the Philistine’s moral prejudice about the strumpet, but
“that this woman turns her body into a money-getting machine”[40] makes
her despicable to him as “human being.” His judgment is, the strumpet is
not a human being; or, so far as a woman is a strumpet, so far is she
unhuman, dehumanized.  Further: The Jew, the Christian, the privileged
person, the theologian, etc., is not a human being; so far as you are a
Jew, etc., you are not a human being.  Again the imperious postulate:
Cast from you everything peculiar, criticize it away!  Be not a Jew, not
a Christian, but be a human being, nothing but a human being.  Assert
your _humanity_ against every restrictive specification; make yourself,
by means of it, a human being, and free from those limits; make yourself
a “free man” — _i.e._ recognize humanity as your all-determining
_essence_.

I say: You are indeed more than a Jew, more than a Christian, etc., but
you are also more than a human being.  Those are all ideas, but you are
corporeal.  Do you suppose, then, that you can ever become a “human
being as such?” Do you suppose our posterity will find no prejudices and
limits to clear away, for which our powers were not sufficient?  Or do
you perhaps think that in your fortieth or fiftieth year you have come
so far that the following days have nothing more to dissipate in you,
and that you are a human being?  The men of the future will yet fight
their way to many a liberty that we do not even miss.  What do you need
that later liberty for?  If you meant to esteem yourself as nothing
before you had become a human being, you would have to wait till the
“last judgment,” till the day when man, or humanity, shall have attained
perfection.  But, as you will surely die before that, what becomes of
your prize of victory?

Rather, therefore, invert the case, and say to yourself, _I am a human
being!_ I do not need to begin by producing the human being in myself,
for he belongs to me already, like all my qualities.

But, asks the critic, how can one be a Jew and a man at once?  In the
first place, I answer, one cannot be either a Jew or a man at all, if
“one” and Jew or man are to mean the same; “one” always reaches beyond
those specifications, and — let Isaacs be ever so Jewish — a Jew,
nothing but a Jew, he cannot be, just because he is _this_ Jew.  In the
second place, as a Jew one assuredly cannot be a man, if being a man
means being nothing special.  But in the third place — and this is the
point — I can, as a Jew, be entirely what I — _can_ be.  From Samuel or
Moses, and others, you hardly expect that they should have raised
themselves above Judaism, although you must say that they were not yet
“men.” They simply were what they could be.  Is it otherwise with the
Jews of today?  Because you have discovered the idea of humanity, does
it follow from this that every Jew can become a convert to it?  If he
can, he does not fail to, and, if he fails to, he — cannot.  What does
your demand concern him?  What the _call_ to be a man, which you address
to him?


	* * *

As a universal principle, in the “human society” which the humane
liberal promises, nothing “special” which one or another has is to find
recognition, nothing which bears the character of “private” is to have
value.  In this way the circle of liberalism, which has its good
principle in man and human liberty, its bad in the, egoist and
everything private, its God in the former, its devil in the latter,
rounds itself off completely; and, if the special or private person lost
his value in the State (no personal prerogative), if in the “laborers’
or ragamuffins’ society” special (private) property is no longer
recognized, so in “human society” everything special or private will be
left out of account; and, when “pure criticism” shall have accomplished
its arduous task, then it will be known just what we must look upon as
private, and what, “penetrated with a sense of our nothingness,” we must
— let stand.

Because State and Society do not suffice for humane liberalism, it
negates both, and at the same time retains them.  So at one time the cry
is that the task of the day is “not a political, but a social, one,” and
then again the “free State” is promised for the future.  In truth,
“human society” is both — the most general State and the most general
society.  Only against the limited State is it asserted that it makes
too much stir about spiritual private interests (_e.g._ people’s
religious belief), and against limited society that it makes too much of
material private interests.  Both are to leave private interests to
private people, and, as human society, concern themselves solely about
general human interests.

The politicians, thinking to abolish _personal will_, self-will or
arbitrariness, did not observe that through _property_[_Eigentum_,
“owndom”] our _self-will_ [_Eigenwille_ “own-will”] gained a secure
place of refuge.

The Socialists, taking away _property_ too, do not notice that this
secures itself a continued existence in _self-ownership_.  Is it only
money and goods, then, that are a property.  or is every opinion
something of mine, something of my own?

So every _opinion_ must be abolished or made impersonal.  The person is
entitled to no opinion, but, as self-will was transferred to the State,
property to society, so opinion too must be transferred to something
_general_, “Man,” and thereby become a general human opinion.

If opinion persists, then I have my God (why, God exists only as “my
God,” he is an opinion or my “faith”), and consequently _my_ faith, my
religion, my thoughts, my ideals.  Therefore a general human faith must
come into existence, the _“fanaticism of liberty.”_ For this would be a
faith that agreed with the “essence of man,” and, because only “man” is
reasonable (you and I might be very unreasonable!), a reasonable faith.

As self-will and property become _powerless_, so must self-ownership or
egoism in general.

In this supreme development of “free man” egoism, self-ownership, is
combated on principle, and such subordinate ends as the social “welfare”
of the Socialists, etc., vanish before the lofty “idea of humanity.”
Everything that is not a “general human” entity is something separate,
satisfies only some or one; or, if it satisfies all, it does this to
them only as individuals, not as men, and is therefore called
“egoistic.”

To the Socialists _welfare_ is still the supreme aim, as free _rivalry_
was the approved thing to the political liberals; now welfare is free
too, and we are free to achieve welfare, just as he who wanted to enter
into rivalry (competition) was free to do so.

But to take part in the rivalry you need only to be _commoners_; to take
part in the welfare, only to be _laborers_.  Neither reaches the point
of being synonymous with “man.” It is “truly well” with man only when he
is also “intellectually free!” For man is mind: therefore all powers
that are alien to him, the mind — all superhuman, heavenly, unhuman
powers — must be overthrown and the name “man” must be above every name.

So in this end of the modern age (age of the moderns) there returns
again, as the main point, what had been the main point at its beginning:
“intellectual liberty.”

To the Communist in particular the humane liberal says: If society
prescribes to you your activity, then this is indeed free from the
influence of the individual, _i.e._ the egoist, but it still does not on
that account need to be a _purely human_ activity, nor you to be a
complete organ of humanity.  What kind of activity society demands of
you remains _accidental_, you know; it might give you a place in
building a temple or something of that sort, or, even if not that, you
might yet on your own impulse be active for something foolish, therefore
unhuman; yes, more yet, you really labor only to nourish yourself, in
general to live, for dear life’s sake, not for the glorification of
humanity.  Consequently free activity is not attained till you make
yourself free from all stupidities, from everything non-human, _i.e._,
egoistic (pertaining only to the individual, not to the Man in the
individual), dissipate all untrue thoughts that obscure man or the idea
of humanity: in short, when you are not merely unhampered in your
activity, but the substance too of your activity is only what is human,
and you live and work only for humanity.  But this is not the case so
long as the aim of your effort is only your _welfare_ and that of all;
what you do for the society of ragamuffins is not yet anything done for
“human society.”

Laboring does not alone make you a man, because it is something formal
and its object accidental; the question is who you that labor are.  As
far as laboring goes, you might do it from an egoistic (material)
impulse, merely to procure nourishment and the like; it must be a labor
furthering humanity, calculated for the good of humanity, serving
historical (_i.e._ human) evolution — in short, a _human_ labor.  This
implies two things: one, that it be useful to humanity; next, that it be
the work of a “man.” The first alone may be the case with every labor,
as even the labors of nature, _e.g._ of animals, are utilized by
humanity for the furthering of science, etc.; the second requires that
he who labors should know the human object of his labor; and, as he can
have this consciousness only when he _knows himself as man_, the crucial
condition is — _self-consciousness._

Unquestionably much is already attained when you cease to be a
“fragment-laborer,”[41] yet therewith you only get a view of the whole
of your labor, and acquire a consciousness about it, which is still far
removed from a self-consciousness, a consciousness about your true
“self” or “essence,” Man.  The laborer has still remaining the desire
for a “higher consciousness,” which, because the activity of labor is
unable to quiet it, he satisfies in a leisure hour.  Hence leisure
stands by the side of his labor, and he sees himself compelled to
proclaim labor and idling human in one breath, yes, to attribute the
true elevation to the idler, the leisure-enjoyer.  He labors only to get
rid of labor; he wants to make labor free, only that he may be free from
labor.

In fine, his work has no satisfying substance, because it is only
imposed by society, only a stint, a task, a calling; and, conversely,
his society does not satisfy, because it gives only work.

His labor ought to satisfy him as a man; instead of that, it satisfies
society; society ought to treat him as a man, and it treats him as — a
rag-tag laborer, or a laboring ragamuffin.

Labor and society are of use to him not as he needs them as a man, but
only as he needs them as an “egoist.”

Such is the attitude of criticism toward labor.  It points to “mind,”
wages the war “of mind with the masses,”[42] and pronounces communistic
labor unintellectual mass-labor.  Averse to labor as they are, the
masses love to make labor easy for themselves.  In literature, which is
today furnished in mass, this aversion to labor begets the
universally-known _superficiality_, which puts from it “the toil of
research.”[43]

Therefore humane liberalism says: You want labor; all right, we want it
likewise, but we want it in the fullest measure.  We want it, not that
we may gain spare time, but that we may find all satisfaction in it
itself.  We want labor because it is our self-development.

But then the labor too must be adapted to that end!  Man is honored only
by human, self-conscious labor, only by the labor that has for its end
no “egoistic” purpose, but Man, and is Man’s self-revelation; so that
the saying should be _laboro, ergo sum_, I labor, therefore I am a man.
The humane liberal wants that labor of the _mind_ which _works up_ all
material; he wants the mind, that leaves no thing quiet or in its
existing condition, that acquiesces in nothing, analyzes everything,
criticises anew every result that has been gained.  This restless mind
is the true laborer, it obliterates prejudices, shatters limits and
narrownesses, and raises man above everything that would like to
dominate over him, while the Communist labors only for himself, and not
even freely, but from necessity, — in short, represents a man condemned
to hard labor.

The laborer of such a type is not “egoistic,” because he does not labor
for individuals, neither for himself nor for other individuals, not for
_private_ men therefore, but for humanity and its progress: he does not
ease individual pains, does not care for individual wants, but removes
limits within which humanity is pressed, dispels prejudices which
dominate an entire time, vanquishes hindrances that obstruct the path of
all, clears away errors in which men entangle themselves, discovers
truths which are found through him for all and for all time; in short —
he lives and labors for humanity.

Now, in the first place, the discoverer of a great truth doubtless knows
that it can be useful to the rest of men, and, as a jealous withholding
furnishes him no enjoyment, he communicates it; but, even though he has
the consciousness that his communication is highly valuable to the rest,
yet he has in no wise sought and found his truth for the sake of the
rest, but for his own sake, because he himself desired it, because
darkness and fancies left him no rest till he had procured for himself
light and enlightenment to the best of his powers.

He labors, therefore, for his own sake and for the satisfaction of his
want.  That along with this he was also useful to others, yes, to
posterity, does not take from his labor the _egoistic_ character.

In the next place, if he did labor only on his own account, like the
rest, why should his act be human, those of the rest unhuman, _i.  e._,
egoistic?  Perhaps because this book, painting, symphony, etc., is the
labor of his whole being, because he has done his best in it, has spread
himself out wholly and is wholly to be known from it, while the work of
a handicraftsman mirrors only the handicraftsman, _i.e._ the skill in
handicraft, not “the man?” In his poems we have the whole Schiller; in
so many hundred stoves, on the other hand, we have before us only the
stove-maker, not “the man.”

But does this mean more than “in the one work you see _me_ as completely
as possible, in the other only my skill?” Is it not me again that the
act expresses?  And is it not more egoistic to offer _oneself_ to the
world in a work, to work out and shape _oneself_, than to remain
concealed behind one’s labor?  You say, to be sure, that you are
revealing Man.  But the Man that you reveal is you; you reveal only
yourself, yet with this distinction from the handicraftsman — that he
does not understand how to compress himself into one labor, but, in
order to be known as himself, must be searched out in his other
relations of life, and that your want, through whose satisfaction that
work came into being, was a — theoretical want.

But you will reply that you reveal quite another man, a worthier,
higher, greater, a man that is more man than that other.  I will assume
that you accomplish all that is possible to man, that you bring to pass
what no other succeeds in.  Wherein, then, does your greatness consist?
Precisely in this, that you are more than other men (the “masses”), more
than _men_ ordinarily are, more than “ordinary men”; precisely in your
elevation above men.  You are distinguished beyond other men not by
being man, but because you are a “unique” [_“einziger”_] man.  Doubtless
you show what a man can do; but because you, a man, do it, this by no
means shows that others, also men, are able to do as much; you have
executed it only as a _unique_ man, and are unique therein.

It is not man that makes up your greatness, but you create it, because
you are more than man, and mightier than other — men.

It is believed that one cannot be more than man.  Rather, one cannot be
less!

It is believed further that whatever one attains is good for Man.  In so
far as I remain at all times a man — or, like Schiller, a Swabian; like
Kant, a Prussian; like Gustavus Adolfus, a near-sighted person — I
certainly become by my superior qualities a notable man, Swabian,
Prussian, or near-sighted person.  But the case is not much better with
that than with Frederick the Great’s cane, which became famous for
Frederick’s sake.

To “Give God the glory” corresponds the modern “Give Man the glory.” But
I mean to keep it for myself.

Criticism, issuing the summons to man to be “human,” enunciates the
necessary condition of sociability; for only as a man among men is one
_companionable_.  Herewith it makes known its _social_ object, the
establishment of “human society.”

Among social theories criticism is indisputably the most complete,
because it removes and deprives of value everything that _separates_ man
from man: all prerogatives, down to the prerogative of faith.  In it the
love-principle of Christianity, the true social principle, comes to the
purest fulfillment, and the last possible experiment is tried to take
away exclusiveness and repulsion from men: a fight against egoism in its
simplest and therefore hardest form, in the form of
singleness,[_“Einzigkeit”_] exclusiveness, itself.

“How can you live a truly social life so long as even one exclusiveness
still exists between you?”

I ask conversely, How can you be truly single so long as even one
connection still exists between you?  If you are connected, you cannot
leave each other; if a “tie” clasps you, you are something only _with
another_, and twelve of you make a dozen, thousands of you a people,
millions of you humanity.

“Only when you are human can you keep company with each other as men,
just as you can understand each other as patriots only when you are
patriotic!”

All right; then I answer, Only when you are single can you have
intercourse with each other as what you are.

It is precisely the keenest critic who is hit hardest by the curse of
his principle.  Putting from him one exclusive thing after another,
shaking off churchliness, patriotism, etc., he undoes one tie after
another and separates himself from the churchly man, from the patriot,
till at last, when all ties are undone, he stands — alone.  He, of all
men, must exclude all that have anything exclusive or private; and, when
you get to the bottom, what can be more exclusive than the exclusive,
single person himself!

Or does he perhaps think that the situation would be better if _all_
became “man” and gave up exclusiveness?  Why, for the very reason that
“all” means “every individual” the most glaring contradiction is still
maintained, for the “individual” is exclusiveness itself.  If the humane
liberal no longer concedes to the individual anything private or
exclusive, any private thought, any private folly; if he criticises
everything away from him before his face, since his hatred of the
private is an absolute and fanatical hatred; if he knows no tolerance
toward what is private, because everything private is _unhuman_ — yet he
cannot criticize away the private person himself, since the hardness of
the individual person resists his criticism, and he must be satisfied
with declaring this person a “private person” and really leaving
everything private to him again.

What will the society that no longer cares about anything private do?
Make the private impossible?  No, but “subordinate it to the interests
of society, and, _e.g._, leave it to private will to institute holidays
as many as it chooses, if only it does not come in collision with the
general interest.”[44] Everything private is _left free_; _i.e._, it has
no interest for society.

“By their raising barriers against science the church and religiousness
have declared that they are what they always were, only that this was
hidden under another semblance when they were proclaimed to be the basis
and necessary foundation of the State — a matter of purely private
concern.  Even when they were connected with the State and made it
Christian, they were only the proof that the State had not yet developed
its general political idea, that it was only instituting private rights
— they were only the highest expression for the fact that the State was
a private affair and had to do only with private affairs.  When the
State shall at last have the courage and strength to fulfil its general
destiny and to be free; when, therefore, it is also able to give
separate interests and private concerns their true position — then
religion and the church will be free as they have never been hitherto.
As a matter of the most purely private concern, and a satisfaction of
purely personal want, they will be left to themselves; and every
individual, every congregation and ecclesiastical communion, will be
able to care for the blessedness of their souls as they choose and as
they think necessary.  Every one will care for his soul’s blessedness so
far as it is to him a personal want, and will accept and pay as
spiritual caretaker the one who seems to him to offer the best guarantee
for the satisfaction of his want.  Science is at last left entirely out
of the game.”[45]

What is to happen, though?  Is social life to have an end, and all
affability, all fraternization, everything that is created by the love
or society principle, to disappear?

As if one will not always seek the other because he _needs_ him; as if
one must accommodate himself to the other when he _needs_ him.  But the
difference is this, that then the individual really _unites_ with the
individual, while formerly they were _bound together_ by a tie; son and
father are bound together before majority, after it they can come
together independently; before it they _belonged_ together as members of
the family, after it they unite as egoists; sonship and fatherhood
remain, but son and father no longer pin themselves down to these.

The last privilege, in truth, is “Man”; with it all are privileged or
invested.  For, as Bruno Bauer himself says, “privilege remains even
when it is extended to all.”[46]

Thus liberalism runs its course in the following transformations:
“First, the individual is not man, therefore his individual personality
is of no account: no personal will, no arbitrariness, no orders or
mandates!

“Second, the individual _has_ nothing human, therefore no mine and
thine, or property, is valid.

“Third, as the individual neither is man nor has anything human, he
shall not exist at all: he shall, as an egoist with his egoistic
belongings, be annihilated by criticism to make room for Man, ‘Man, just
discovered.’”

But, although the individual is not Man, Man is yet present in the
individual, and, like every spook and everything divine, has its
existence in him.  Hence political liberalism awards to the individual
everything that pertains to him as “a man by birth,” as a born man,
among which there are counted liberty of conscience, the possession of
goods, etc.  — in short, the “rights of man”; Socialism grants to the
individual what pertains to him as an _active_ man, as a “laboring” man;
finally.  humane liberalism gives the individual what he has as “a man,”
_i.  e._, everything that belongs to humanity.  Accordingly the single
one [_“Einzige”_] has nothing at all, humanity everything; and the
necessity of the “regeneration” preached in Christianity is demanded
unambiguously and in the completest measure.  Become a new creature,
become “man!”

One might even think himself reminded of the close of the Lord’s Prayer.
To Man belongs the _lordship_ (the “power” or _dynamis_); therefore no
individual may be lord, but Man is the lord of individuals; — Man’s is
the _kingdom_, _i.e._ the world, consequently the individual is not to
be proprietor, but Man, “all,” command the world as property — to Man is
due renown, _glorification_ or “glory” (_doxa_) from all, for Man or
humanity is the individual’s end, for which he labors, thinks, lives,
and for whose glorification he must become “man.”

Hitherto men have always striven to find out a fellowship in which their
inequalities in other respects should become “nonessential”; they strove
for equalization, consequently for _equality_, and wanted to come all
under one hat, which means nothing less than that they were seeking for
one lord, one tie, one faith (“‘Tis in one God we all believe”).  There
cannot be for men anything more fellowly or more equal than Man himself,
and in this fellowship the love-craving has found its contentment: it
did not rest till it had brought on this last equalization, leveled all
inequality, laid man on the breast of man.  But under this very
fellowship decay and ruin become most glaring.  In a more limited
fellowship the Frenchman still stood against the German, the Christian
against the Mohammedan, etc.  Now, on the contrary, _man_ stands against
_men_, or, as men are not man, man stands against the un-man.

The sentence “God has become man” is now followed by the other, “Man has
become I.” This is _the human 1_.  But we invert it and say: I was not
able to find myself so long as I sought myself as Man.  But, now that it
appears that Man is aspiring to become I and to gain a corporeity in me,
I note that, after all, everything depends on me, and Man is lost
without me.  But I do not care to give myself up to be the shrine of
this most holy thing, and shall not ask henceforward whether I am man or
un-man in what I set about; let this _spirit_ keep off my neck!

Humane liberalism goes to work radically.  If you want to be or have
anything especial even in one point, if you want to retain for yourself
even one prerogative above others, to claim even one right that is not a
“general right of man,” you are an egoist.

Very good!  I do not want to have or be anything especial above others,
I do not want to claim any prerogative against them, but — I do not
measure myself by others either, and do not want to have any _right_
whatever.  I want to be all and have all that I can be and have.
Whether others are and have anything _similar_, what do I care?  The
equal, the same, they can neither be nor have.  I cause no _detriment_
to them, as I cause no detriment to the rock by being “ahead of it” in
having motion.  If they could have it, they would have it.

To cause other men no _detriment_ is the point of the demand to possess
no prerogative; to renounce all “being ahead,” the strictest theory of
_renunciation_.  One is not to count himself as “anything especial,”
_e.g._ a Jew or a Christian.  Well, I do not count myself as anything
especial, but as unique.[_“einzig”_] Doubtless I have _similarity_ with
others; yet that holds good only for comparison or reflection; in fact I
am incomparable, unique.  My flesh is not their flesh, my mind is not
their mind.  If you bring them under the generalities “flesh, mind,”
those are your _thoughts_, which have nothing to do with _my_ flesh,
_my_ mind, and can least of all issue a “call” to mine.

I do not want to recognize or respect in you any thing, neither the
proprietor nor the ragamuffin, nor even the man, but to _use you_.  In
salt I find that it makes food palatable to me, therefore I dissolve it;
in the fish I recognize an aliment, therefore I eat it; in you I
discover the gift of making my life agreeable, therefore I choose you as
a companion.  Or, in salt I study crystallization, in the fish
animality, in you men, etc.  But to me you are only what you are for me
— to wit, my object; and, because _my_ object, therefore my property.

In humane liberalism ragamuffinhood is completed.  We must first come
down to the most ragamuffin-like, most poverty-stricken condition if we
want to arrive at _ownness_, for we must strip off everything alien.
But nothing seems more ragamuffin-like than naked — Man.

It is more than ragamuffinhood, however, when I throw away Man too
because I feel that he too is alien to me and that T can make no
pretensions on that basis.  This is no longer mere ragamuffinhood:
because even the last rag has fallen off, here stands real nakedness,
denudation of everything alien.  The ragamuffin has stripped off
ragamuffinhood itself, and therewith has ceased to be what he was, a
ragamuffin.

I am no longer a ragamuffin, but have been one.


	* * *

Up to this time the discord could not come to an outbreak, because
properly there is current only a contention of modern liberals with
antiquated liberals, a contention of those who understand “freedom” in a
small measure and those who want the “full measure” of freedom; of the
_moderate_ and _measureless_, therefore.  Everything turns on the
question, _how free_ must _man_ be?  That man must be free, in this all
believe; therefore all are liberal too.  But the un-man[47] who is
somewhere in every individual, how is he blocked?  How can it be
arranged not to leave the un-man free at the same time with man?

Liberalism as a whole has a deadly enemy, an invincible opposite, as God
has the devil: by the side of man stands always the un-man, the
individual, the egoist.  State, society, humanity, do not master this
devil.

Humane liberalism has undertaken the task of showing the other liberals
that they still do not want “freedom.”

If the other liberals had before their eyes only isolated egoism and
were for the most part blind, radical liberalism has against it egoism
“in mass,” throws among the masses all who do not make the cause of
freedom their own as it does, so that now man and un-man rigorously
separated, stand over against each other as enemies, to wit, the
“masses” and “criticism”;[48] namely, “free, human criticism,” as it is
called _(Judenfrage_, p.  114), in opposition to crude, that is,
religious criticism.

Criticism expresses the hope that it will be victorious over all the
masses and “give them a general certificate of insolvency.”[49] So it
means finally to make itself out in the right, and to represent all
contention of the “faint-hearted and timorous” as an egoistic
_stubbornness_,[_Rechthaberei_, literally the character of always
insisting on making one’s self out to be in the right] as pettiness,
paltriness.  All wrangling loses significance, and petty dissensions are
given up, because in criticism a common enemy enters the field.  “You
are egoists altogether, one no better than another!” Now the egoists
stand together against criticism.

Really the egoists?  No, they fight against criticism precisely because
it accuses them of egoism; they do not plead guilty of egoism.
Accordingly criticism and the masses stand on the same basis: both fight
against egoism, both repudiate it for themselves and charge it to each
other.

Criticism and the masses pursue the same goal, freedom from egoism, and
wrangle only over which of them approaches nearest to the goal or even
attains it.

The Jews, the Christians, the absolutists, the men of darkness and men
of light, politicians, Communists — all, in short — hold the reproach of
egoism far from them; and, as criticism brings against them this
reproach in plain terms and in the most extended sense, all _justify_
themselves against the accusation of egoism, and combat — egoism, the
same enemy with whom criticism wages war.

Both, criticism and masses, are enemies of egoists, and both seek to
liberate themselves from egoism, as well by clearing or whitewashing
_themselves_ as by ascribing it to the opposite party.

The critic is the true “spokesman of the masses” who gives them the
“simple concept and the phrase” of egoism, while the spokesmen to whom
the triumph is denied were only bunglers.  He is their prince and
general in the war against egoism for freedom; what he fights against
they fight against.  But at the same time he is their enemy too, only
not the enemy before them, but the friendly enemy who wields the knout
behind the timorous to force courage into them.

Hereby the opposition of criticism and the masses is reduced to the
following contradiction: “You are egoists!” “No, we are not!” “I will
prove it to you!” “You shall have our justification!”

Let us then take both for what they give themselves out for,
non-egoists, and what they take each other for, egoists.  They are
egoists and are not.

Properly criticism says: You must liberate your ego from all limitedness
so entirely that it becomes a _human_ ego.  I say: Liberate yourself as
far as you can, and you have done your part; for it is not given to
every one to break through all limits, or, more expressively: not to
every one is that a limit which is a limit for the rest.  Consequently,
do not tire yourself with toiling at the limits of others; enough if you
tear down yours.  Who has ever succeeded in tearing down even one limit
_for all men?_ Are not countless persons today, as at all times, running
about with all the “limitations of humanity?” He who overturns one of
_his_ limits may have shown others the way and the means; the
overturning of _their_ limits remains their affair.  Nobody does
anything else either.  To demand of people that they become wholly men
is to call on them to cast down all human limits.  That is impossible,
because _Man_ has no limits.  I have some indeed, but then it is only
_mine_ that concern me any, and only they can be overcome by me.  A
human ego I cannot become, just because I am I and not merely man.

Yet let us still see whether criticism has not taught us something that
we can lay to heart!  I am not free if I am not without interests, not
man if I am not disinterested?  Well, even if it makes little difference
to me to be free or man, yet I do not want to leave unused any occasion
to realize _myself_ or make myself count.  Criticism offers me this
occasion by the teaching that, if anything plants itself firmly in me,
and becomes indissoluble, I become its prisoner and servant, _i.e._ a
possessed man.  An interest, be it for what it may, has kidnapped a
slave in me if I cannot get away from it, and is no longer my property,
but I am its.  Let us therefore accept criticism’s lesson to let no part
of our property become stable, and to feel comfortable only in —
_dissolving_ it.

So, if criticism says: You are man only when you are restlessly
criticizing and dissolving!  then we say: Man I am without that, and I
am I likewise; therefore I want only to be careful to secure my property
to myself; and, in order to secure it, I continually take it back into
myself, annihilate in it every movement toward independence, and swallow
it before it can fix itself and become a “fixed idea” or a “mania.”

But I do that not for the sake of my “human calling,” but because I call
myself to it.  I do not strut about dissolving everything that it is
possible for a man to dissolve, and, _e.g._, while not yet ten years old
I do not criticize the nonsense of the Commandments, but I am man all
the same, and act humanly in just this — that I still leave them
uncriticized.  In short, I have no calling, and follow none, not even
that to be a man.

Do I now reject what liberalism has won in its various exertions?  Far
be the day that anything won should be lost!  Only, after “Man” has
become free through liberalism, I turn my gaze back upon myself and
confess to myself openly: What Man seems to have gained, _I_ alone have
gained.

Man is free when “Man is to man the supreme being.” So it belongs to the
completion of liberalism that every other supreme being be annulled,
theology overturned by anthropology, God and his grace laughed down,
“atheism” universal.

The egoism of property has given up the last that it had to give when
even the “My God” has become senseless; for God exists only when he has
at heart the individual’s welfare, as the latter seeks his welfare in
him.

Political liberalism abolished the inequality of masters and servants:
it made people masterless, anarchic.  The master was now removed from
the individual, the “egoist,” to become a ghost — the law or the State.
Social liberalism abolishes the inequality of possession, of the poor
and rich, and makes people _possessionless_ or propertyless.  Property
is withdrawn from the individual and surrendered to ghostly society.
Humane liberalism makes people _godless_, atheistic.  Therefore the
individual’s God, “My God,” must be put an end to.  Now masterlessness
is indeed at the same time freedom from service, possessionlessness at
the same time freedom from care, and godlessness at the same time
freedom from prejudice: for with the master the servant falls away; with
possession, the care about it; with the firmly-rooted God, prejudice.
But, since the master rises again as State, the servants appears again
as subject; since possession becomes the property of society, care is
begotten anew as labor; and, since God as Man becomes a prejudice, there
arises a new faith, faith in humanity or liberty.  For the individual’s
God the God of all, _viz_., “Man,” is now exalted; “for it is the
highest thing in us all to be man.” But, as nobody can become entirely
what the idea “man” imports, Man remains to the individual a lofty other
world, an unattained supreme being, a God.  But at the same time this is
the “true God,” because he is fully adequate to us — to wit, our own
_“self”_; we ourselves, but separated from us and lifted above us.


	* * *

*** Postscript

The foregoing review of “free human criticism” was written by bits
immediately after the appearance of the books in question, as was also
that which elsewhere refers to writings of this tendency, and I did
little more than bring together the fragments.  But criticism is
restlessly pressing forward, and thereby makes it necessary for me to
come back to it once more, now that my book is finished, and insert this
concluding note.

I have before me the latest (eighth) number of the _Allgemeine
Literatur-Zeitung_ of Bruno Bauer.

There again “the general interests of society” stand at the top.  But
criticism has reflected, and given this “society” a specification by
which it is discriminated from a form which previously had still been
confused with it: the “State,” in former passages still celebrated as
“free State,” is quite given up because it can in no wise fulfil the
task of “human society.” Criticism only “saw itself compelled to
identify for a moment human and political affairs” in 1842; but now it
has found that the State, even as “free State,” is not human society,
or, as it could likewise say, that the people is not “man.” We saw how
it got through with theology and showed clearly that God sinks into dust
before Man; we see it now come to a clearance with politics in the same
way, and show that before Man peoples and nationalities fall: so we see
how it has its explanation with Church and State, declaring them both
unhuman, and we shall see — for it betrays this to us already — how it
can also give proof that before Man the “masses,” which it even calls a
“spiritual being,” appear worthless.  And how should the lesser
“spiritual beings” be able to maintain themselves before the supreme
spirit?  “Man” casts down the false idols.

So what the critic has in view for the present is the scrutiny of the
“masses,” which he will place before “Man” in order to combat them from
the standpoint of Man.  “What is now the object of criticism?” “The
masses, a spiritual being!” These the critic will “learn to know,” and
will find that they are in contradiction with Man; he will demonstrate
that they are unhuman, and will succeed just as well in this
demonstration as in the former ones, that the divine and the national,
or the concerns of Church and of State, were the unhuman.

The masses are defined as “the most significant product of the
Revolution, as the deceived multitude which the illusions of political
Illumination, and in general the entire Illumination movement of the
eighteenth century, have given over to boundless disgruntlement.” The
Revolution satisfied some by its result, and left others unsatisfied;
the satisfied part is the commonalty (_bourgeoisie_, etc.), the
unsatisfied is the — masses.  Does not the critic, so placed, himself
belong to the “masses”?

But the unsatisfied are still in great mistiness, and their discontent
utters itself only in a “boundless disgruntlement.” This the likewise
unsatisfied critic now wants to master: he cannot want and attain more
than to bring that “spiritual being,” the masses, out of its
disgruntlement, and to “uplift” those who were only disgruntled, _i.e._
to give them the right attitude toward those results of the Revolution
which are to be overcome; — he can become the head of the masses, their
decided spokesman.  Therefore he wants also to “abolish the deep chasm
which parts him from the multitude.” From those who want to “uplift the
lower classes of the people” he is distinguished by wanting to deliver
from “disgruntlement,” not merely these, but himself too.

But assuredly his consciousness does not deceive him either, when he
takes the masses to be the “natural opponents of theory,” and foresees
that, “the more this theory shall develop itself, so much the more will
it make the masses compact.” For the critic cannot enlighten or satisfy
the masses with his _presupposition_, Man.  If over against the
commonalty they are only the “lower classes of the people,” politically
insignificant masses, over against “Man” they must still more be mere
“masses,” humanly insignificant — yes, unhuman — masses, or a multitude
of un-men.

The critic clears away everything human; and, starting from the
presupposition that the human is the true, he works against himself,
denying it wherever it had been hitherto found.  He proves only that the
human is to be found nowhere except in his head, but the unhuman
everywhere.  The unhuman is the real, the extant on all hands, and by
the proof that it is “not human” the critic only enunciates plainly the
tautological sentence that it is the unhuman.

But what if the unhuman, turning its back on itself with resolute heart,
should at the same time turn away from the disturbing critic and leave
him standing, untouched and unstung by his remonstrance?  “You call me
the unhuman,” it might say to him, “and so I really am — for you; but I
am so only because you bring me into opposition to the human, and I
could despise myself only so long as I let myself be hypnotized into
this opposition.  I was contemptible because I sought my ‘better self’
outside me; I was the unhuman because I dreamed of the ‘human’; I
resembled the pious who hunger for their ‘true self’ and always remain
‘poor sinners’; I thought of myself only in comparison to another;
enough, I was not all in all, was not — _unique_.[_“einzig”_] But now I
cease to appear to myself as the unhuman, cease to measure myself and
let myself be measured by man, cease to recognize anything above me:
consequently — adieu, humane critic!  I only have been the unhuman, am
it now no longer, but am the unique, yes, to your loathing, the
egoistic; yet not the egoistic as it lets itself be measured by the
human, humane, and unselfish, but the egoistic as the — unique.”

We have to pay attention to still another sentence of the same number.
“Criticism sets up no dogmas, and wants to learn to know nothing but
_things_.”

The critic is afraid of becoming “dogmatic” or setting up dogmas.  Of
course: why, thereby he would become the opposite of the critic — the
dogmatist; he would now become bad, as he is good as critic, or would
become from an unselfish man an egoist, etc.  “Of all things, no dogma!”
This is his — dogma.  For the critic remains on one and the same ground
with the dogmatist — that of _thoughts_.  Like the latter he always
starts from a thought, but varies in this, that he never ceases to keep
the principle-thought in the _process of thinking_, and so does not let
it become stable.  He only asserts the thought-process against the
thought-faith, the progress of thinking against stationariness in it.
From criticism no thought is safe, since criticism is thought or the
thinking mind itself.

Therefore I repeat that the religious world — and this is the world of
thought — reaches its completion in criticism, where thinking extends
its encroachments over every thought, no one of which may “egoistically”
establish itself.  Where would the “purity of criticism,” the purity of
thinking, be left if even one thought escaped the process of thinking?
This explains the fact that the critic has even begun already to gibe
gently here and there at the thought of Man, of humanity and humaneness,
because he suspects that here a thought is approaching dogmatic fixity.
But yet he cannot decompose this thought till he has found a — “higher”
in which it dissolves; for he moves only — in thoughts.  This higher
thought might be enunciated as that of the movement or process of
thinking itself, _i.e._ as the thought of thinking or of criticism, for
example.

Freedom of thinking has in fact become complete hereby, freedom of mind
celebrates its triumph: for the individual, “egoistic” thoughts have
lost their dogmatic truculence.  There is nothing left but the — dogma
of free thinking or of criticism.

Against everything that belongs to the world of thought, criticism is in
the right, _i.  e._, in might: it is the victor.  Criticism, and
criticism alone, is “up to date.” From the standpoint of thought there
is no power capable of being an overmatch for criticism’s, and it is a
pleasure to see how easily and sportively this dragon swallows all other
serpents of thought.  Each serpent twists, to be sure, but criticism
crushes it in all its “turns.”

I am no opponent of criticism, _i.e._ I am no dogmatist, and do not feel
myself touched by the critic’s tooth with which he tears the dogmatist
to pieces.  If I were a “dogmatist,” I should place at the head a dogma,
_i.e._ a thought, an idea, a principle, and should complete this as a
“systematist,” spinning it out to a system, a structure of thought.
Conversely, if I were a critic, _viz_., an opponent of the dogmatist, I
should carry on the fight of free thinking against the enthralling
thought, I should defend thinking against what was thought.  But I am
neither the champion of a thought nor the champion of thinking; for “I,”
from whom I start, am not a thought, nor do I consist in thinking.
Against me, the unnameable, the realm of thoughts, thinking, and mind is
shattered.

Criticism is the possessed man’s fight against possession as such,
against all possession: a fight which is founded in the consciousness
that everywhere possession, or, as the critic calls it, a religious and
theological attitude, is extant.  He knows that people stand in a
religious or believing attitude not only toward God, but toward other
ideas as well, like right, the State, law; _i.e._ he recognizes
possession in all places.  So he wants to break up thoughts by thinking;
but I say, only thoughtlessness really saves me from thoughts.  It is
not thinking, but my thoughtlessness, or I the unthinkable,
incomprehensible, that frees me from possession.

A jerk does me the service of the most anxious thinking, a stretching of
the limbs shakes off the torment of thoughts, a leap upward hurls from
my breast the nightmare of the religious world, a jubilant Hoopla throws
off year-long burdens.  But the monstrous significance of unthinking
jubilation could not be recognized in the long night of thinking and
believing.

“What clumsiness and frivolity, to want to solve the most difficult
problems, acquit yourself of the most comprehensive tasks, by _a
breaking off_!”

But have you tasks if you do not set them to yourself?  So long as you
set them, you will not give them up, and I certainly do not care if you
think, and, thinking, create a thousand thoughts.  But you who have set
the tasks, are you not to be able to upset them again?  Must you be
bound to these tasks, and must they become absolute tasks?

To cite only one thing, the government has been disparaged on account of
its resorting to forcible means against thoughts, interfering against
the press by means of the police power of the censorship, and making a
personal fight out of a literary one.  As if it were solely a matter of
thoughts, and as if one’s attitude toward thoughts must be unselfish,
self-denying, and self-sacrificing!  Do not those thoughts attack the
governing parties themselves, and so call out egoism?  And do the
thinkers not set before the attacked ones the _religious_ demand to
reverence the power of thought, of ideas?  They are to succumb
voluntarily and resignedly, because the divine power of thought,
Minerva, fights on their enemies’ side.  Why, that would be an act of
possession, a religious sacrifice.  To be sure, the governing parties
are themselves held fast in a religious bias, and follow the leading
power of an idea or a faith; but they are at the same time unconfessed
egoists, and right here, against the enemy, their pent-up egoism breaks
loose: possessed in their faith, they are at the same time unpossessed
by their opponents’ faith, _i.e._ they are egoists toward this.  If one
wants to make them a reproach, it could only be the converse — to wit,
that they are possessed by their ideas.

Against thoughts no egoistic power is to appear, no police power etc.
So the believers in thinking believe.  But thinking and its thoughts are
not sacred to me, and I defend my _skin_ against them as against other
things.  That may be an unreasonable defense; but, if I am in duty bound
to reason, then I, like Abraham, must sacrifice my dearest to it!

In the kingdom of thought, which, like that of faith, is the kingdom of
heaven, every one is assuredly wrong who uses unthinking force, just as
every one is wrong who in the kingdom of love behaves unlovingly, or,
although he is a Christian and therefore lives in the kingdom of love,
yet acts un-Christianly; in these kingdoms, to which he supposes himself
to belong though he nevertheless throws off their laws, he is a “sinner”
or “egoist.” But it is only when he becomes a criminal against these
kingdoms that he can throw off their dominion.

Here too the result is this, that the fight of the thinkers against the
government is indeed in the right, namely, in might — so far as it is
carried on against the government’s thoughts (the government is dumb,
and does not succeed in making any literary rejoinder to speak of), but
is, on the other hand, in the wrong, to wit, in impotence, so far as it
does not succeed in bringing into the field anything but thoughts
against a personal power (the egoistic power stops the mouths of the
thinkers).  The theoretical fight cannot complete the victory, and the
sacred power of thought succumbs to the might of egoism.  Only the
egoistic fight, the fight of egoists on both sides, clears up
everything.

This last now, to make thinking an affair of egoistic option, an affair
of the single person,[_“des Einzigen”_] a mere pastime or hobby as it
were, and, to take from it the importance of “being the last decisive
power”; this degradation and desecration of thinking; this equalization
of the unthinking and thoughtful ego; this clumsy but real “equality” —
criticism is not able to produce, because it itself is only the priest
of thinking, and sees nothing beyond thinking but — the deluge.

Criticism does indeed affirm, _e.g._ that free criticism may overcome
the State, but at the same time it defends itself against the reproach
which is laid upon it by the State government, that it is “self-will and
impudence”; it thinks, then, that “self-will and impudence” may not
overcome, it alone may.  The truth is rather the reverse: the State can
be really overcome only by impudent self-will.

It may now, to conclude with this, be clear that in the critic’s new
change of front he has not transformed himself, but only “made good an
oversight,” “disentangled a subject,” and is saying too much when he
speaks of “criticism criticizing itself”; it, or rather he, has only
criticized its “oversight” and cleared it of its “inconsistencies.” If
he wanted to criticize criticism, he would have to look and see if there
was anything in its presupposition.

I on my part start from a presupposition in presupposing _myself_; but
my presupposition does not struggle for its perfection like “Man
struggling for his perfection,” but only serves me to enjoy it and
consume it.  I consume my presupposition, and nothing else, and exist
only in consuming it.  But that presupposition is therefore not a
presupposition at all: for, as I am the Unique, I know nothing of the
duality of a presupposing and a presupposed ego (an “incomplete” and a
“complete” ego or man); but this, that I consume myself, means only that
I am.  I do not presuppose myself, because I am every moment just
positing or creating myself, and am I only by being not presupposed but
posited, and, again, posited only in the moment when I posit myself; _i.
e._, I am creator and creature in one.

If the presuppositions that have hitherto been current are to melt away
in a full dissolution, they must not be dissolved into a higher
presupposition again — _i.e._ a thought, or thinking itself, criticism.
For that dissolution is to be for _my_ good; otherwise it would belong
only in the series of the innumerable dissolutions which, in favor of
others (_e.g._ this very Man, God, the State, pure morality, etc.),
declared old truths to be untruths and did away with long-fostered
presuppositions.

* Part Second: _I_

At the entrance of the modern time stands the “God-man.” At its exit
will only the God in the God-man evaporate?  And can the God-man really
die if only the God in him dies?  They did not think of this question,
and thought they were through when in our days they brought to a
victorious end the work of the Illumination, the vanquishing of God:
they did not notice that Man has killed God in order to become now —
“sole God on high.” The _other world outside us_ is indeed brushed away,
and the great undertaking of the Illuminators completed; but the _other
world in us_ has become a new heaven and calls us forth to renewed
heaven-storming: God has had to give place, yet not to us, but to — Man.
How can you believe that the God-man is dead before the Man in him,
besides the God, is dead?

** I.  Ownness

  [This is a literal translation of the German word
  <strong>Eigenheit</strong>, which, with its primitive eigen, “own,” is
  used in this chapter in a way that the German dictionaries do not
  quite recognize.  The author’s conception being new, he had to make an
  innovation in the German language to express it.  The translator is
  under the like necessity.  In most passages “self-ownership,” or else
  “personality,” would translate the word, but there are some where the
  thought is so _eigen_, _i.  e._, so peculiar or so thoroughly the
  author’s own, that no English word I can think of would express it.
  It will explain itself to one who has read Part First intelligently]

“Does not the spirit thirst for freedom?” — Alas, not my spirit alone,
my body too thirsts for it hourly!  When before the odorous
castle-kitchen my nose tells my palate of the savory dishes that are
being prepared therein, it feels a fearful pining at its dry bread; when
my eyes tell the hardened back about soft down on which one may lie more
delightfully than on its compressed straw, a suppressed rage seizes it;
when — but let us not follow the pains further.  — And you call that a
longing for freedom?  What do you want to become free from, then?  From
your hardtack and your straw bed?  Then throw them away!  — But that
seems not to serve you: you want rather to have the freedom to enjoy
delicious foods and downy beds.  Are men to give you this “freedom” —
are they to permit it to you?  You do not hope that from their
philanthropy, because you know they all think like you: each is the
nearest to himself!  How, therefore, do you mean to come to the
enjoyment of those foods and beds?  Evidently not otherwise than in
making them your property!

If you think it over rightly, you do not want the freedom to have all
these fine things, for with this freedom you still do not have them; you
want really to have them, to call them _yours_ and possess them as _your
property_.  Of what use is a freedom to you, indeed, if it brings in
nothing?  And, if you became free from everything, you would no longer
have anything; for freedom is empty of substance.  Whoso knows not how
to make use of it, for him it has no value, this useless permission; but
how I make use of it depends on my personality.[_Eigenheit_]

I have no objection to freedom, but I wish more than freedom for you:
you should not merely _be rid_ of what you do not want; you should not
only be a “freeman,” you should be an “owner” too.

Free — from what?  Oh!  what is there that cannot be shaken off?  The
yoke of serfdom, of sovereignty, of aristocracy and princes, the
dominion of the desires and passions; yes, even the dominion of one’s
own will, of self-will, for the completest self-denial is nothing but
freedom — freedom, to wit, from self-determination, from one’s own self.
And the craving for freedom as for something absolute, worthy of every
praise, deprived us of ownness: it created self-denial.  However, the
freer I become, the more compulsion piles up before my eyes; and the
more impotent I feel myself.  The unfree son of the wilderness does not
yet feel anything of all the limits that crowd a civilized man: he seems
to himself freer than this latter.  In the measure that I conquer
freedom for myself I create for myself new bounds and new tasks: if I
have invented railroads, I feel myself weak again because I cannot yet
sail through the skies like the bird; and, if I have solved a problem
whose obscurity disturbed my mind, at once there await me innumerable
others, whose perplexities impede my progress, dim my free gaze, make
the limits of my _freedom_ painfully sensible to me.  “Now that you have
become free from sin, you have become servants of righteousness.”[50]
Republicans in their broad freedom, do they not become servants of the
law?  How true Christian hearts at all times longed to “become free,”
how they pined to see themselves delivered from the “bonds of this
earth-life”!  They looked out toward the land of freedom.  (“The
Jerusalem that is above is the freewoman; she is the mother of us all.”
Gal.  4.  26.)

Being free from anything — means only being clear or rid.  “He is free
from headache” is equal to “he is rid of it.” “He is free from this
prejudice” is equal to “he has never conceived it” or “he has got rid of
it.” In “less” we complete the freedom recommended by Christianity, in
sinless, godless, moralityless, etc.

Freedom is the doctrine of Christianity.  “Ye, dear brethren, are called
to freedom.”[51] “So speak and so do, as those who are to be judged by
the law of freedom.”[52]

Must we then, because freedom betrays itself as a Christian ideal, give
it up?  No, nothing is to be lost, freedom no more than the rest; but it
is to become our own, and in the form of freedom it cannot.

What a difference between freedom and ownness!  One can get _rid_ of a
great many things, one yet does not get rid of all; one becomes free
from much, not from everything.  Inwardly one may be free in spite of
the condition of slavery, although, too, it is again only from all sorts
of things, not from everything; but from the whip, the domineering
temper, of the master, one does not as slave become _free_.  “Freedom
lives only in the realm of dreams!” Ownness, on the contrary, is my
whole being and existence, it is I myself.  I am free from what I am
_rid_ of, owner of what I have in my _power_ or what I _control.  My
own_ I am at all times and under all circumstances, if I know how to
have myself and do not throw myself away on others.  To be free is
something that I cannot truly _will_, because I cannot make it, cannot
create it: I can only wish it and — aspire toward it, for it remains an
ideal, a spook.  The fetters of reality cut the sharpest welts in my
flesh every moment.  But _my own_ I remain.  Given up as serf to a
master, I think only of myself and my advantage; his blows strike me
indeed, I am not _free_ from them; but I endure them only for _my
benefit_, perhaps in order to deceive him and make him secure by the
semblance of patience, or, again, not to draw worse upon myself by
contumacy.  But, as I keep my eye on myself and my selfishness, I take
by the forelock the first good opportunity to trample the slaveholder
into the dust.  That I then become _free_ from him and his whip is only
the consequence of my antecedent egoism.  Here one perhaps says I was
“free” even in the condition of slavery — to wit, “intrinsically” or
“inwardly.” But “intrinsically free” is not “really free,” and
“inwardly” is not “outwardly.” I was own, on the other hand, my own,
altogether, inwardly and outwardly.  Under the dominion of a cruel
master my body is not “free” from torments and lashes; but it is _my_
bones that moan under the torture, _my_ fibres that quiver under the
blows, and _I_ moan because _my_ body moans.  That _I_ sigh and shiver
proves that I have not yet lost _myself_, that I am still my own.  My
leg is not “free” from the master’s stick, but it is my leg and is
inseparable.  Let him tear it off me and look and see if he still has my
leg!  He retains in his hand nothing but the — corpse of my leg, which
is as little my leg as a dead dog is still a dog: a dog has a pulsating
heart, a so-called dead dog has none and is therefore no longer a dog.

If one opines that a slave may yet be inwardly free, he says in fact
only the most indisputable and trivial thing.  For who is going to
assert that any man is _wholly_ without freedom?  If I am an
eye-servant, can I therefore not be free from innumerable things, _e.g._
from faith in Zeus, from the desire for fame, etc.?  Why then should not
a whipped slave also be able to be inwardly free from un-Christian
sentiments, from hatred of his enemy, etc.?  He then has “Christian
freedom,” is rid of the un-Christian; but has he absolute freedom,
freedom from everything, _e.g._ from the Christian delusion, or from
bodily pain?

In the meantime, all this seems to be said more against names than
against the thing.  But is the name indifferent, and has not a word, a
shibboleth, always inspired and — fooled men?  Yet between freedom and
ownness there lies still a deeper chasm than the mere difference of the
words.

All the world desires freedom, all long for its reign to come.  Oh,
enchantingly beautiful dream of a blooming “reign of freedom,” a “free
human race”!  — who has not dreamed it?  So men shall become free,
entirely free, free from all constraint!  From all constraint, really
from all?  Are they never to put constraint on themselves any more?  “Oh
yes, that, of course; don’t you see, that is no constraint at all?”
Well, then at any rate they — are to become free from religious faith,
from the strict duties of morality, from the inexorability of the law,
from — “What a fearful misunderstanding!” Well, _what_ are they to be
free from then, and what not?

The lovely dream is dissipated; awakened, one rubs his half-opened eyes
and stares at the prosaic questioner.  “What men are to be free from?” —
From blind credulity, cries one.  What’s that?  exclaims another, all
faith is blind credulity; they must become free from all faith.  No, no,
for God’s sake — inveighs the first again — do not cast all faith from
you, else the power of brutality breaks in.  We must have the republic —
a third makes himself heard, — and become — free from all commanding
lords.  There is no help in that, says a fourth: we only get a new lord
then, a “dominant majority”; let us rather free ourselves from this
dreadful inequality.  — O, hapless equality, already I hear your
plebeian roar again!  How I had dreamed so beautifully just now of a
paradise of _freedom_, and what — impudence and licentiousness now
raises its wild clamor!  Thus the first laments, and gets on his feet to
grasp the sword against “unmeasured freedom.” Soon we no longer hear
anything but the clashing of the swords of the disagreeing dreamers of
freedom.

What the craving for freedom has always come to has been the desire for
a _particular_ freedom, _e.g._ freedom of faith; _i.e._ the believing
man wanted to be free and independent; of what?  of faith perhaps?  no!
but of the inquisitors of faith.  So now “political or civil” freedom.
The citizen wants to become free not from citizenhood, but from
bureaucracy, the arbitrariness of princes, etc.  Prince Metternich once
said he had “found a way that was adapted to guide men in the path of
_genuine_ freedom for all the future.” The Count of Provence ran away
from France precisely at the time when he was preparing the “reign of
freedom,” and said: “My imprisonment had become intolerable to me; I had
only one passion, the desire for _freedom_; I thought only of it.”

The craving for a _particular_ freedom always includes the purpose of a
new _dominion_, as it was with the Revolution, which indeed “could give
its defenders the uplifting feeling that they were fighting for
freedom,” but in truth only because they were after a particular
freedom, therefore a new _dominion_, the “dominion of the law.”

Freedom you all want, you want _freedom_.  Why then do you haggle over a
more or less?  _Freedom_ can only be the whole of freedom; a piece of
freedom is not _freedom_.  You despair of the possibility of obtaining
the whole of freedom, freedom from everything — yes, you consider it
insanity even to wish this?  — Well, then leave off chasing after the
phantom, and spend your pains on something better than the —
_unattainable_.

“Ah, but there is nothing better than freedom!”

What have you then when you have freedom, _viz_., — for I will not speak
here of your piecemeal bits of freedom — complete freedom?  Then you are
rid of everything that embarrasses you, everything, and there is
probably nothing that does not once in your life embarrass you and cause
you inconvenience.  And for whose sake, then, did you want to be rid of
it?  Doubtless _for your_ sake, because it is in _your_ way!  But, if
something were not inconvenient to you; if, on the contrary, it were
quite to your mind (_e.g._ the gently but _irresistibly commanding_ look
of your loved one) — then you would not want to be rid of it and free
from it.  Why not?  For _your sake_ again!  So you take _yourselves_ as
measure and judge over all.  You gladly let freedom go when unfreedom,
the “sweet service of love,” suits _you_; and you take up your freedom
again on occasion when it begins to suit _you_ better — _i.  e._,
supposing, which is not the point here, that you are not afraid of such
a Repeal of the Union for other (perhaps religious) reasons.

Why will you not take courage now to really make _yourselves_ the
central point and the main thing altogether?  Why grasp in the air at
freedom, your dream?  Are you your dream?  Do not begin by inquiring of
your dreams, your notions, your thoughts, for that is all “hollow
theory.” Ask yourselves and ask after yourselves — that is _practical_,
and you know you want very much to be “practical.” But there the one
hearkens what his God (of course what he thinks of at the name God is
his God) may be going to say to it, and another what his moral feelings,
his conscience, his feeling of duty, may determine about it, and a third
calculates what folks will think of it — and, when each has thus asked
his Lord God (folks are a Lord God just as good as, nay, even more
compact than, the other-worldly and imaginary one: _vox populi, vox
dei)_, then he accommodates himself to his Lord’s will and listens no
more at all for what _he himself_ would like to say and decide.

Therefore turn to yourselves rather than to your gods or idols.  Bring
out from yourselves what is in you, bring it to the light, bring
yourselves to revelation.

How one acts only from himself, and asks after nothing further, the
Christians have realized in the notion “God.” He acts “as it pleases
him.” And foolish man, who could do just so, is to act as it “pleases
God” instead.  — If it is said that even God proceeds according to
eternal laws, that too fits me, since I too cannot get out of my skin,
but have my law in my whole nature, _i.e._ in myself.

But one needs only admonish you of yourselves to bring you to despair at
once.  “What am I?” each of you asks himself.  An abyss of lawless and
unregulated impulses, desires, wishes, passions, a chaos without light
or guiding star!  How am I to obtain a correct answer, if, without
regard to God’s commandments or to the duties which morality prescribes,
without regard to the voice of reason, which in the course of history,
after bitter experiences, has exalted the best and most reasonable thing
into law, I simply appeal to myself?  My passion would advise me to do
the most senseless thing possible.  — Thus each deems himself the —
devil; for, if, so far as he is unconcerned about religion, etc., he
only deemed himself a beast, he would easily find that the beast, which
does follow only _its_ impulse (as it were, its advice), does not advise
and impel itself to do the “most senseless” things, but takes very
correct steps.  But the habit of the religious way of thinking has
biased our mind so grievously that we are — terrified at _ourselves_ in
our nakedness and naturalness; it has degraded us so that we deem
ourselves depraved by nature, born devils.  Of course it comes into your
head at once that your calling requires you to do the “good,” the moral,
the right.  Now, if you ask _yourselves_ what is to be done, how can the
right voice sound forth from you, the voice which points the way of the
good, the right, the true, etc.?  What concord have God and Belial?

But what would you think if one answered you by saying: “That one is to
listen to God, conscience, duties, laws, and so forth, is flim-flam with
which people have stuffed your head and heart and made you crazy”?  And
if he asked you how it is that you know so surely that the voice of
nature is a seducer?  And if he even demanded of you to turn the thing
about and actually to deem the voice of God and conscience to be the
devil’s work?  There are such graceless men; how will you settle them?
You cannot appeal to your parsons, parents, and good men, for precisely
these are designated by them as your _seducers_, as the true seducers
and corrupters of youth, who busily sow broadcast the tares of
self-contempt and reverence to God, who fill young hearts with mud and
young heads with stupidity.

But now those people go on and ask: For whose sake do you care about
God’s and the other commandments?  You surely do not suppose that this
is done merely out of complaisance toward God?  No, you are doing it —
_for your sake_ again.  — Here too, therefore, _you_ are the main thing,
and each must say to himself, _I_ am everything to myself and I do
everything _on my_ account.  If it ever became clear to you that God,
the commandments, etc., only harm you, that they reduce and ruin _you_,
to a certainty you would throw them from you just as the Christians once
condemned Apollo or Minerva or heathen morality.  They did indeed put in
the place of these Christ and afterward Mary, as well as a Christian
morality; but they did this for the sake of _their_ souls’ welfare too,
therefore out of egoism or ownness.

And it was by this egoism, this ownness, that they got _rid_ of the old
world of gods and became _free_ from it.  Ownness _created_ a new
_freedom_; for ownness is the creator of everything, as genius (a
definite ownness), which is always originality, has for a long time
already been looked upon as the creator of new productions that have a
place in the history of the world.

If your efforts are ever to make “freedom” the issue, then exhaust
freedom’s demands.  Who is it that is to become free?  You, I, we.  Free
from what?  From everything that is not you, not I, not we.  I,
therefore, am the kernel that is to be delivered from all wrappings and
— freed from all cramping shells.  What is left when I have been freed
from everything that is not I?  Only I; nothing but I.  But freedom has
nothing to offer to this I himself.  As to what is now to happen further
after I have become free, freedom is silent — as our governments, when
the prisoner’s time is up, merely let him go, thrusting him out into
abandonment.

Now why, if freedom is striven after for love of the I after all — why
not choose the I himself as beginning, middle, and end?  Am I not worth
more than freedom?  Is it not I that make myself free, am not I the
first?  Even unfree, even laid in a thousand fetters, I yet am; and I am
not, like freedom, extant only in the future and in hopes, but even as
the most abject of slaves I am — present.

Think that over well, and decide whether you will place on your banner
the dream of “freedom” or the resolution of “egoism,” of “ownness.”
“Freedom” awakens your _rage_ against everything that is not you;
“egoism” calls you to _joy_ over yourselves, to self-enjoyment;
“freedom” is and remains a _longing_ , a romantic plaint, a Christian
hope for unearthliness and futurity; “ownness” is a reality, which _of
itself_ removes just so much unfreedom as by barring your own way
hinders you.  What does not disturb you, you will not want to renounce;
and, if it begins to disturb you, why, you know that “you must obey
_yourselves_ rather than men!”

Freedom teaches only: Get yourselves rid, relieve yourselves, of
everything burdensome; it does not teach you who you yourselves are.
Rid, rid!  So call, get rid even of yourselves, “deny yourselves.” But
ownness calls you back to yourselves, it says “Come to yourself!” Under
the aegis of freedom you get rid of many kinds of things, but something
new pinches you again: “you are rid of the Evil One; evil is left.”[53]
As _own_ you are _really rid of everything_, and what clings to you _you
have accepted_; it is your choice and your pleasure.  The _own_ man is
the _free-born_, the man free to begin with; the free man, on the
contrary, is only the _eleutheromaniac_, the dreamer and enthusiast.

The former is _originally free_, because he recognizes nothing but
himself; he does not need to free himself first, because at the start he
rejects everything outside himself, because he prizes nothing more than
himself, rates nothing higher, because, in short, he starts from himself
and “comes to himself.” Constrained by childish respect, he is
nevertheless already working at “freeing” himself from this constraint.
Ownness works in the little egoist, and procures him the desired —
freedom.

Thousands of years of civilization have obscured to you what you are,
have made you believe you are not egoists but are _called_ to be
idealists (“good men”).  Shake that off!  Do not seek for freedom, which
does precisely deprive you of yourselves, in “self-denial”; but seek for
_yourselves_, become egoists, become each of you an _almighty ego_.  Or,
more clearly: Just recognize yourselves again, just recognize what you
really are, and let go your hypocritical endeavors, your foolish mania
to be something else than you are.  Hypocritical I call them because you
have yet remained egoists all these thousands of years, but sleeping,
self-deceiving, crazy egoists, you _Heautontimorumenoses_, you self-
tormentors.  Never yet has a religion been able to dispense with
“promises,” whether they referred us to the other world or to this
(“long life,” etc.); for man is _mercenary_ and does nothing “gratis.”
But how about that “doing the good for the good’s sake” without prospect
of reward?  As if here too the pay was not contained in the satisfaction
that it is to afford.  Even religion, therefore, is founded on our
egoism and — exploits it; calculated for our _desires_, it stifles many
others for the sake of one.  This then gives the phenomenon of _cheated_
egoism, where I satisfy, not myself, but one of my desires, _e.g._ the
impulse toward blessedness.  Religion promises me the — “supreme good”;
to gain this I no longer regard any other of my desires, and do not
slake them.  — All your doings are _unconfessed_ , secret, covert, and
concealed egoism.  But because they are egoism that you are unwilling to
confess to yourselves, that you keep secret from yourselves, hence not
manifest and public egoism, consequently unconscious egoism — therefore
they are _not egoism_, but thraldom, service, self-renunciation; you are
egoists, and you are not, since you renounce egoism.  Where you seem
most to be such, you have drawn upon the word “egoist” — loathing and
contempt.

I secure my freedom with regard to the world in the degree that I make
the world my own, _i.e._ “gain it and take possession of it” for myself,
by whatever might, by that of persuasion, of petition, of categorical
demand, yes, even by hypocrisy, cheating, etc.; for the means that I use
for it are determined by what I am.  If I am weak, I have only weak
means, like the aforesaid, which yet are good enough for a considerable
part of the world.  Besides, cheating, hypocrisy, lying, look worse than
they are.  Who has not cheated the police, the law?  Who has not quickly
taken on an air of honourable loyalty before the sheriff’s officer who
meets him, in order to conceal an illegality that may have been
committed, etc.?  He who has not done it has simply let violence be done
to him; he was a _weakling_ from — conscience.  I know that my freedom
is diminished even by my not being able to carry out my will on another
object, be this other something without will, like a rock, or something
with will, like a government, an individual; I deny my ownness when — in
presence of another — I give myself up, _i.e._ give way, desist, submit;
therefore by _loyalty, submission_.  For it is one thing when I give up
my previous course because it does not lead to the goal, and therefore
turn out of a wrong road; it is another when I yield myself a prisoner.
I get around a rock that stands in my way, till I have powder enough to
blast it; I get around the laws of a people, till I have gathered
strength to overthrow them.  Because I cannot grasp the moon, is it
therefore to be “sacred” to me, an Astarte?  If I only could grasp you,
I surely would, and, if I only find a means to get up to you, you shall
not frighten me!  You inapprehensible one, you shall remain
inapprehensible to me only till I have acquired the might for
apprehension and call you my _own_; I do not give myself up before you,
but only bide my time.  Even if for the present I put up with my
inability to touch you, I yet remember it against you.

Vigorous men have always done so.  When the “loyal” had exalted an
unsubdued power to be their master and had adored it, when they had
demanded adoration from all, then there came some such son of nature who
would not loyally submit, and drove the adored power from its
inaccessible Olympus.  He cried his “Stand still” to the rolling sun,
and made the earth go round; the loyal had to make the best of it; he
laid his axe to the sacred oaks, and the “loyal” were astonished that no
heavenly fire consumed him; he threw the pope off Peter’s chair, and the
“loyal” had no way to hinder it; he is tearing down the divine-right
business, and the “loyal” croak in vain, and at last are silent.

My freedom becomes complete only when it is my — _might_; but by this I
cease to be a merely free man, and become an own man.  Why is the
freedom of the peoples a “hollow word”?  Because the peoples have no
might!  With a breath of the living ego I blow peoples over, be it the
breath of a Nero, a Chinese emperor, or a poor writer.  Why is it that
the G...  [54] legislatures pine in vain for freedom, and are lectured
for it by the cabinet ministers?  Because they are not of the “mighty”!
Might is a fine thing, and useful for many purposes; for “one goes
further with a handful of might than with a bagful of right.” You long
for freedom?  You fools!  If you took might, freedom would come of
itself.  See, he who has might “stands above the law.” How does this
prospect taste to you, you “law-abiding” people?  But you have no taste!

The cry for “freedom” rings loudly all around.  But is it felt and known
what a donated or chartered freedom must mean?  It is not recognized in
the full amplitude of the word that all freedom is essentially —
self-liberation — _i.e._ that I can have only so much freedom as I
procure for myself by my ownness.  Of what use is it to sheep that no
one abridges their freedom of speech?  They stick to bleating.  Give one
who is inwardly a Mohammedan, a Jew, or a Christian, permission to speak
what he likes: he will yet utter only narrow-minded stuff.  If, on the
contrary, certain others rob you of the freedom of speaking and hearing,
they know quite rightly wherein lies their temporary advantage, as you
would perhaps be able to say and hear something whereby those “certain”
persons would lose their credit.

If they nevertheless give you freedom, they are simply knaves who give
more than they have.  For then they give you nothing of their own, but
stolen wares: they give you your own freedom, the freedom that you must
take for yourselves; and they _give_ it to you only that you may not
take it and call the thieves and cheats to an account to boot.  In their
slyness they know well that given (chartered) freedom is no freedom,
since only the freedom one _takes_ for himself, therefore the egoist’s
freedom, rides with full sails.  Donated freedom strikes its sails as
soon as there comes a storm — or calm; it requires always a — gentle and
moderate breeze.

Here lies the difference between self-liberation and emancipation
(manumission, setting free).  Those who today “stand in the opposition”
are thirsting and screaming to be “set free.” The princes are to
“declare their peoples of age,” _i.  e._, emancipate them!  Behave as if
you were of age, and you are so without any declaration of majority; if
you do not behave accordingly, you are not worthy of it, and would never
be of age even by a declaration of majority.  When the Greeks were of
age, they drove out their tyrants, and, when the son is of age, he makes
himself independent of his father.  If the Greeks had waited till their
tyrants graciously allowed them their majority, they might have waited
long.  A sensible father throws out a son who will not come of age, and
keeps the house to himself; it serves the noodle right.

The man who is set free is nothing but a freed man, a _libertinus_, a
dog dragging a piece of chain with him: he is an unfree man in the
garment of freedom, like the ass in the lion’s skin.  Emancipated Jews
are nothing bettered in themselves, but only relieved as Jews, although
he who relieves their condition is certainly more than a churchly
Christian, as the latter cannot do this without inconsistency.  But,
emancipated or not emancipated, Jew remains Jew; he who is not
self-freed is merely an — emancipated man.  The Protestant State can
certainly set free (emancipate) the Catholics; but, because they do not
make themselves free, they remain simply — Catholics.

Selfishness and unselfishness have already been spoken of.  The friends
of freedom are exasperated against selfishness because in their
religious striving after freedom they cannot — free themselves from that
sublime thing, “self-renunciation.” The liberal’s anger is directed
against egoism, for the egoist, you know, never takes trouble about a
thing for the sake of the thing, but for his sake: the thing must serve
him.  It is egoistic to ascribe to no thing a value of its own, an
“absolute” value, but to seek its value in me.  One often hears that
pot-boiling study which is so common counted among the most repulsive
traits of egoistic behavior, because it manifests the most shameful
desecration of science; but what is science for but to be consumed?  If
one does not know how to use it for anything better than to keep the pot
boiling, then his egoism is a petty one indeed, because this egoist’s
power is a limited power; but the egoistic element in it, and the
desecration of science, only a possessed man can blame.

Because Christianity, incapable of letting the individual count as an
ego,[_“Einzige”_] thought of him only as a dependent, and was properly
nothing but a _social theory —_ a doctrine of living together, and that
of man with God as well as of man with man — therefore in it everything
“own” must fall into most woeful disrepute: selfishness, self-will,
ownness, self-love, etc.  The Christian way of looking at things has on
all sides gradually re-stamped honourable words into dishonorable; why
should they not be brought into honor again?  So _Schimpf_ (contumely)
is in its old sense equivalent to jest, but for Christian seriousness
pastime became a dishonor,[I take _Entbehrung_, “destitution,” to be a
misprint for _Entehrung_] for that seriousness cannot take a joke;
_frech_ (impudent) formerly meant only bold, brave; _Frevel_ (wanton
outrage) was only daring.  It is well known how askance the word
“reason” was looked at for a long time.

Our language has settled itself pretty well to the Christian standpoint,
and the general consciousness is still too Christian not to shrink in
terror from everything un-Christian as from something incomplete or
evil.  Therefore “selfishness” is in a bad way too.

Selfishness,[_Eigennutz_, literally “own-use”] in the Christian sense,
means something like this: I look only to see whether anything is of use
to me as a sensual man.  But is sensuality then the whole of my ownness?
Am I in my own senses when I am given up to sensuality?  Do I follow
myself, my own determination, when I follow that?  I am my _own_ only
when I am master of myself, instead of being mastered either by
sensuality or by anything else (God, man, authority, law, State, Church,
etc.); what is of use to me, this self-owned or self-appertaining one,
my selfishness pursues.

Besides, one sees himself every moment compelled to believe in that
constantly-blasphemed selfishness as an all-controlling power.  In the
session of February 10, 1844, Welcker argues a motion on the dependence
of the judges, and sets forth in a detailed speech that removable,
dismissable, transferable, and pensionable judges — in short, such
members of a court of justice as can by mere administrative process be
damaged and endangered — are wholly without reliability, yes, lose all
respect and all confidence among the people.  The whole bench, Welcker
cries, is demoralized by this dependence!  In blunt words this means
nothing else than that the judges find it more to their advantage to
give judgment as the ministers would have them than to give it as the
law would have them.  How is that to be helped?  Perhaps by bringing
home to the judges’ hearts the ignominiousness of their venality, and
then cherishing the confidence that they will repent and henceforth
prize justice more highly than their selfishness?  No, the people does
not soar to this romantic confidence, for it feels that selfishness is
mightier than any other motive.  Therefore the same persons who have
been judges hitherto may remain so, however thoroughly one has convinced
himself that they behaved as egoists; only they must not any longer find
their selfishness favored by the venality of justice, but must stand so
independent of the government that by a judgment in conformity with the
facts they do not throw into the shade their own cause, their
“well-understood interest,” but rather secure a comfortable combination
of a good salary with respect among the citizens.

So Welcker and the commoners of Baden consider themselves secured only
when they can count on selfishness.  What is one to think, then, of the
countless phrases of unselfishness with which their mouths overflow at
other times?

To a cause which I am pushing selfishly I have another relation than to
one which I am serving unselfishly.  The following criterion might be
cited for it; against the one I can _sin_ or commit a _sin_, the other I
can only _trifle away_, push from me, deprive myself of — _i.e._ commit
an imprudence.  Free trade is looked at in both ways, being regarded
partly as a freedom which may _under certain circumstances_ be granted
or withdrawn, partly as one which is to be held _sacred under all
circumstances_.

If I am not concerned about a thing in and for itself, and do not desire
it for its own sake, then I desire it solely as a _means to an end_, for
its usefulness; for the sake of another end, _e.g._, oysters for a
pleasant flavor.  Now will not every thing whose final end he himself
is, serve the egoist as means?  And is he to protect a thing that serves
him for nothing — _e.g._, the proletarian to protect the State?

Ownness includes in itself everything own, and brings to honor again
what Christian language dishonored.  But ownness has not any alien
standard either, as it is not in any sense an _idea_ like freedom,
morality, humanity, etc.: it is only a description of the — _owner_.

** II.  The Owner

I — do I come to myself and mine through liberalism?  Whom does the
liberal look upon as his equal?  Man!  Be only man — and that you are
anyway — and the liberal calls you his brother.  He asks very little
about your private opinions and private follies, if only he can espy
“Man” in you.

But, as he takes little heed of what you are _privatim_ — nay, in a
strict following out of his principle sets no value at all on it — he
sees in you only what you are _generatim_.  In other words, he sees in
you, not you, but the _species;_ not Tom or Jim, but Man; not the real
or unique one,[_Einzigen_] but your essence or your concept; not the
bodily man, but the _spirit_.

As Tom you would not be his equal, because he is Jim, therefore not Tom;
as man you are the same that he is.  And, since as Tom you virtually do
not exist at all for him (so far, to wit, as he is a liberal and not
unconsciously an egoist), he has really made “brother-love” very easy
for himself: he loves in you not Tom, of whom he knows nothing and wants
to know nothing, but Man.

To see in you and me nothing further than “men,” that is running the
Christian way of looking at things, according to which one is for the
other nothing but a _concept_ (_e.g._ a man called to salvation, etc.),
into the ground.

Christianity properly so called gathers us under a less utterly general
concept: there we are “sons of God” and “led by the Spirit of God.”[55]
Yet not all can boast of being God’s sons, but “the same Spirit which
witnesses to our spirit that we are sons of God reveals also who are the
sons of the devil.”[56] Consequently, to be a son of God one must not be
a son of the devil; the sonship of God excluded certain men.  To be
_sons of men_ — _i.  e._, men — on the contrary, we need nothing but to
belong to the human _species_, need only to be specimens of the same
species.  What I am as this I is no concern of yours as a good liberal,
but is my _private affair_ alone; enough that we are both sons of one
and the same mother, to wit, the human species: as “a son of man” I am
your equal.

What am I now to you?  Perhaps this _bodily_ I as I walk and stand?
Anything but that.  This bodily I, with its thoughts, decisions, and
passions, is in your eyes a “private affair” which is no concern of
yours: it is an “affair by itself.” As an “affair for you” there exists
only my concept, my generic concept, only _the Man_, who, as he is
called Tom, could just as well be Joe or Dick.  You see in me not me,
the bodily man, but an unreal thing, the spook, _i.e._ a _Man_.

In the course of the Christian centuries we declared the most various
persons to be “our equals,” but each time in the measure of that
_spirit_ which we expected from them — _e.g._ each one in whom the
spirit of the need of redemption may be assumed, then later each one who
has the spirit of integrity, finally each one who shows a human spirit
and a human face.  Thus the fundamental principle of “equality” varied.

Equality being now conceived as equality of the _human spirit_, there
has certainly been discovered an equality that includes _all_ men; for
who could deny that we men have a human spirit, _i.  e._, no other than
a human!

But are we on that account further on now than in the beginning of
Christianity?  Then we were to have a _divine spirit_, now a _human;_
but, if the divine did not exhaust us, how should the human wholly
express what _we_ are?  Feuerbach _e.g._ thinks, that if he humanizes
the divine, he has found the truth.  No, if God has given us pain, “Man”
is capable of pinching us still more torturingly.  The long and the
short of it is this: that we are men is the slightest thing about us,
and has significance only in so far as it is one of our
_qualities_,[_Eigenschaften_] _i.  e._ our property.[_Eigentum_] I am
indeed among other things a man, as I am _e.g._ a living being,
therefore an animal, or a European, a Berliner, etc.; but he who chose
to have regard for me only as a man, or as a Berliner, would pay me a
regard that would be very unimportant to me.  And wherefore?  Because he
would have regard only for one of my _qualities_, not for _me_.

It is just so with the _spirit too_.  A Christian spirit, an upright
spirit, etc.  may well be my acquired quality, my property, but I am not
this spirit: it is mine, not I its.

Hence we have in liberalism only the continuation of the old Christian
depreciation of the I, the bodily Tom.  Instead of taking me as I am,
one looks solely at my property, my qualities, and enters into marriage
bonds with me only for the sake of my — possessions; one marries, as it
were, what I have, not what I am.  The Christian takes hold of my
spirit, the liberal of my humanity.

But, if the spirit, which is not regarded as the _property_ of the
bodily ego but as the proper ego itself, is a ghost, then the Man too,
who is not recognized as my quality but as the proper I, is nothing but
a spook, a thought, a concept.

Therefore the liberal too revolves in the same circle as the Christian.
Because the spirit of mankind, _i.e._ Man, dwells in you, you are a man,
as when the spirit of Christ dwells in you are a Christian; but, because
it dwells in you only as a second ego, even though it be as your proper
or “better” ego, it remains otherworldly to you, and you have to strive
to become wholly man.  A striving just as fruitless as the Christian’s
to become wholly a blessed spirit!

One can now, after liberalism has proclaimed Man, declare openly that
herewith was only completed the consistent carrying out of Christianity,
and that in truth Christianity set itself no other task from the start
than to realize “man,” the “true man.” Hence, then, the illusion that
Christianity ascribes an infinite value to the ego (as _e.g._ in the
doctrine of immortality, in the cure of souls, etc.) comes to light.
No, it assigns this value to _Man_ alone.  Only _Man_ is immortal, and
only because I am Man am I too immortal.  In fact, Christianity had to
teach that no one is lost, just as liberalism too puts all on an
equality as men; but that eternity, like this equality, applied only to
the _Man_ in me, not to me.  Only as the bearer and harborer of Man do I
not die, as notoriously “the king never dies.” Louis dies, but the king
remains; I die, but my spirit, Man, remains.  To identify me now
entirely with Man the demand has been invented, and stated, that I must
become a “real generic being.”[57]

The HUMAN _religion_ is only the last metamorphosis of the Christian
religion.  For liberalism is a religion because it separates my essence
from me and sets it above me, because it exalts “Man” to the same extent
as any other religion does its God or idol, because it makes what is
mine into something otherworldly, because in general it makes out of
what is mine, out of my qualities and my property, something alien — to
wit, an “essence”; in short, because it sets me beneath Man, and thereby
creates for me a “vocation.” But liberalism declares itself a religion
in form too when it demands for this supreme being, Man, a zeal of
faith, “a faith that some day will at last prove its fiery zeal too, a
zeal that will be invincible.”[58] But, as liberalism is a human
religion, its professor takes a _tolerant_ attitude toward the professor
of any other (Catholic, Jewish, etc.), as Frederick the Great did toward
every one who performed his duties as a subject, whatever fashion of
becoming blest he might be inclined toward.  This religion is now to be
raised to the rank of the generally customary one, and separated from
the others as mere “private follies,” toward which, besides, one takes a
highly _liberal_ attitude on account of their unessentialness.

One may call it the _State-religion_, the religion of the “free State,”
not in the sense hitherto current that it is the one favored or
privileged by the State, but as that religion which the “free State” not
only has the right, but is compelled, to demand from each of those who
belong to it, let him be _privatim_ a Jew, a Christian, or anything
else.  For it does the same service to the State as filial piety to the
family.  If the family is to be recognized and maintained, in its
existing condition, by each one of those who belong to it, then to him
the tie of blood must be sacred, and his feeling for it must be that of
piety, of respect for the ties of blood, by which every blood-relation
becomes to him a consecrated person.  So also to every member of the
State-community this community must be sacred, and the concept which is
the highest to the State must likewise be the highest to him.

But what concept is the highest to the State?  Doubtless that of being a
really human society, a society in which every one who is really a man,
_i.  e._, _not an un-man_, can obtain admission as a member.  Let a
State’s tolerance go ever so far, toward an un-man and toward what is
inhuman it ceases.  And yet this “un-man” is a man, yet the “inhuman”
itself is something human, yes, possible only to a man, not to any
beast; it is, in fact, something “possible to man.” But, although every
un-man is a man, yet the State excludes him; _i.e._ it locks him up, or
transforms him from a fellow of the State into a fellow of the prison
(fellow of the lunatic asylum or hospital, according to Communism).

To say in blunt words what an un-man is not particularly hard: it is a
man who does not correspond to the _concept_ man, as the inhuman is
something human which is not conformed to the concept of the human.
Logic calls this a “self-contradictory judgment.” Would it be
permissible for one to pronounce this judgment, that one can be a man
without being a man, if he did not admit the hypothesis that the concept
of man can be separated from the existence, the essence from the
appearance?  They say, he _appears_ indeed as a man, but _is_ not a man.

Men have passed this “self-contradictory judgment” through a long line
of centuries!  Nay, what is still more, in this long time there were
only — _un-men_.  What individual can have corresponded to his concept?
Christianity knows only one Man, and this one — Christ — is at once an
un-man again in the reverse sense, to wit, a superhuman man, a “God.”
Only the — un-man is a _real_ man.

Men that are not men, what should they be but _ghosts?_ Every real man,
because he does not correspond to the concept “man,” or because he is
not a “generic man,” is a spook.  But do I still remain an un-man even
if I bring Man (who towered above me and remained otherworldly to me
only as my ideal, my task, my essence or concept) down to be my
_quality_, my own and inherent in me; so that Man is nothing else than
my humanity, my human existence, and everything that I do is human
precisely because _I_ do it, but not because it corresponds to the
_concept_ “man”?  _I_ am really Man and the un-man in one; for I am a
man and at the same time more than a man; _i.e._ I am the ego of this my
mere quality.

It had to come to this at last, that it was no longer merely demanded of
us to be Christians, but to become men; for, though we could never
really become even Christians, but always remained “poor sinners” (for
the Christian was an unattainable ideal too), yet in this the
contradictoriness did not come before our consciousness so, and the
illusion was easier than now when of us, who are men act humanly (yes,
cannot do otherwise than be such and act so), the demand is made that we
are to be men, “real men.”

Our States of today, because they still have all sorts of things
sticking to them, left from their churchly mother, do indeed load those
who belong to them with various obligations (_e.g._ churchly
religiousness) which properly do not a bit concern them, the States; yet
on the whole they do not deny their significance, since they want to be
looked upon as _human societies_, in which man as man can be a member,
even if he is less privileged than other members; most of them admit
adherence of every religious sect, and receive people without
distinction of race or nation: Jews, Turks, Moors, etc., can become
French citizens.  In the act of reception, therefore, the State looks
only to see whether one is a _man_.  The Church, as a society of
believers, could not receive every man into her bosom; the State, as a
society of men, can.  But, when the State has carried its principle
clear through, of presupposing in its constituents nothing but that they
are men (even the North Americans still presuppose in theirs that they
have religion, at least the religion of integrity, of responsibility),
then it has dug its grave.  While it will fancy that those whom it
possesses are without exception men, these have meanwhile become without
exception _egoists_, each of whom utilizes it according to his egoistic
powers and ends.  Against the egoists “human society” is wrecked; for
they no longer have to do with each other as _men_, but appear
egoistically as an _I_ against a _You_ altogether different from me and
in opposition to me.

If the State must count on our humanity, it is the same if one says it
must count on our _morality_.  Seeing Man in each other, and acting as
men toward each other, is called moral behavior.  This is every whit the
“spiritual love” of Christianity.  For, if I see Man in you, as in
myself I see Man and nothing but Man, then I care for you as I would
care for myself; for we represent, you see, nothing but the mathematical
proposition: A = C and B = C, consequently A = B — _i.e._ I nothing but
man and you nothing but man, consequently I and you the same.  Morality
is incompatible with egoism, because the former does not allow validity
to _me_, but only to the Man in me.  But, if the State is a _society of
men_, not a union of egos each of whom has only himself before his eyes,
then it cannot last without morality, and must insist on morality.

Therefore we two, the State and I, are enemies.  I, the egoist, have not
at heart the welfare of this “human society,” I sacrifice nothing to it,
I only utilize it; but to be able to utilize it completely I transform
it rather into my property and my creature; _i.  e._, I annihilate it,
and form in its place the _Union of Egoists_.

So the State betrays its enmity to me by demanding that I be a man,
which presupposes that I may also not be a man, but rank for it as an
“un- man”; it imposes being a man upon me as a _duty_.  Further, it
desires me to do nothing along with which _it_ cannot last; so _its
permanence_ is to be sacred for me.  Then I am not to be an egoist, but
a “respectable, upright,” _i.e._ moral, man.  Enough: before it and its
permanence I am to be impotent and respectful.

This State, not a present one indeed, but still in need of being first
created, is the ideal of advancing liberalism.  There is to come into
existence a true “society of men,” in which every “man” finds room.
Liberalism means to realize “Man,” _i.e._ create a world for him; and
this should be the _human_ world or the general (Communistic) society of
men.  It was said, “The Church could regard only the spirit, the State
is to regard the whole man.”[59] But is not “Man” “spirit”?  The kernel
of the State is simply “Man,” this unreality, and it itself is only a
“society of men.” The world which the believer (believing spirit)
creates is called Church, the world which the man (human or humane
spirit) creates is called State.  But that is not _my_ world.  I never
execute anything _human_ in the abstract, but always my _own_ things;
_my_ human act is diverse from every other human act, and only by this
diversity is it a real act belonging to me.  The human in it is an
abstraction, and, as such, spirit, _i.e._ abstracted essence.

Bruno Bauer states (_e.g.  Judenfrage_, p.  84) that the truth of
criticism is the final truth, and in fact the truth sought for by
Christianity itself — to wit, “Man.” He says, “The history of the
Christian world is the history of the supreme fight for truth, for in it
— and in it only!  — the thing at issue is the discovery of the final or
the primal truth — man and freedom.”

All right, let us accept this gain, and let us take _man_ as the
ultimately found result of Christian history and of the religious or
ideal efforts of man in general.  Now, who is Man?  _I_ am!  _Man_, the
end and outcome of Christianity, is, as _I_, the beginning and raw
material of the new history, a history of enjoyment after the history of
sacrifices, a history not of man or humanity, but of — _me.  Man_ ranks
as the general.  Now then, I and the egoistic are the really general,
since every one is an egoist and of paramount importance to himself.
The Jewish is not the purely egoistic, because the Jew still devotes
_himself_ to Jehovah; the Christian is not, because the Christian lives
on the grace of God and subjects _himself_ to him.  As Jew and as
Christian alike a man satisfies only certain of his wants, only a
certain need, not _himself:_ a half-egoism, because the egoism of a
half-man, who is half he, half Jew, or half his own proprietor, half a
slave.  Therefore, too, Jew and Christian always half-way exclude each
other; _i.e._ as men they recognize each other, as slaves they exclude
each other, because they are servants of two different masters.  If they
could be complete egoists, they would exclude each other _wholly_ and
hold together so much the more firmly.  Their ignominy is not that they
exclude each other, but that this is done only _half-way_.  Bruno Bauer,
on the contrary, thinks Jews and Christians cannot regard and treat each
other as “men” till they give up the separate essence which parts them
and obligates them to eternal separation, recognize the general essence
of “Man,” and regard this as their “true essence.”

According to his representation the defect of the Jews and the
Christians alike lies in their wanting to be and have something
“particular” instead of only being men and endeavoring after what is
human — to wit, the “general rights of man.” He thinks their fundamental
error consists in the belief that they are “privileged,” possess
“prerogatives”; in general, in the belief in _prerogative_.[_Vorrecht_,
literally “precedent right”] In opposition to this he holds up to them
the general rights of man.  The rights of man!  —

_Man is man in general_, and in so far every one who is a man.  Now
every one is to have the eternal rights of man, and, according to the
opinion of Communism, enjoy them in the complete “democracy,” or, as it
ought more correctly to be called — anthropocracy.  But it is I alone
who have everything that I — procure for myself; as man I have nothing.
People would like to give every man an affluence of all good, merely
because he has the title “man.” But I put the accent on _me_, not on my
being _man_.

Man is something only as _my_ quality[_Eigenschaft_]
(property[_Eigentum_]), like masculinity or femininity.  The ancients
found the ideal in one’s being _male_ in the full sense; their virtue is
_virtus_ and _arete_ — _i.e._ manliness.  What is one to think of a
woman who should want only to be perfectly “woman?” That is not given to
all, and many a one would therein be fixing for herself an unattainable
goal.  _Feminine_, on the other hand, she is anyhow, by nature;
femininity is her quality, and she does not need “true femininity.” I am
a man just as the earth is a star.  As ridiculous as it would be to set
the earth the task of being a “thorough star,” so ridiculous it is to
burden me with the call to be a “thorough man.”

When Fichte says, “The ego is all,” this seems to harmonize perfectly
with my thesis.  But it is not that the ego _is_ all, but the ego
_destroys_ all, and only the self-dissolving ego, the never-being ego,
the — _finite_ ego is really I.  Fichte speaks of the “absolute” ego,
but I speak of me, the transitory ego.

How natural is the supposition that _man_ and _ego_ mean the same!  And
yet one sees, _e.g._, by Feuerbach, that the expression “man” is to
designate the absolute ego, the _species_, not the transitory,
individual ego.  Egoism and humanity (humaneness) ought to mean the
same, but according to Feuerbach the individual can “only lift himself
above the limits of his individuality, but not above the laws, the
positive ordinances,of his species.”[60] But the species is nothing,
and, if the individual lifts himself above the limits of his
individuality, this is rather his very self as an individual; he exists
only in raising himself, he exists only in not remaining what he is;
otherwise he would be done, dead.  Man with the great M is only an
ideal, the species only something thought of.  To be a man is not to
realize the ideal of _Man_, but to present _oneself_, the individual.
It is not how I realize the _generally human_ that needs to be my task,
but how I satisfy myself.  I am my species, am without norm, without
law, without model, etc.  It is possible that I can make very little out
of myself; but this little is everything, and is better than what I
allow to be made out of me by the might of others, by the training of
custom, religion, the laws, the State.  Better — if the talk is to be of
better at all — better an unmannerly child than an old head on young
shoulders, better a mulish man than a man compliant in everything.  The
unmannerly and mulish fellow is still on the way to form himself
according to his own will; the prematurely knowing and compliant one is
determined by the “species,” the general demands — the species is law to
him.  He is _determined_[_bestimmt_] by it; for what else is the species
to him but his “destiny,”[_Bestimmung_] his “calling”?  Whether I look
to “humanity,” the species, in order to strive toward this ideal, or to
God and Christ with like endeavor, where is the essential dissimilarity?
At most the former is more washed-out than the latter.  As the
individual is the whole of nature, so he is the whole of the species
too.

Everything that I do, think — in short, my expression or manifestation —
is indeed _conditioned_ by what I am.  The Jew _e.g._ can will only thus
or thus, can “present himself” only thus; the Christian can present and
manifest himself only Christianly, etc.  If it were possible that you
could be a Jew or Christian, you would indeed bring out only what was
Jewish or Christian; but it is not possible; in the most rigorous
conduct you yet remain an _egoist_, a sinner against that concept —
_i.e._, _you_ are not the precise equivalent of Jew.  Now, because the
egoistic always keeps peeping through, people have inquired for a more
perfect concept which should really wholly express what you are, and
which, because it is your true nature, should contain all the laws of
your activity.  The most perfect thing of the kind has been attained in
“Man.” As a Jew you are too little, and the Jewish is not your task; to
be a Greek, a German, does not suffice.  But be a — man, then you have
everything; look upon the human as your calling.

Now I know what is expected of me, and the new catechism can be written.
The subject is again subjected to the predicate, the individual to
something general; the dominion is again secured to an _idea_, and the
foundation laid for a new _religion_.  This is a _step forward_ in the
domain of religion, and in particular of Christianity; not a step out
beyond it.

To step out beyond it leads into the _unspeakable_.  For me paltry
language has no word, and “the Word,” the Logos, is to me a “mere word.”

My _essence_ is sought for.  If not the Jew, the German, etc., then at
any rate it is — the man.  “Man is my essence.”

I am repulsive or repugnant to myself; I have a horror and loathing of
myself, I am a horror to myself, or, I am never enough for myself and
never do enough to satisfy myself.  From such feelings springs
self-dissolution or self-criticism.  Religiousness begins with
self-renunciation, ends with completed criticism.

I am possessed, and want to get rid of the “evil spirit.” How do I set
about it?  I fearlessly commit the sin that seems to the Christian the
most dire, the sin and blasphemy against the Holy Spirit.  “He who
blasphemes the Holy Spirit has no forgiveness forever, but is liable to
the eternal judgment!”[61] I want no forgiveness, and am not afraid of
the judgment.

_Man_ is the last evil _spirit_ or spook, the most deceptive or most
intimate, the craftiest liar with honest mien, the father of lies.

The egoist, turning against the demands and concepts of the present,
executes pitilessly the most measureless — _desecration_.  Nothing is
holy to him!

It would be foolish to assert that there is no power above mine.  Only
the attitude that I take toward it will be quite another than that of
the religious age: I shall be the _enemy_ of — every higher power, while
religion teaches us to make it our friend and be humble toward it.

The _desecrator_ puts forth his strength against every _fear of God_,
for fear of God would determine him in everything that he left standing
as sacred.  Whether it is the God or the Man that exercises the
hallowing power in the God-man — whether, therefore, anything is held
sacred for God’s sake or for Man’s (Humanity’s) — this does not change
the fear of God, since Man is revered as “supreme essence,” as much as
on the specifically religious standpoint God as “supreme essence” calls
for our fear and reverence; both overawe us.

The fear of God in the proper sense was shaken long ago, and a more or
less conscious “atheism,” externally recognizable by a wide-spread
“unchurchliness,” has involuntarily become the mode.  But what was taken
from God has been superadded to Man, and the power of humanity grew
greater in just the degree that of piety lost weight: “Man” is the God
of today, and fear of Man has taken the place of the old fear of God.

But, because Man represents only another Supreme Being, nothing in fact
has taken place but a metamorphosis in the Supreme Being, and the fear
of Man is merely an altered form of the fear of God.

Our atheists are pious people.

If in the so-called feudal times we held everything as a fief from God,
in the liberal period the same feudal relation exists with Man.  God was
the Lord, now Man is the Lord; God was the Mediator, now Man is; God was
the Spirit, now Man is.  In this three fold regard the feudal relation
has experienced a transformation.  For now, firstly, we hold as a fief
from all-powerful Man our _power_, which, because it comes from a
higher, is not called power or might, but “right” — the “rights of man”;
we further hold as a fief from him our position in the world, for he,
the mediator, mediates our _intercourse_ with others, which therefore
may not be otherwise than “human”; finally, we hold as a fief from him
ourselves — to wit, our own value, or all that we are worth — inasmuch
as we are worth nothing when _he_ does not dwell in us, and when or
where we are not “human.” The power is Man’s, the world is Man’s, I am
Man’s.

But am I not still unrestrained from declaring _myself_ the entitler,
the mediator, and the own self?  Then it runs thus:

My power is _my_ property.

My power _gives_ me property.

My power _am_ I myself, and through it am I my property.

*** I.  My Power

Right[62] is the _spirit of society_.  If society has a _will_ this will
is simply right: society exists only through right.  But, as it endures
only exercising a _sovereignty_ over individuals, right is its SOVEREIGN
WILL.  Aristotle says justice is the advantage of _society_.

All existing right is — _foreign law;_ some one makes me out to be in
the right, “does right by me.” But should I therefore be in the right if
all the world made me out so?  And yet what else is the right that I
obtain in the State, in society, but a right of those _foreign_ to me?
When a blockhead makes me out in the right, I grow distrustful of my
rightness; I don’t like to receive it from him.  But, even when a wise
man makes me out in the right, I nevertheless am not in the right on
that account.  Whether I am in the right is completely independent of
the fool’s making out and of the wise man’s.

All the same, we have coveted this right till now.  We seek for right,
and turn to the court for that purpose.  To what?  To a royal, a papal,
a popular court, etc.  Can a sultanic court declare another right than
that which the sultan has ordained to be right?  Can it make me out in
the right if I seek for a right that does not agree with the sultan’s
law?  Can it, _e.g._, concede to me high treason as a right, since it is
assuredly not a right according to the sultan’s mind?  Can it as a court
of censorship allow me the free utterance of opinion as a right, since
the sultan will hear nothing of this _my_ right?  What am I seeking for
in this court, then?  I am seeking for sultanic right, not my right; I
am seeking for — _foreign_ right.  As long as this foreign right
harmonizes with mine, to be sure, I shall find in it the latter too.

The State does not permit pitching into each other man to man; it
opposes the _duel_.  Even every ordinary appeal to blows,
notwithstanding that neither of the fighters calls the police to it, is
punished; except when it is not an I whacking away at a you, but, say,
the _head of a family_ at the child.  The _family_ is entitled to this,
and in its name the father; I as Ego am not.

The _Vossische Zeitung_ presents to us the “commonwealth of right.”
There everything is to be decided by the judge and a _court_.  It ranks
the supreme court of censorship as a “court” where “right is declared.”
What sort of a right?  The right of the censorship.  To recognize the
sentences of that court as right one must regard the censorship as
right.  But it is thought nevertheless that this court offers a
protection.  Yes, protection against an individual censor’s error: it
protects only the censorship-legislator against false interpretation of
his will, at the same time making his statute, by the “sacred power of
right,” all the firmer against writers.

Whether I am in the right or not there is no judge but myself.  Others
can judge only whether they endorse my right, and whether it exists as
right for them too.

In the meantime let us take the matter yet another way.  I am to
reverence sultanic law in the sultanate, popular law in republics, canon
law in Catholic communities.  To these laws I am to subordinate myself;
I am to regard them as sacred.  A “sense of right” and “law-abiding
mind” of such a sort is so firmly planted in people’s heads that the
most revolutionary persons of our days want to subject us to a new
“sacred law,” the “law of society,” the law of mankind, the “right of
all,” and the like.  The right of “all” is to go before _my_ right.  As
a right of all it would indeed be my right among the rest, since I, with
the rest, am included in all; but that it is at the same time a right of
others, or even of all others, does not move me to its upholding.  Not
as a right _of all_ will I defend it, but as _my_ right; and then every
other may see to it how he shall likewise maintain it for himself.  The
right of all (_e.g.,_ to eat) is a right of every individual.  Let each
keep this right unabridged for _himself_, then all exercise it
spontaneously; let him not take care for all though — let him not grow
zealous for it as for a right of all.

But the social reformers preach to us a _“law of society”_.  There the
individual becomes society’s slave, and is in the right only when
society _makes him out_ in the right, _i.e._ when he lives according to
society’s _statutes_ and so is — _loyal_.  Whether I am loyal under a
despotism or in a “society” _à la_ Weitling, it is the same absence of
right in so far as in both cases I have not _my_ right but _foreign_
right.

In consideration of right the question is always asked, “What or who
gives me the right to it?” Answer: God, love, reason, nature, humanity,
etc.  No, only _your might, your_ power gives you the right (your
reason, _e.g.,_, may give it to you).

Communism, which assumes that men “have equal rights by nature,”
contradicts its own proposition till it comes to this, that men have no
right at all by nature.  For it is not willing to recognize, _e.g._,
that parents have “by nature” rights as against their children, or the
children as against the parents: it abolishes the family.  Nature gives
parents, brothers, etc., no right at all.  Altogether, this entire
revolutionary or Babouvist principle[63] rests on a religious, _i.  e._,
false, view of things.  Who can ask after “right” if he does not occupy
the religious standpoint himself?  Is not “right” a religious concept,
_i.e._ something sacred?  Why, _“equality of rights”_, as the Revolution
propounded it, is only another name for “Christian equality,” the
“equality of the brethren,” “of God’s children,” “of Christians”; in
short, _fraternité_.  Each and every inquiry after right deserves to be
lashed with Schiller’s words:

<quote>

Many a year I’ve used my nose

To smell the onion and the rose;

Is there any proof which shows

That I’ve a right to that same nose?

</quote>

When the Revolution stamped equality as a “right,” it took flight into
the religious domain, into the region of the sacred, of the ideal.
Hence, since then, the fight for the “sacred, inalienable rights of
man.” Against the “eternal rights of man” the “well-earned rights of the
established order” are quite naturally, and with equal right, brought to
bear: right against right, where of course one is decried by the other
as “wrong.” This has been the _contest of rights_ [_Rechtsstreit_, a
word which usually means “lawsuit”] since the Revolution.

You want to be “in the right” as against the rest.  That you cannot; as
against them you remain forever “in the wrong”; for they surely would
not be your opponents if they were not in “their right” too; they will
always make you out “in the wrong.” But, as against the right of the
rest, yours is a higher, greater, _more powerful_ right, is it not?  No
such thing!  Your right is not more powerful if you are not more
powerful.  Have Chinese subjects a right to freedom?  Just bestow it on
them, and then look how far you have gone wrong in your attempt: because
they do not know how to use freedom they have no right to it, or, in
clearer terms, because they have not freedom they have not the right to
it.  Children have no right to the condition of majority because they
are not of age, _i.e._ because they are children.  Peoples that let
themselves be kept in nonage have no rights to the condition of
majority; if they ceased to be in nonage, then only would they have the
right to be of age.  This means nothing else than “What you have the
_power_ to be you have the _right_ to.” I derive all right and all
warrant from _me;_ I am _entitled_ to everything that I have in my
power.  I am entitled to overthrow Zeus, Jehovah, God, etc., if I _can;_
if I cannot, then these gods will always remain in the right and in
power as against me, and what I do will be to fear their right and their
power in impotent “god-fearingness,” to keep their commandments and
believe that I do right in everything that I do according to _their_
right, about as the Russian boundary-sentinels think themselves
rightfully entitled to shoot dead the suspicious persons who are
escaping, since they murder “by superior authority,” _i.e._ “with
right.” But I am entitled by myself to murder if I myself do not forbid
it to myself, if I myself do not fear murder as a “wrong.” This view of
things lies at the foundation of Chamisso’s poem, “The Valley of
Murder,” where the gray-haired Indian murderer compels reverence from
the white man whose brethren he has murdered.  The only thing I am not
entitled to is what I do not do with a free cheer, _i.  e._ what I do
not entitle myself to.

I decide whether it is the _right thing_ in me; there is no right
_outside_ me.  If it is right for _me_,[a common German phrase for “it
suits me”] it is right.  Possibly this may not suffice to make it right
for the rest; _i.  e._, their care, not mine: let them defend
themselves.  And if for the whole world something were not right, but it
were right for me, _i.  e._, I wanted it, then I would ask nothing about
the whole world.  So every one does who knows how to value _himself_,
every one in the degree that he is an egoist; for might goes before
right, and that — with perfect right.

Because I am “by nature” a man I have an equal right to the enjoyment of
all goods, says Babeuf.  Must he not also say: because I am “by nature”
a first-born prince I have a right to the throne?  The rights of man and
the “well-earned rights” come to the same thing in the end, _i.e._ to
_nature_, which _gives_ me a right, _i.  e._ to _birth_ (and, further,
inheritance, etc.).  “I am born as a man” is equal to “I am born as a
king’s son.” The natural man has only a natural right (because he has
only a natural power) and natural claims: he has right of birth and
claims of birth.  But _nature_ cannot entitle me, _i.e._ give me
capacity or might, to that to which only my act entitles me.  That the
king’s child sets himself above other children, even this is his act,
which secures to him the precedence; and that the other children approve
and recognize this act is their act, which makes them worthy to be —
subjects.

Whether nature gives me a right, or whether God, the people’s choice,
etc., does so, all of _i.  e._, the same _foreign_ right, a right that I
do not give or take to myself.

Thus the Communists say, equal labor entitles man to equal enjoyment.
Formerly the question was raised whether the “virtuous” man must not be
“happy” on earth.  The Jews actually drew this inference: “That it may
go well with thee on earth.” No, equal labor does not entitle you to it,
but equal enjoyment alone entitles you to equal enjoyment.  Enjoy, then
you are entitled to enjoyment.  But, if you have labored and let the
enjoyment be taken from you, then — “it serves you right.”

If you _take_ the enjoyment, it is your right; if, on the contrary, you
only pine for it without laying hands on it, it remains as before, a,
“well-earned right” of those who are privileged for enjoyment.  It is
_their_ right, as by laying hands on it would become your right.

The conflict over the “right of property” wavers in vehement commotion.
The Communists affirm[64] that “the earth belongs rightfully to him who
tills it, and its products to those who bring them out.” I think it
belongs to him who knows how to take it, or who does not let it be taken
from him, does not let himself be deprived of it.  If he appropriates
it, then not only the earth, but the right to it too, belongs to him.
This is _egoistic right_: _i.e._ it is right for _me_, therefore it is
right.

Aside from this, right does have “a wax nose.” The tiger that assails me
is in the right, and I who strike him down am also in the right.  I
defend against him not my _right_, but _myself_.

As human right is always something given, it always in reality reduces
to the right which men give, _i.e._ “concede,” to each other.  If the
right to existence is conceded to new-born children, then they have the
right; if it is not conceded to them, as was the case among the Spartans
and ancient Romans, then they do not have it.  For only society can give
or concede it to them; they themselves cannot take it, or give it to
themselves.  It will be objected, the children had nevertheless “by
nature” the right to exist; only the Spartans refused _recognition_ to
this right.  But then they simply had no right to this recognition — no
more than they had to recognition of their life by the wild beasts to
which they were thrown.

People talk so much about _birthright_ and complain:

<quote>

There is alas!  — no mention of the rights

That were born with us.[65]

</quote>

What sort of right, then, is there that was born with me?  The right to
receive an entailed estate, to inherit a throne, to enjoy a princely or
noble education; or, again, because poor parents begot me, to — get free
schooling, be clothed out of contributions of alms, and at last earn my
bread and my herring in the coal-mines or at the loom?  Are these not
birthrights, rights that have come down to me from my parents through
_birth?_ You think — no; you think these are only rights improperly so
called, it is just these rights that you aim to abolish through the
_real birthright_.  To give a basis for this you go back to the simplest
thing and affirm that every one is by birth _equal_ to another — to wit,
a _man_.  I will grant you that every one is born as man, hence the
new-born are therein _equal_ to each other.  Why are they?  Only because
they do not yet show and exert themselves as anything but bare —
_children of men_, naked little human beings.  But thereby they are at
once different from those who have already made something out of
themselves, who thus are no longer bare “children of man,” but —
children of their own creation.  The latter possesses more than bare
birthrights: they have _earned_ rights.  What an antithesis, what a
field of combat!  The old combat of the birthrights of man and
well-earned rights.  Go right on appealing to your birthrights; people
will not fail to oppose to you the well-earned.  Both stand on the
“ground of right”; for each of the two has a “right” against the other,
the one the birthright of natural right, the other the earned or
“well-earned” right.

If you remain on the ground of right, you remain in —
_Rechthaberei_[66].  The other cannot give you your right; he cannot
“mete out right” to you.  He who has might has — right; if you have not
the former, neither have you the latter.  Is this wisdom so hard to
attain?  Just look at the mighty and their doings!  We are talking here
only of China and Japan, of course.  Just try it once, you Chinese and
Japanese, to make them out in the wrong, and learn by experience how
they throw you into jail.  (Only do not confuse with this the
“well-meaning counsels” which — in China and Japan — are permitted,
because they do not hinder the mighty one, but possibly _help him on_.)
For him who should want to make them out in the wrong there would stand
open only one way thereto, that of might.  If he deprives them of their
_might_, then he has _really_ made them out in the wrong, deprived them
of their right; in any other case he can do nothing but clench his
little fist in his pocket, or fall a victim as an obtrusive fool.

In short, if you Chinese or Japanese did not ask after right, and in
particular if you did not ask after the rights “that were born with
you,” then you would not need to ask at all after the well-earned rights
either.

You start back in fright before others, because you think you see beside
them the _ghost of right_, which, as in the Homeric combats, seems to
fight as a goddess at their side, helping them.  What do you do?  Do you
throw the spear?  No, you creep around to gain the spook over to
yourselves, that it may fight on your side: you woo for the ghost’s
favor.  Another would simply ask thus: Do I will what my opponent wills?
“No!” Now then, there may fight for him a thousand devils or gods, I go
at him all the same!

The “commonwealth of right,” as the _Vossische Zeitung_ among others
stands for it, asks that office-holders be removable only by the
_judge_, not by the _administration_.  Vain illusion!  If it were
settled by law that an office-holder who is once seen drunken shall lose
his office, then the judges would have to condemn him on the word of the
witnesses.  In short, the law-giver would only have to state precisely
all the possible grounds which entail the loss of office, however
laughable they might be (_e.g._ he who laughs in his superiors’ faces,
who does not go to church every Sunday, who does not take the communion
every four weeks, who runs in debt, who has disreputable associates, who
shows no determination, etc., shall be removed.  These things the
law-giver might take it into his head to prescribe, _e.g._, for a court
of honor); then the judge would solely have to investigate whether the
accused had “become guilty” of those “offenses,” and, on presentation of
the proof, pronounce sentence of removal against him “in the name of the
law.”

The judge is lost when he ceases to be _mechanical_, when he “is
forsaken by the rules of evidence.” Then he no longer has anything but
an opinion like everybody else; and, if he decides according to this
_opinion_, his action is _no longer an official action_.  As judge he
must decide only according to the law.  Commend me rather to the old
French parliaments, which wanted to examine for themselves what was to
be matters of right, and to register it only after their own approval.
They at least judged according to a right of their own, and were not
willing to give themselves up to be machines of the law-giver, although
as judges they must, to be sure, become their own machines.

It is said that punishment is the criminal’s right.  But impunity is
just as much his right.  If his undertaking succeeds, it serves him
right, and, if it does not succeed, it likewise serves him right.  You
make your bed and lie in it.  If some one goes foolhardily into dangers
and perishes in them, we are apt to say, “It serves him right; he would
have it so.” But, if he conquered the dangers, _i.e._ if his _might_ was
victorious, then he would be in the _right_ too.  If a child plays with
the knife and gets cut, it is served right; but, if it doesn’t get cut,
it is served right too.  Hence right befalls the criminal, doubtless,
when he suffers what he risked; why, what did he risk it for, since he
knew the possible consequences?  But the punishment that we decree
against him is only our right, not his.  Our right reacts against his,
and he is — “in the wrong at last” because — we get the upper hand.


	* * *

But what is right, what is matter of right in a society, is voiced too —
in the law.[_Gesetz_, statute; no longer the same German word as
“right”]

Whatever the law may be, it must be respected by the — loyal citizen.
Thus the law-abiding mind of Old England is eulogized.  To this that
Euripidean sentiment (Orestes, 418) entirely corresponds: “We serve the
gods, whatever the gods are.” _Law as such, God as such_, thus far we
are today.

People are at pains to distinguish _law_ from arbitrary _orders_, from
an ordinance: the former comes from a duly entitled authority.  But a
law over human action (ethical law, State law, etc.) is always a
_declaration of will_, and so an order.  Yes, even if I myself gave
myself the law, it would yet be only my order, to which in the next
moment I can refuse obedience.  One may well enough declare what he will
put up with, and so deprecate the opposite of the law, making known that
in the contrary case he will treat the transgressor as his enemy; but no
one has any business to command _my_ actions, to say what course I shall
pursue and set up a code to govern it.  I must put up with it that he
treats me as his _enemy_, but never that he makes free with me as his
_creature_, and that he makes _his_ reason, or even unreason, my
plumb-line.

States last only so long as there is _a ruling will_ and this ruling
will is looked upon as tantamount to the own will.  The lord’s will is —
law.  What do your laws amount to if no one obeys them?  What your
orders, if nobody lets himself be ordered?  The State cannot forbear the
claim to determine the individual’s will, to speculate and count on
this.  For the State it is indispensable that nobody have an _own will
;_ if one had, the State would have to exclude (lock up, banish, etc.)
this one; if all had, they would do away with the State.  The State is
not thinkable without lordship and servitude (subjection); for the State
must will to be the lord of all that it embraces, and this will is
called the “will of the State.”

He who, to hold his own, must count on the absence of will in others is
a thing made by these others, as the master is a thing made by the
servant.  If submissiveness ceased, it would be over with all lordship.

The _own will_ of Me is the State’s destroyer; it is therefore branded
by the State as “self-will.” Own will and the State are powers in deadly
hostility, between which no “eternal peace” is possible.  As long as the
State asserts itself, it represents own will, its ever-hostile opponent,
as unreasonable, evil; and the latter lets itself be talked into
believing this — nay, it really is such, for no more reason than this,
that it still lets itself be talked into such belief: it has not yet
come to itself and to the consciousness of its dignity; hence it is
still incomplete, still amenable to fine words, etc.

Every State is a _despotism_, be the despot one or many, or (as one is
likely to imagine about a republic) if all be lords, _i.  e._ despotize
one over another.  For this is the case when the law given at any time,
the expressed volition of (it may be) a popular assembly, is thenceforth
to be _law_ for the individual, to which _obedience is due_ from him or
toward which he has the _duty_ of obedience.  If one were even to
conceive the case that every individual in the people had expressed the
same will, and hereby a complete “collective will” had come into being,
the matter would still remain the same.  Would I not be bound today and
henceforth to my will of yesterday?  My will would in this case be
_frozen_.  Wretched _stability!_ My creature — to wit, a particular
expression of will — would have become my commander.  But I in my will,
I the creator, should be hindered in my flow and my dissolution.
Because I was a fool yesterday I must remain such my life long.  So in
the State-life I am at best — I might just as well say, at worst — a
bondman of myself.  Because I was a willer yesterday, I am today without
will: yesterday voluntary, today involuntary.

How change it?  Only be recognizing no _duty_, not _binding_ myself nor
letting myself be bound.  If I have no duty, then I know no law either.

“But they will bind me!” My will nobody can bind, and my disinclination
remains free.

“Why, everything must go topsy-turvy if every one could do what he
would!” Well, who says that every one can do everything?  What are you
there for, pray, you who do not need to put up with everything?  Defend
yourself, and no one will do anything to you!  He who would break your
will has to do with you, and is your _enemy_.  Deal with him as such.
If there stand behind you for your protection some millions more, then
you are an imposing power and will have an easy victory.  But, even if
as a power you overawe your opponent, still you are not on that account
a hallowed authority to him, unless he be a simpleton.  He does not owe
you respect and regard, even though he will have to consider your might.

We are accustomed to classify States according to the different ways in
which “the supreme might” is distributed.  If an individual has it —
monarchy; if all have it — democracy; etc.  Supreme might then!  Might
against whom?  Against the individual and his “self-will.” The State
practices “violence,” the individual must not do so.  The State’s
behavior is violence, and it calls its violence “law”; that of the
individual, “crime.” Crime, then [_Verbrechen_] — so the individual’s
violence is called; and only by crime does he overcome [_brechen_] the
State’s violence when he thinks that the State is not above him, but he
is above the State.

Now, if I wanted to act ridiculously, I might, as a well-meaning person,
admonish you not to make laws which impair my self-development,
self-activity, self-creation.  I do not give this advice.  For, if you
should follow it, you would be unwise, and I should have been cheated of
my entire profit.  I request nothing at all from you; for, whatever I
might demand, you would still be dictatorial law-givers, and must be so,
because a raven cannot sing, nor a robber live without robbery.  Rather
do I ask those who would be egoists what they think the more egoistic —
to let laws be given them by you, and to respect those that are given,
or to practice _refractoriness_, yes, complete disobedience.
Good-hearted people think the laws ought to prescribe only what is
accepted in the people’s feeling as right and proper.  But what concern
is it of mine what is accepted in the nation and by the nation?  The
nation will perhaps be against the blasphemer; therefore a law against
blasphemy.  Am I not to blaspheme on that account?  Is this law to be
more than an “order” to me?  I put the question.

Solely from the principle that all _right_ and all _authority_ belong to
the _collectivity of the people_ do all forms of government arise.  For
none of them lacks this appeal to the collectivity, and the despot, as
well as the president or any aristocracy, acts and commands “in the name
of the State.” They are in possession of the “authority of the State,”
and it is perfectly indifferent whether, were this possible, the people
as a _collectivity_ (all individuals) exercise this State — _authority_,
or whether it is only the representatives of this collectivity, be there
many of them as in aristocracies or one as in monarchies.  Always the
collectivity is above the individual, and has a power which is called
_legitimate_, _i.e._ which is _law_.

Over against the sacredness of the State, the individual is only a
vessel of dishonor, in which “exuberance, malevolence, mania for
ridicule and slander, frivolity,” etc., are left as soon as he does not
deem that object of veneration, the State, to be worthy of recognition.
The spiritual _haughtiness_ of the servants and subjects of the State
has fine penalties against unspiritual “exuberance.”

When the government designates as punishable all play of mind _against_
the State, the moderate liberals come and opine that fun, satire, wit,
humor, must have free play anyhow, and _genius_ must enjoy freedom.  So
not the _individual man_ indeed, but still _genius_, is to be free.
Here the State, or in its name the government, says with perfect right:
He who is not for me is against me.  Fun, wit, etc.  — in short, the
turning of State affairs into a comedy — have undermined States from of
old: they are not “innocent.” And, further, what boundaries are to be
drawn between guilty and innocent wit, etc.?  At this question the
moderates fall into great perplexity, and everything reduces itself to
the prayer that the State (government) would please not be so
_sensitive_, so _ticklish;_ that it would not immediately scent
malevolence in “harmless’ things, and would in general be a little “more
tolerant.” Exaggerated sensitiveness is certainly a weakness, its
avoidance may be praiseworthy virtue; but in time of war one cannot be
sparing, and what may be allowed under peaceable circumstances ceases to
be permitted as soon as a state of siege is declared.  Because the
well-meaning liberals feel this plainly, they hasten to declare that,
considering “the devotion of the people,” there is assuredly no danger
to be feared.  But the government will be wiser, and not let itself be
talked into believing anything of that sort.  It knows too well how
people stuff one with fine words, and will not let itself be satisfied
with the Barmecide dish.

But they are bound to have their play-ground, for they are children, you
know, and cannot be so staid as old folks; boys will be boys.  Only for
this playground, only for a few hours of jolly running about, they
bargain.  They ask only that the State should not, like a splenetic
papa, be too cross.  It should permit some Processions of the Ass and
plays of fools, as the church allowed them in the Middle Ages.  But the
times when it could grant this without danger are past.  Children that
now once come _into the open_, and live through an hour without the rod
of discipline, are no longer willing to go into the _cell_.  For the
open is now no longer a _supplement_ to the cell, no longer a refreshing
_recreation_, but its _opposite_, an _aut-aut_.  In short, the State
must either no longer put up with anything, or put up with everything
and perish; it must be either sensitive through and through, or, like a
dead man, insensitive.  Tolerance is done with.  If the State but gives
a finger, they take the whole hand at once.  There can be no more
“jesting,” and all jest, such as fun, wit, humor, becomes bitter
earnest.

The clamor of the Liberals for freedom of the press runs counter to
their own principle, their proper _will_.  They will what they _do not
will_, _i.e._ they wish, they would like.  Hence it is too that they
fall away so easily when once so-called freedom of the press appears;
then they would like censorship.  Quite naturally.  The State is sacred
even to them; likewise morals.  They behave toward it only as ill-bred
brats, as tricky children who seek to utilize the weaknesses of their
parents.  Papa State is to permit them to say many things that do not
please him, but papa has the right, by a stern look, to blue-pencil
their impertinent gabble.  If they recognize in him their papa, they
must in his presence put up with the censorship of speech, like every
child.


	* * *

If you let yourself be made out in the right by another, you must no
less let yourself be made out in the wrong by him; if justification and
reward come to you from him, expect also his arraignment and punishment.
Alongside right goes wrong, alongside legality _crime_.  What are you?
— You are a — _criminal!_

“The criminal is in the utmost degree the State’s own crime!” says
Bettina.[67] One may let this sentiment pass, even if Bettina herself
does not understand it exactly so.  For in the State the unbridled I —
I, as I belong to myself alone — cannot come to my fulfillment and
realization.  Every ego is from birth a criminal to begin with against
the people, the State.  Hence it is that it does really keep watch over
all; it sees in each one an — egoist, and it is afraid of the egoist.
It presumes the worst about each one, and takes care, police-care, that
“no harm happens to the State,” _ne quid respublica detrimenti capiat_.
The unbridled ego — and this we originally are, and in our secret inward
parts we remain so always — is the never-ceasing criminal in the State.
The man whom his boldness, his will, his inconsiderateness and
fearlessness lead is surrounded with spies by the State, by the people.
I say, by the people!  The people (think it something wonderful, you
good-hearted folks, what you have in the people) — the people is full of
police sentiments through and through.  — Only he who renounces his ego,
who practices “self-renunciation,” is acceptable to the people.

In the book cited Bettina is throughout good-natured enough to regard
the State as only sick, and to hope for its recovery, a recovery which
she would bring about through the “demagogues”;[68] but it is not sick;
rather is it in its full strength, when it puts from it the demagogues
who want to acquire something for the individuals, for “all.” In its
believers it is provided with the best demagogues (leaders of the
people).  According to Bettina, the State is to[69] “develop mankind’s
germ of freedom; otherwise it is a raven-mother[An unnatural mother] and
caring for raven-fodder!” It cannot do otherwise, for in its very caring
for “mankind” (which, besides, would have to be the “humane” or “free”
State to begin with) the “individual” is raven-fodder for it.  How
rightly speaks the burgomaster, on the other hand:[70] “What?  the State
has no other duty than to be merely the attendant of incurable invalids?
— that isn’t to the point.  From of old the healthy State has relieved
itself of the diseased matter, and not mixed itself with it.  It does
not need to be so economical with its juices.  Cut off the
robber-branches without hesitation, that the others may bloom.  — Do not
shiver at the State’s harshness; its morality, its policy and religion,
point it to that.  Accuse it of no want of feeling; its sympathy revolts
against this, but its experience finds safety only in this severity!
There are diseases in which only drastic remedies will help.  The
physician who recognizes the disease as such, but timidly turns to
palliatives, will never remove the disease, but may well cause the
patient to succumb after a shorter or longer sickness.” Frau Rat’s
question, “If you apply death as a drastic remedy, how is the cure to be
wrought then?” isn’t to the point.  Why, the State does not apply death
against itself, but against an offensive member; it tears out an eye
that offends it, etc.

“For the invalid State the only way of salvation is to make man flourish
in it.”[71] If one here, like Bettina, understand by man the concept
“Man,” she is right; the “invalid” State will recover by the flourishing
of “Man,” for, the more infatuated the individuals are with “Man,” the
better it serves the State’s turn.  But, if one referred it to the
individuals, to “all” (and the authoress half-does this too, because
about “Man” she is still involved in vagueness), then it would sound
somewhat like the following: For an invalid band of robbers the only way
of salvation is to make the loyal citizen nourish in it!  Why, thereby
the band of robbers would simply go to ruin as a band of robbers; and,
because it perceives this, it prefers to shoot every one who has a
leaning toward becoming a “steady man.”

In this book Bettina is a patriot, or, what is little more, a
philanthropist, a worker for human happiness.  She is discontented with
the existing order in quite the same way as is the title-ghost of her
book, along with all who would like to bring back the good old faith and
what goes with it.  Only she thinks, contrariwise, that the politicians,
place-holders, and diplomats ruined the State, while those lay it at the
door of the malevolent, the “seducers of the people.”

What is the ordinary criminal but one who has committed the fatal
mistake of endeavoring after what is the people’s instead of seeking for
what is his?  He has sought despicable _alien_ goods, has done what
believers do who seek after what is God’s.  What does the priest who
admonishes the criminal do?  He sets before him the great wrong of
having desecrated by his act what was hallowed by the State, its
property (in which, of course, must be included even the life of those
who belong to the State); instead of this, he might rather hold up to
him the fact that he has befouled _himself_ in not despising the alien
thing, but thinking it worth stealing; he could, if he were not a
parson.  Talk with the so-called criminal as with an egoist, and he will
be ashamed, not that he transgressed against your laws and goods, but
that he considered your laws worth evading, your goods worth desiring;
he will be ashamed that he did not — despise you and yours together,
that he was too little an egoist.  But you cannot talk egoistically with
him, for you are not so great as a criminal, you — commit no crime!  You
do not know that an ego who is his own cannot desist from being a
criminal, that crime is his life.  And yet you should know it, since you
believe that “we are all miserable sinners”; but you think
surreptitiously to get beyond sin, you do not comprehend — for you are
devil-fearing — that guilt is the value of a man.  Oh, if you were
guilty!  But now you are “righteous.”[_Gerechte_] Well — just put every
thing nicely to rights [_macht Alles hübsch gerecht_] for your master!

When the Christian consciousness, or the Christian man, draws up a
criminal code, what can the concept of _crime_ be there but simply —
_heartlessness?_ Each severing and wounding of a _heart relation_, each
_heartless behavior_ toward a sacred being, is crime.  The more
heartfelt the relation is supposed to be, the more scandalous is the
deriding of it, and the more worthy of punishment the crime.  Everyone
who is subject to the lord should love him; to deny this love is a high
treason worthy of death.  Adultery is a heartlessness worthy of
punishment; one has no heart, no enthusiasm, no pathetic feeling for the
sacredness of marriage.  So long as the heart or soul dictates laws,
only the heartful or soulful man enjoys the protection of the laws.
That the man of soul makes laws means properly that the _moral_ man
makes them: what contradicts these men’s “moral feeling,” this they
penalize.  How, _e.g._, should disloyalty, secession, breach of oaths —
in short, all _radical breaking off_, all tearing asunder of venerable
_ties —_ not be flagitious and criminal in their eyes?  He who breaks
with these demands of the soul has for enemies all the moral, all the
men of soul.  Only Krummacher and his mates are the right people to set
up consistently a penal code of the heart, as a certain bill
sufficiently proves.  The consistent legislation of the Christian State
must be placed wholly in the hands of the — _parsons_, and will not
become pure and coherent so long as it is worked out only by — the
_parson-ridden_, who are always only _half-parsons_.  Only then will
every lack of soulfulness, every heartlessness, be certified as an
unpardonable crime, only then will every agitation of the soul become
condemnable, every objection of criticism and doubt be anathematized;
only then is the own man, before the Christian consciousness, a
convicted — _criminal_ to begin with.

The men of the Revolution often talked of the people’s “just revenge” as
its “right.” Revenge and right coincide here.  Is this an attitude of an
ego to an ego?  The people cries that the opposite party has committed
“crimes” against it.  Can I assume that one commits a crime against me,
without assuming that he has to act as I see fit?  And this action I
call the right, the good, etc.; the divergent action, a crime.  So I
think that the others must aim at the _same_ goal with me; _i.e._, I do
not treat them as unique beings[_Einzige_] who bear their law in
themselves and live according to it, but as beings who are to obey some
“rational” law.  I set up what “Man” is and what acting in a “truly
human” way is, and I demand of every one that this law become norm and
ideal to him; otherwise he will expose himself as a “sinner and
criminal.” But upon the “guilty” falls the “penalty of the law”!

One sees here how it is “Man” again who sets on foot even the concept of
crime, of sin, and therewith that of right.  A man in whom I do not
recognize “man” is “sinner, a guilty one.”

Only against a sacred thing are there criminals; you against me can
never be a criminal, but only an opponent.  But not to hate him who
injures a sacred thing is in itself a crime, as St.  Just cries out
against Danton: “Are you not a criminal and responsible for not having
hated the enemies of the fatherland?” —

If, as in the Revolution, what “Man” is apprehended as “good citizen,”
then from this concept of “Man” we have the well-known “political
offenses and crimes.”

In all this the individual, the individual man, is regarded as refuse,
and on the other hand the general man, “Man,” is honored.  Now,
according to how this ghost is named — as Christian, Jew, Mussulman,
good citizen, loyal subject, freeman, patriot, etc.  — just so do those
who would like to carry through a divergent concept of man, as well as
those who want to put _themselves_ through, fall before victorious
“Man.”

And with what unction the butchery goes on here in the name of the law,
of the sovereign people, of God, etc.!

Now, if the persecuted trickily conceal and protect themselves from the
stern parsonical judges, people stigmatize them as St.  Just, _e.g._,
does those whom he accuses in the speech against Danton.[72] One is to
be a fool, and deliver himself up to their Moloch.

Crimes spring from _fixed ideas_.  The sacredness of marriage is a fixed
idea.  From the sacredness it follows that infidelity is a _crime_, and
therefore a certain marriage law imposes upon it a shorter or longer
_penalty_.  But by those who proclaim “freedom as sacred” this penalty
must be regarded as a crime against freedom, and only in this sense has
public opinion in fact branded the marriage law.

Society would have _every one_ come to his right indeed, but yet only to
that which is sanctioned by society, to the society-right, not really to
_his_ right.  But I give or take to myself the right out of my own
plenitude of power, and against every superior power I am the most
impenitent criminal.  Owner and creator of my right, I recognize no
other source of right than — me, neither God nor the State nor nature
nor even man himself with his “eternal rights of man,” neither divine
nor human right.

Right “in and for itself.” Without relation to me, therefore!  “Absolute
right.” Separated from me, therefore!  A thing that exists in and for
itself!  An absolute!  An eternal right, like an eternal truth!

According to the liberal way of thinking, right is to be obligatory for
me because it is thus established by _human reason_, against which _my
reason_ is “unreason.” Formerly people inveighed in the name of divine
reason against weak human reason; now, in the name of strong human
reason, against egoistic reason, which is rejected as “unreason.” And
yet none is real but this very “unreason.” Neither divine nor human
reason, but only your and my reason existing at any given time, is real,
as and because you and I are real.

The thought of right is originally my thought; or, it has its origin in
me.  But, when it has sprung from me, when the “Word” is out, then it
has “become flesh,” it is a _fixed idea_.  Now I no longer get rid of
the thought; however I turn, it stands before me.  Thus men have not
become masters again of the thought “right,” which they themselves
created; their creature is running away with them.  This is absolute
right, that which is absolved or unfastened from me.  We, revering it as
absolute, cannot devour it again, and it takes from us the creative
power: the creature is more than the creator, it is “in and for itself.”

Once you no longer let right run around free, once you draw it back into
its origin, into you, it is _your_ right; and that is right which suits
you.


	* * *

Right has had to suffer an attack within itself, _i.e._ from the
standpoint of right; war being declared on the part of liberalism
against “privilege.”[Literally, “precedent right”]

_Privileged_ and _endowed with equal rights_ — on these two concepts
turns a stubborn fight.  Excluded or admitted — would mean the same.
But where should there be a power — be it an imaginary one like God,
law, or a real one like I, you — of which it should not be true that
before it all are “endowed with equal rights,” _i.  e._, no respect of
persons holds?  Every one is equally dear to God if he adores him,
equally agreeable to the law _if_ only he is a law- abiding person;
whether the lover of God and the law is humpbacked and lame, whether
poor or rich, etc., that amounts to nothing for God and the law; just
so, when you are at the point of drowning, you like a Negro as rescuer
as well as the most excellent Caucasian — yes, in this situation you
esteem a dog not less than a man.  But to whom will not every one be
also, contrariwise, a preferred or disregarded person?  God punishes the
wicked with his wrath, the law chastises the lawless, you let one visit
you every moment and show the other the door.

The “equality of right” is a phantom just because right is nothing more
and nothing less than admission, _a matter of grace_, which, be it said,
one may also acquire by his desert; for desert and grace are not
contradictory, since even grace wishes to be “deserved” and our gracious
smile falls only to him who knows how to force it from us.

So people dream of “all citizens of the State having to stand side by
side, with equal rights.” As citizens of the State they are certainly
all equal for the State.  But it will divide them, and advance them or
put them in the rear, according to its special ends, if on no other
account; and still more must it distinguish them from one another as
good and bad citizens.

Bruno Bauer disposes of the Jew question from the standpoint that
“privilege” is not justified.  Because Jew and Christian have each some
point of advantage over the other, and in having this point of advantage
are exclusive, therefore before the critic’s gaze they crumble into
nothingness.  With them the State lies under the like blame, since it
justifies their having advantages and stamps it as a “privilege.” or
prerogative, but thereby derogates from its calling to become a “free
State.”

But now every one has something of advantage over another — _viz_.,
himself or his individuality; in this everybody remains exclusive.

And, again, before a third party every one makes his peculiarity count
for as much as possible, and (if he wants to win him at all) tries to
make it appear attractive before him.

Now, is the third party to be insensible to the difference of the one
from the other?  Do they ask that of the free State or of humanity?
Then these would have to be absolutely without self-interest, and
incapable of taking an interest in any one whatever.  Neither God (who
divides his own from the wicked) nor the State (which knows how to
separate good citizens from bad) was thought of as so indifferent.

But they are looking for this very third party that bestows no more
“privilege.” Then it is called perhaps the free State, or humanity, or
whatever else it may be.

As Christian and Jew are ranked low by Bruno Bauer on account of their
asserting privileges, it must be that they could and should free
themselves from their narrow standpoint by self-renunciation or
unselfishness.  If they threw off their “egoism,” the mutual wrong would
cease, and with it Christian and Jewish religiousness in general; it
would be necessary only that neither of them should any longer want to
be anything peculiar.

But, if they gave up this exclusiveness, with that the ground on which
their hostilities were waged would in truth not yet be forsaken.  In
case of need they would indeed find a third thing on which they could
unite, a “general religion,” a “religion of humanity,” etc.; in short,
an equalization, which need not be better than that which would result
if all Jews became Christians, by this likewise the “privilege” of one
over the other would have an end.  The _tension_[_Spannung_] would
indeed be done away, but in this consisted not the essence of the two,
but only their neighborhood.  As being distinguished from each other
they must necessarily be mutually resistant,[_gespannt_] and the
disparity will always remain.  Truly it is not a failing in you that you
stiffen [_spannen_] yourself against me and assert your distinctness or
peculiarity: you need not give way or renounce yourself.

People conceive the significance of the opposition too _formally_ and
weakly when they want only to “dissolve” it in order to make room for a
third thing that shall “unite.” The opposition deserves rather to be
_sharpened_.  As Jew and Christian you are in too slight an opposition,
and are contending only about religion, as it were about the emperor’s
beard, about a fiddlestick’s end.  Enemies in religion indeed, _in the
rest_ you still remain good friends, and equal to each other, _e.g._ as
men.  Nevertheless the rest too is unlike in each; and the time when you
no longer merely _dissemble_ your opposition will be only when you
entirely recognize it, and everybody asserts himself from top to toe as
_unique_ [_Einzig_].  Then the former opposition will assuredly be
dissolved, but only because a stronger has taken it up into itself.

Our weakness consists not in this, that we are in opposition to others,
but in this, that we are not completely so; that we are not entirely
_severed_ from them, or that we seek a “communion,” a “bond,” that in
communion we have an ideal.  One faith, one God, one idea, one hat, for
all!  If all were brought under one hat, certainly no one would any
longer need to take off his hat before another.

The last and most decided opposition, that of unique against unique, is
at bottom beyond what is called opposition, but without having sunk back
into “unity” and unison.  As unique you have nothing in common with the
other any longer, and therefore nothing divisive or hostile either; you
are not seeking to be in the right against him before a _third_ party,
and are standing with him neither “on the ground of right” nor on any
other common ground.  The opposition vanishes in complete — _severance_
or singleness.[_Einzigkeit_] This might indeed be regarded as the new
point in common or a new parity, but here the parity consists precisely
in the disparity, and is itself nothing but disparity, a par of
disparity, and that only for him who institutes a “comparison.”

The polemic against privilege forms a characteristic feature of
liberalism, which fumes against “privilege” because it itself appeals to
“right.” Further than to fuming it cannot carry this; for privileges do
not fall before right falls, as they are only forms of right.  But right
falls apart into its nothingness when it is swallowed up by might,
_i.e._ when one understands what is meant by “Might goes before right.”
All right explains itself then as privilege, and privilege itself as
power, as — _superior power_.

But must not the mighty combat against superior power show quite another
face than the modest combat against privilege, which is to be fought out
before a first judge, “Right,” according to the judge’s mind?


	* * *

Now, in conclusion, I have still to take back the half-way form of
expression of which I was willing to make use only so long as I was
still rooting among the entrails of right, and letting the word at least
stand.  But, in fact, with the concept the word too loses its meaning.
What I called “my right” is no longer “right” at all, because right can
be bestowed only by a spirit, be it the spirit of nature or that of the
species, of mankind, the Spirit of God or that of His Holiness or His
Highness, etc.  What I have without an entitling spirit I have without
right; I have it solely and alone through my power.

I do not demand any right, therefore I need not recognize any either.
What I can get by force I get by force, and what I do not get by force I
have no right to, nor do I give myself airs, or consolation, with my
imprescriptible right.

With absolute right, right itself passes away; the dominion of the
“concept of right” is canceled at the same time.  For it is not to be
forgotten that hitherto concepts, ideas, or principles ruled us, and
that among these rulers the concept of right, or of justice, played one
of the most important parts.

Entitled or unentitled — that does not concern me, if I am only
_powerful_, I am of myself _empowered_, and need no other empowering or
entitling.

Right — is a wheel in the head, put there by a spook; power — that am I
myself, I am the powerful one and owner of power.  Right is above me, is
absolute, and exists in one higher, as whose grace it flows to me: right
is a gift of grace from the judge; power and might exist only in me the
powerful and mighty.

*** II.  My Intercourse

In society the human demand at most can be satisfied, while the egoistic
must always come short.

Because it can hardly escape anybody that the present shows no such
living interest in any question as in the “social,” one has to direct
his gaze especially to society.  Nay, if the interest felt in it were
less passionate and dazzled, people would not so much, in looking at
society, lose sight of the individuals in it, and would recognize that a
society cannot become new so long as those who form and constitute it
remain the old ones.  If, _e.g._, there was to arise in the Jewish
people a society which should spread a new faith over the earth, these
apostles could in no case remain Pharisees.

As you are, so you present yourself, so you behave toward men: a
hypocrite as a hypocrite, a Christian as a Christian.  Therefore the
character of a society is determined by the character of its members:
they are its creators.  So much at least one must perceive even if one
were not willing to put to the test the concept “society” itself.

Ever far from letting _themselves_ come to their full development and
consequence, men have hitherto not been able to found their societies on
_themselves;_ or rather, they have been able only to found “societies”
and to live in societies.  The societies were always persons, powerful
persons, so-called “moral persons,” _i.e._ ghosts, before which the
individual had the appropriate wheel in his head, the fear of ghosts.
As such ghosts they may most suitably be designated by the respective
names “people” and “peoplet”: the people of the patriarchs, the people
of the Hellenes, etc., at last the — people of men, Mankind (Anacharsis
Clootz was enthusiastic for the “nation” of mankind); then every
subdivision of this “people,” which could and must have its special
societies, the Spanish, French people, etc.; within it again classes,
cities, in short all kinds of corporations; lastly, tapering to the
finest point, the little peoplet of the —family.  Hence, instead of
saying that the person that walked as ghost in all societies hitherto
has been the people, there might also have been named the two extremes —
to wit, either “mankind” or the “family,” both the most “natural-born
units.” We choose the word “people”[73] because its derivation has been
brought into connection with the Greek _polloi_, the “many” or “the
masses,” but still more because “national efforts” are at present the
order of the day, and because even the newest mutineers have not yet
shaken off this deceptive person, although on the other hand the latter
consideration must give the preference to the expression “mankind,”
since on all sides they are going in for enthusiasm over “mankind.”

The people, then — mankind or the family — have hitherto, as it seems,
played history: no _egoistic_ interest was to come up in these
societies, but solely general ones, national or popular interests, class
interests, family interests, and “general human interests.” But who has
brought to their fall the peoples whose decline history relates?  Who
but the egoist, who was seeking _his_ satisfaction!  If once an egoistic
interest crept in, the society was “corrupted” and moved toward its
dissolution, as Rome, _e.g._ proves with its highly developed system of
private rights, or Christianity with the incessantly-breaking-in
“rational self-determination,” “self-consciousness,” the “autonomy of
the spirit,” etc.

The Christian people has produced two societies whose duration will keep
equal measure with the permanence of that people: these are the
societies _State_ and _Church_.  Can they be called a union of egoists?
Do we in them pursue an egoistic, personal, own interest, or do we
pursue a popular (_i.e._ an interest of the Christian _people_), to wit,
a State, and Church interest?  Can I and may I be myself in them?  May I
think and act as I will, may I reveal myself, live myself out, busy
myself?  Must I not leave untouched the majesty of the State, the
sanctity of the Church?

Well, I may not do so as I will.  But shall I find in any society such
an unmeasured freedom of maying?  Certainly no!  Accordingly we might be
content?  Not a bit!  It is a different thing whether I rebound from an
ego or from a people, a generalization.  There I am my opponent’s
opponent, born his equal; here I am a despised opponent, bound and under
a guardian: there I stand man to man; here I am a schoolboy who can
accomplish nothing against his comrade because the latter has called
father and mother to aid and has crept under the apron, while I am well
scolded as an ill-bred brat, and I must not “argue”: there I fight
against a bodily enemy; here against mankind, against a generalization,
against a “majesty,” against a spook.  But to me no majesty, nothing
sacred, is a limit; nothing that I know how to overpower.  Only that
which I cannot overpower still limits my might; and I of limited might
am temporarily a limited I, not limited by the might _outside_ me, but
limited by my _own_ still deficient might, by my _own impotence_.
However, “the Guard dies, but does not surrender!” Above all, only a
bodily opponent!

<quote>

I dare meet every foeman

Whom I can see and measure with my eye,

mettle fires my mettle for the fight — etc.

</quote>

Many privileges have indeed been cancelled with time, but solely for the
sake of the common weal, of the State and the State’s weal, by no means
for the strengthening of me.  Vassalage, _e.g._, was abrogated only that
a single liege lord, the lord of the people, the monarchical power,
might be strengthened: vassalage under the one became yet more rigorous
thereby.  Only in favor of the monarch, be he called “prince” or “law,”
have privileges fallen.  In France the citizens are not, indeed, vassals
of the king, but are instead vassals of the “law” (the Charter).
_Subordination_ was retained, only the Christian State recognized that
man cannot serve two masters (the lord of the manor and the prince);
therefore one obtained all the prerogatives; now he can again _place_
one above another, he can make “men in high place.”

But of what concern to me is the common weal?  The common weal as such
is not _my weal_, but only the furthest extremity of _self-
renunciation_.  The common weal may cheer aloud while I must
“down”;[_Kuschen_, a word whose only use is in ordering dogs to keep
quiet] the State may shine while I starve.  In what lies the folly of
the political liberals but in their opposing the people to the
government and talking of people’s rights?  So there is the people going
to be of age, etc.  As if one who has no mouth could be _mündig_![This
is the word for “of age”; but it is derived from _Mund_, “mouth,” and
refers properly to the right of speaking through one’s own mouth, not by
a guardian] Only the individual is able to be _mündig_.  Thus the whole
question of the liberty of the press is turned upside down when it is
laid claim to as a “right of the people.” It is only a right, or better
the might, of the _individual_.  If a people has liberty of the press,
then I, although in the midst of this people, have it not; a liberty of
the people is not _my_ liberty, and the liberty of the press as a
liberty of the people must have at its side a press law directed against
_me_.

This must be insisted on all around against the present-day efforts for
liberty:

<quote>

Liberty of the _people_ is not _my_ liberty!

</quote>

Let us admit these categories, liberty of the people and right of the
people: _e.g._, the right of the people that everybody may bear arms.
Does one not forfeit such a right?  One cannot forfeit his own right,
but may well forfeit a right that belongs not to me but to the people.
I may be locked up for the sake of the liberty of the people; I may,
under sentence, incur the loss of the right to bear arms.

Liberalism appears as the last attempt at a creation of the liberty of
the people, a liberty of the commune, of “society,” of the general, of
mankind; the dream of a humanity, a people, a commune, a “society,” that
shall be of age.

A people cannot be free otherwise than at the individual’s expense; for
it is not the individual that is the main point in this liberty, but the
people.  The freer the people, the more bound the individual; the
Athenian people, precisely at its freest time, created ostracism,
banished the atheists, poisoned the most honest thinker.

How they do praise Socrates for his conscientiousness, which makes him
resist the advice to get away from the dungeon!  He is a fool that he
concedes to the Athenians a right to condemn him.  Therefore it
certainly serves him right; why then does he remain standing on an equal
footing with the Athenians?  Why does he not break with them?  Had he
known, and been able to know, what he was, he would have conceded to
such judges no claim, no right.  That _he did not escape_ was just his
weakness, his delusion of still having something in common with the
Athenians, or the opinion that he was a member, a mere member of this
people.  But he was rather this people itself in person, and could only
be his own judge.  There was no _judge over him_, as he himself had
really pronounced a public sentence on himself and rated himself worthy
of the Prytaneum.  He should have stuck to that, and, as he had uttered
no sentence of death against himself, should have despised that of the
Athenians too and escaped.  But he subordinated himself and recognized
in the _people_ his _judge;_ he seemed little to himself before the
majesty of the people.  That he subjected himself to _might_ (to which
alone he could succumb) as to a “right” was treason against himself: it
was _virtue_.  To Christ, who, it is alleged, refrained from using the
power over his heavenly legions, the same scrupulousness is thereby
ascribed by the narrators.  Luther did very well and wisely to have the
safety of his journey to Worms warranted to him in black and white, and
Socrates should have known that the Athenians were his _enemies_, he
alone his judge.  The self-deception of a “reign of law,” etc., should
have given way to the perception that the relation was a relation of
_might_.

It was with pettifoggery and intrigues that Greek liberty ended.  Why?
Because the ordinary Greeks could still less attain that logical
conclusion which not even their hero of thought, Socrates, was able to
draw.  What then is pettifoggery but a way of utilizing something
established without doing away with it?  I might add “for one’s own
advantage,” but, you see, that lies in “utilizing.” Such pettifoggers
are the theologians who “wrest” and “force” God’s word; what would they
have to wrest if it were not for the “established” Word of God?  So
those liberals who only shake and wrest the “established order.” They
are all perverters, like those perverters of the law.  Socrates
recognized law, right; the Greeks constantly retained the authority of
right and law.  If with this recognition they wanted nevertheless to
assert their advantage, every one his own, then they had to seek it in
perversion of the law, or intrigue.  Alcibiades, an intriguer of genius,
introduces the period of Athenian “decay”; the Spartan Lysander and
others show that intrigue had become universally Greek.  Greek _law_, on
which the Greek _States_ rested, had to be perverted and undermined by
the egoists within these States, and the _States_ went down that the
_individuals_ might become free, the Greek people fell because the
individuals cared less for this people than for themselves.  In general,
all States, constitutions, churches, have sunk by the _secession_ of
individuals; for the individual is the irreconcilable enemy of every
_generality_, every _tie_, _i.e._ every fetter.  Yet people fancy to
this day that man needs “sacred ties”: he, the deadly enemy of every
“tie.” The history of the world shows that no tie has yet remained
unrent, shows that man tirelessly defends himself against ties of every
sort; and yet, blinded, people think up new ties again and again, and
think, _e.g._, that they have arrived at the right one if one puts upon
them the tie of a so-called free constitution, a beautiful,
constitutional tie; decoration ribbons, the ties of confidence between
“— — —,” do seem gradually to have become somewhat infirm, but people
have made no further progress than from apron-strings to garters and
collars.

_Everything sacred is a tie, a fetter_.

Everything sacred is and must be perverted by perverters of the law;
therefore our present time has multitudes of such perverters in all
spheres.  They are preparing the way for the break-up of law, for
lawlessness.

Poor Athenians who are accused of pettifoggery and sophistry!  poor
Alcibiades, of intrigue!  Why, that was just your best point, your first
step in freedom.  Your Æeschylus, Herodotus, etc., only wanted to have a
free Greek _people;_ you were the first to surmise something of _your_
freedom.

A people represses those who tower above _its majesty_, by ostracism
against too-powerful citizens, by the Inquisition against the heretics
of the Church, by the — Inquisition against traitors in the State.

For the people is concerned only with its self-assertion; it demands
“patriotic self-sacrifice” from everybody.  To it, accordingly, every
one _in himself_ is indifferent, a nothing, and it cannot do, not even
suffer, what the individual and he alone must do — to wit, _turn him to
account_.  Every people, every State, is unjust toward the _egoist_.

As long as there still exists even one institution which the individual
may not dissolve, the ownness and self-appurtenance of Me is still very
remote.  How can I, _e.g._ be free when I must bind myself by oath to a
constitution, a charter, a law, “vow body and soul” to my people?  How
can I be my own when my faculties may develop only so far as they “do
not disturb the harmony of society” (Weitling)?

The fall of peoples and mankind will invite _me_ to my rise.

Listen, even as I am writing this, the bells begin to sound, that they
may jingle in for tomorrow the festival of the thousand years’ existence
of our dear Germany.  Sound, sound its knell!  You do sound solemn
enough, as if your tongue was moved by the presentiment that it is
giving convoy to a corpse.  The German people and German peoples have
behind them a history of a thousand years: what a long life!  O, go to
rest, never to rise again — that all may become free whom you so long
have held in fetters.  — The _people_ is dead.  — Up with _me_!

O thou my much-tormented German people — what was thy torment?  It was
the torment of a thought that cannot create itself a body, the torment
of a walking spirit that dissolves into nothing at every cock-crow and
yet pines for deliverance and fulfillment.  In me too thou hast lived
long, thou dear — thought, thou dear — spook.  Already I almost fancied
I had found the word of thy deliverance, discovered flesh and bones for
the wandering spirit; then I hear them sound, the bells that usher thee
into eternal rest; then the last hope fades out, then the notes of the
last love die away, then I depart from the desolate house of those who
now are dead and enter at the door of the — living one:

<quote>

For only he who is alive is in the right.

</quote>

Farewell, thou dream of so many millions; farewell, thou who hast
tyrannized over thy children for a thousand years!

Tomorrow they carry thee to the grave; soon thy sisters, the peoples,
will follow thee.  But, when they have all followed, then — — mankind is
buried, and I am my own, I am the laughing heir!


	* * *

The word _Gesellschaft_ (society) has its origin in the word _Sal_
(hall).  If one hall encloses many persons, then the hall causes these
persons to be in society.  They _are_ in society, and at most constitute
a parlor-society by talking in the traditional forms of parlor speech.
When it comes to real _intercourse_, this is to be regarded as
independent of society: it may occur or be lacking, without altering the
nature of what is named society.  Those who are in the hall are a
society even as mute persons, or when they put each other off solely
with empty phrases of courtesy.  Intercourse is mutuality, it is the
action, the _commercium_, of individuals; society is only community of
the hall, and even the statues of a museum-hall are in society, they are
“grouped.” People are accustomed to say “they _haben inne_ [“Occupy”;
literally, “have within”] this hall in common,” but the case is rather
that the hall has us _inne_ or in it.  So far the natural signification
of the word society.  In this it comes out that society is not generated
by me and you, but by a third factor which makes associates out of us
two, and that it is just this third factor that is the creative one,
that which creates society.

Just so a prison society or prison companionship (those who enjoy[74]
the same prison).  Here we already hit upon a third factor fuller of
significance than was that merely local one, the hall.  Prison no longer
means a space only, but a space with express reference to its
inhabitants: for it is a prison only through being destined for
prisoners, without whom it would be a mere building.  What gives a
common stamp to those who are gathered in it?  Evidently the prison,
since it is only by means of the prison that they are prisoners.  What,
then, determines the _manner_ of life of the prison society?  The
prison!  What determines their intercourse?  The prison too, perhaps?
Certainly they can enter upon intercourse only as prisoners, _i.e._ only
so far as the prison laws allow it; but that _they themselves_ hold
intercourse, I with you, this the prison cannot bring to pass; on the
contrary, it must have an eye to guarding against such egoistic, purely
personal intercourse (and only as such is it really intercourse between
me and you).  That we _jointly_ execute a job, run a machine, effectuate
anything in general — for this a prison will indeed provide; but that I
forget that I am a prisoner, and engage in intercourse with you who
likewise disregard it, brings danger to the prison, and not only cannot
be caused by it, but must not even be permitted.  For this reason the
saintly and moral-minded French chamber decides to introduce solitary
confinement, and other saints will do the like in order to cut off
“demoralizing intercourse.” Imprisonment is the established and — sacred
condition, to injure which no attempt must be made.  The slightest push
of that kind is punishable, as is every uprising against a sacred thing
by which man is to be charmed and chained.

Like the hall, the prison does form a society, a companionship, a
communion (_e.g._ communion of labor), but no _intercourse_, no
reciprocity, no _union_.  On the contrary, every union in the prison
bears within it the dangerous seed of a “plot,” which under favorable
circumstances might spring up and bear fruit.

Yet one does not usually enter the prison voluntarily, and seldom
remains in it voluntarily either, but cherishes the egoistic desire for
liberty.  Here, therefore, it sooner becomes manifest that personal
intercourse is in hostile relations to the prison society and tends to
the dissolution of this very society, this joint incarceration.

Let us therefore look about for such communions as, it seems, we remain
in gladly and voluntarily, without wanting to endanger them by our
egoistic impulses.

As a communion of the required sort the _family_ offers itself in the
first place.  Parents, husbands and wife, children, brothers and
sisters, represent a whole or form a family, for the further widening of
which the collateral relatives also may be made to serve if taken into
account.  The family is a true communion only when the law of the
family, piety[75] or family love, is observed by its members.  A son to
whom parents, brothers, and sisters have become indifferent _has been_ a
son; for, as the sonship no longer shows itself efficacious, it has no
greater significance than the long-past connection of mother and child
by the navel-string.  That one has once lived in this bodily juncture
cannot as a fact be undone; and so far one remains irrevocably this
mother’s son and the brother of the rest of her children; but it would
come to a lasting connection only by lasting piety, this spirit of the
family.  Individuals are members of a family in the full sense only when
they make the _persistence_ of the family their task; only as
_conservative_ do they keep aloof from doubting their basis, the family.
To every member of the family one thing must be fixed and sacred —
_viz_., the family itself, or, more expressively, piety.  That the
family is to _persist_ remains to its member, so long as he keeps
himself free from that egoism which is hostile to the family, an
unassailable truth.  In a word: — If the family is sacred, then nobody
who belongs to it may secede from it; else he becomes a “criminal”
against the family: he may never pursue an interest hostile to the
family, _e.g._ form a misalliance.  He who does this has “dishonored the
family,” “put it to shame,” etc.

Now, if in an individual the egoistic impulse has not force enough, he
complies and makes a marriage which suits the claims of the family,
takes a rank which harmonizes with its position, etc.; in short, he
“does honor to the family.”

If, on the contrary, the egoistic blood flows fierily enough in his
veins, he prefers to become a “criminal” against the family and to throw
off its laws.

Which of the two lies nearer my heart, the good of the family or my
good?  In innumerable cases both go peacefully together; the advantage
of the family is at the same time mine, and _vice versa_.  Then it is
hard to decide whether I am thinking _selfishly_ or _for the common
benefit_, and perhaps I complacently flatter myself with my
unselfishness.  But there comes the day when a necessity of choice makes
me tremble, when I have it in mind to dishonor my family tree, to
affront parents, brothers, and kindred.  What then?  Now it will appear
how I am disposed at the bottom of my heart; now it will be revealed
whether piety ever stood above egoism for me, now the selfish one can no
longer skulk behind the semblance of unselfishness.  A wish rises in my
soul, and, growing from hour to hour, becomes a passion.  To whom does
it occur at first blush that the slightest thought which may result
adversely to the spirit of the family (piety) bears within it a
transgression against this?  Nay, who at once, in the first moment,
becomes completely conscious of the matter?  It happens so with Juliet
in “Romeo and Juliet.” The unruly passion can at last no longer be
tamed, and undermines the building of piety.  You will say, indeed, it
is from self-will that the family casts out of its bosom those wilful
ones that grant more of a hearing to their passion than to piety; the
good Protestants used the same excuse with much success against the
Catholics, and believed in it themselves.  But it is just a subterfuge
to roll the fault off oneself, nothing more.  The Catholics had regard
for the common bond of the church, and thrust those heretics from them
only because these did not have so much regard for the bond of the
church as to sacrifice their convictions to it; the former, therefore,
held the bond fast, because the bond, the Catholic (_i.e._ common and
united) church, was sacred to them; the latter, on the contrary,
disregarded the bond.  Just so those who lack piety.  They are not
thrust out, but thrust themselves out, prizing their passion, their
wilfulness, higher than the bond of the family.

But now sometimes a wish glimmers in a less passionate and wilful heart
than Juliet’s.  The pliable girl brings herself as a _sacrifice_ to the
peace of the family.  One might say that here too selfishness prevailed,
for the decision came from the feeling that the pliable girl felt
herself more satisfied by the unity of the family than by the
fulfillment of her wish.  That might be; but what if there remained a
sure sign that egoism had been sacrificed to piety?  What if, even after
the wish that had been directed against the peace of the family was
sacrificed, it remained at least as a recollection of a “sacrifice”
brought to a sacred tie?  What if the pliable girl were conscious of
having left her self-will unsatisfied and humbly subjected herself to a
higher power?  Subjected and sacrificed, because the superstition of
piety exercised its dominion over her!

There egoism won, here piety wins and the egoistic heart bleeds; there
egoism was strong, here it was — weak.  But the weak, as we have long
known, are the — unselfish.  For them, for these its weak members, the
family cares, because they _belong_ to the family, do not belong to
themselves and care for themselves.  This weakness Hegel, _e.g._ praises
when he wants to have match- making left to the choice of the parents.

As a sacred communion to which, among the rest, the individual owes
obedience, the family has the judicial function too vested in it; such a
“family court” is described _e.g._ in the _Cabanis_ of Wilibald Alexis.
There the father, in the name of the “family council,” puts the
intractable son among the soldiers and thrusts him out of the family, in
order to cleanse the smirched family again by means of this act of
punishment.  — The most consistent development of family responsibility
is contained in Chinese law, according to which the whole family has to
expiate the individual’s fault.

Today, however, the arm of family power seldom reaches far enough to
take seriously in hand the punishment of apostates (in most cases the
State protects even against disinheritance).  The criminal against the
family (family-criminal) flees into the domain of the State and is free,
as the State-criminal who gets away to America is no longer reached by
the punishments of his State.  He who has shamed his family, the
graceless son, is protected against the family’s punishment because the
State, this protecting lord, takes away from family punishment its
“sacredness” and profanes it, decreeing that it is only —“revenge”: it
restrains punishment, this sacred family right, because before its, the
State’s, “sacredness” the subordinate sacredness of the family always
pales and loses its sanctity as soon as it comes in conflict with this
higher sacredness.  Without the conflict, the State lets pass the lesser
sacredness of the family; but in the opposite case it even commands
crime against the family, charging, _e.g._, the son to refuse obedience
to his parents as soon as they want to beguile him to a crime against
the State.

Well, the egoist has broken the ties of the family and found in the
State a lord to shelter him against the grievously affronted spirit of
the family.  But where has he run now?  Straight into a new _society_,
in which his egoism is awaited by the same snares and nets that it has
just escaped.  For the State is likewise a society, not a union; it is
the broadened _family_ (“Father of the Country — Mother of the Country —
children of the country”).


	* * *

What is called a State is a tissue and plexus of dependence and
adherence; it is a _belonging together_, a holding together, in which
those who are placed together fit themselves to each other, or, in
short, mutually depend on each other: it is the _order_ of this
_dependence_.  Suppose the king, whose authority lends authority to all
down to the beadle, should vanish: still all in whom the will for order
was awake would keep order erect against the disorders of bestiality.
If disorder were victorious, the State would be at an end.

But is this thought of love, to fit ourselves to each other, to adhere
to each other and depend on each other, really capable of winning us?
According to this the State should be _love_ realized, the being for
each other and living for each other of all.  Is not self-will being
lost while we attend to the will for order?  Will people not be
satisfied when order is cared for by authority, _i.e._ when authority
sees to it that no one “gets in the way of” another; when, then, the
_herd_ is judiciously distributed or ordered?  Why, then everything is
in “the best order,” and it is this best order that is called — State!

Our societies and States _are_ without our _making_ them, are united
without our uniting, are predestined and established, or have an
independent standing[76] of their own, are the indissolubly established
against us egoists.  The fight of the world today is, as it is said,
directed against the “established.” Yet people are wont to misunderstand
this as if it were only that what is now established was to be exchanged
for another, a better, established system.  But war might rather be
declared against establishment itself, the _State_, not a particular
State, not any such thing as the mere condition of the State at the
time; it is not another State (_e.g._ a “people’s State”) that men aim
at, but their _union_, uniting, this ever-fluid uniting of everything
standing.  — A State exists even without my co-operation: I am born in
it, brought up in it, under obligations to it, and must “do it
homage.”[_huldigen_] It takes me up into its “favor,”[_Huld_] and I live
by its “grace.” Thus the independent establishment of the State founds
my lack of independence; its condition as a “natural growth,” its
organism, demands that my nature do not grow freely, but be cut to fit
it.  That _it_ may be able to unfold in natural growth, it applies to me
the shears of “civilization”; it gives me an education and culture
adapted to it, not to me, and teaches me _e.g._ to respect the laws, to
refrain from injury to State property (_i.e._ private property), to
reverence divine and earthly highness, etc.; in short, it teaches me to
be — _unpunishable_, “sacrificing” my ownness to “sacredness”
(everything possible is sacred; _e.g._ property, others’ life, etc.).
In this consists the sort of civilization and culture that the State is
able to give me: it brings me up to be a “serviceable instrument,” a
“serviceable member of society.”

This every State must do, the people’s State as well as the absolute or
constitutional one.  It must do so as long as we rest in the error that
it is an _I_, as which it then applies to itself the name of a “moral,
mystical, or political person.” I, who really am I, must pull off this
lion-skin of the I from the stalking thistle-eater.  What manifold
robbery have I not put up with in the history of the world!  There I let
sun, moon, and stars, cats and crocodiles, receive the honor of ranking
as I; there Jehovah, Allah, and Our Father came and were invested with
the I; there families, tribes, peoples, and at last actually mankind,
came and were honored as I’s; there the Church, the State, came with the
pretension to be I — and I gazed calmly on all.  What wonder if then
there was always a real I too that joined the company and affirmed in my
face that it was not my _you_ but my real _I_.  Why, _the_ Son of Man
_par excellence_ had done the like; why should not _a_ son of man do it
too?  So I saw my I always above me and outside me, and could never
really come to myself.

I never believed in myself; I never believed in my present, I saw myself
only in the future.  The boy believes he will be a proper I, a proper
fellow, only when he has become a man; the man thinks, only in the other
world will he be something proper.  And, to enter more closely upon
reality at once, even the best are today still persuading each other
that one must have received into himself the State, his people, mankind,
and what not, in order to be a real I, a “free burgher,” a “citizen,” a
“free or true man”; they too see the truth and reality of me in the
reception of an alien I and devotion to it.  And what sort of an I?  An
I that is neither an I nor a you, a _fancied_ I, a spook.

While in the Middle Ages the church could well brook many States living
united in it, the States learned after the Reformation, especially after
the Thirty Years’ War, to tolerate many churches (confessions) gathering
under one crown.  But all States are religious and, as the case may be,
“Christian States,” and make it their task to force the intractable, the
“egoists,” under the bond of the unnatural, _e.g._, Christianize them.
All arrangements of the Christian State have the object of
_Christianizing the people_.  Thus the court has the object of forcing
people to justice, the school that of forcing them to mental culture —
in short, the object of protecting those who act Christianly against
those who act un-Christianly, of bringing Christian action to
_dominion_, of making it _powerful_.  Among these means of force the
State counted the _Church_ too, it demanded a — particular religion from
everybody.  Dupin said lately against the clergy, “Instruction and
education belong to the State.”

Certainly everything that regards the principle of morality is a State
affair.  Hence it is that the Chinese State meddles so much in family
concerns, and one is nothing there if one is not first of all a good
child to his parents.  Family concerns are altogether State concerns
with us too, only that our State — puts confidence in the families
without painful oversight; it holds the family bound by the marriage
tie, and this tie cannot be broken without it.

But that the State makes me responsible for my principles, and demands
certain ones from me, might make me ask, what concern has it with the
“wheel in my head” (principle)?  Very much, for the State is the —
_ruling principle_.  It is supposed that in divorce matters, in marriage
law in general, the question is of the proportion of rights between
Church and States.  Rather, the question is of whether anything sacred
is to rule over man, be it called faith or ethical law (morality).  The
State behaves as the same ruler that the Church was.  The latter rests
on godliness, the former on morality.

People talk of the tolerance, the leaving opposite tendencies free,
etc., by which civilized States are distinguished.  Certainly some are
strong enough to look with complacency on even the most unrestrained
meetings, while others charge their catchpolls to go hunting for
tobacco-pipes.  Yet for one State as for another the play of individuals
among themselves, their buzzing to and fro, their daily life, is an
_incident_ which it must be content to leave to themselves because it
can do nothing with this.  Many, indeed, still strain out gnats and
swallow camels, while others are shrewder.  Individuals are “freer” in
the latter, because less pestered.  But _I_ am free in _no_ State.  The
lauded tolerance of States is simply a tolerating of the “harmless,” the
“not dangerous”; it is only elevation above pettymindedness, only a more
estimable, grander, prouder — despotism.  A certain State seemed for a
while to mean to be pretty well elevated above _literary_ combats, which
might be carried on with all heat; England is elevated above _popular
turmoil_ and — tobacco-smoking.  But woe to the literature that deals
blows at the State itself, woe to the mobs that “endanger” the State.
In that certain State they dream of a “free science,” in England of a
“free popular life.”

The State does let individuals _play_ as freely as possible, only they
must not be in _earnest_, must not forget _it_.  Man must not carry on
intercourse with man _unconcernedly_, not without “superior oversight
and mediation.” I must not execute all that I am able to, but only so
much as the State allows; I must not turn to account _my_ thoughts, nor
_my_ work, nor, in general, anything of mine.

The State always has the sole purpose to limit, tame, subordinate, the
individual — to make him subject to some _generality_ or other; it lasts
only so long as the individual is not all in all, and it is only the
clearly-marked _restriction of me_, my limitation, my slavery.  Never
does a State aim to bring in the free activity of individuals, but
always that which is bound to the _purpose of the State_.  Through the
State nothing _in common_ comes to pass either, as little as one can
call a piece of cloth the common work of all the individual parts of a
machine; it is rather the work of the whole machine as a unit, _machine
work_.  In the same style everything is done by the _State machine_ too;
for it moves the clockwork of the individual minds, none of which follow
their own impulse.  The State seeks to hinder every free activity by its
censorship, its supervision, its police, and holds this hindering to be
its duty, because it is in truth a duty of self-preservation.  The State
wants to make something out of man, therefore there live in it only
_made_ men; every one who wants to be his own self is its opponent and
is nothing.  “He is nothing” means as much as, the State does not make
use of him, grants him no position, no office, no trade, etc.

Edgar Bauer,[77] in the _Liberale Bestrebungen_ (vol.  II, p.50), is
still dreaming of a “government which, proceeding out of the people, can
never stand in opposition to it.” He does indeed (p.69) himself take
back the word “government”: “In the republic no government at all
obtains, but only an executive authority.  An authority which proceeds
purely and alone out of the people; which has not an independent power,
independent principles, independent officers, over against the people;
but which has its foundation, the fountain of its power and of its
principles, in the sole, supreme authority of the State, in the people.
The concept government, therefore, is not at all suitable in the
people’s State.” But the thing remains the same.  That which has
“proceeded, been founded, sprung from the fountain” becomes something
“independent” and, like a child delivered from the womb, enters upon
opposition at once.  The government, if it were nothing independent and
opposing, would be nothing at all.

“In the free State there is no government,” etc.  (p.94).  This surely
means that the people, when it is the _sovereign_, does not let itself
be conducted by a superior authority.  Is it perchance different in
absolute monarchy?  Is there _there_ for the _sovereign_, perchance, a
government standing over him?  _Over_ the sovereign, be he called prince
or people, there never stands a government: that is understood of
itself.  But over _me_ there will stand a government in every “State,”
in the absolute as well as in the republican or “free.” I am as badly
off in one as in the other.

The republic is nothing whatever but — absolute monarchy; for it makes
no difference whether the monarch is called prince or people, both being
a “majesty.” Constitutionalism itself proves that nobody is able and
willing to be only an instrument.  The ministers domineer over their
master the prince, the deputies over their master the people.  Here,
then, the _parties_ at least are already free — _videlicet_, the
office-holders’ party (so-called people’s party).  The prince must
conform to the will of the ministers, the people dance to the pipe of
the chambers.  Constitutionalism is further than the republic, because
it is the _State_ in incipient _dissolution_.

Edgar Bauer denies (p.56) that the people is a “personality” in the
constitutional State; _per contra_, then, in the republic?  Well, in the
constitutional State the people is — a _party_, and a party is surely a
“personality” if one is once resolved to talk of a “political” (p.76)
moral person anyhow.  The fact is that a moral person, be it called
people’s party or people or even “the Lord,” is in no wise a person, but
a spook.

Further, Edgar Bauer goes on (p.69): “guardianship is the characteristic
of a government.” Truly, still more that of a people and “people’s
State”; it is the characteristic of all _dominion_.  A people’s State,
which “unites in itself all completeness of power,” the “absolute
master,” cannot let me become powerful.  And what a chimera, to be no
longer willing to call the “people’s officials” “servants, instruments,”
because they “execute the free, rational law-will of the people!”
(p.73).  He thinks (p.74): “Only by all official circles subordinating
themselves to the government’s views can unity be brought into the
State”; but his “people’s State” is to have “unity” too; how will a lack
of subordination be allowed there?  subordination to the — people’s
will.

“In the constitutional State it is the regent and his _disposition_ that
the whole structure of government rests on in the end.” (p.  130.) How
would that be otherwise in the “people’s State”?  Shall _I_ not there be
governed by the people’s _disposition_ too, and does it make a
difference _for me_ whether I see myself kept in dependence by the
prince’s disposition or by the people’s disposition, so-called “public
opinion”?  If dependence means as much as “religious relation,” as Edgar
Bauer rightly alleges, then in the people’s State the people remains
_for me_ the superior power, the “majesty” (for God and prince have
their proper essence in “majesty”) to which I stand in religious
relations.  — Like the sovereign regent, the sovereign people too would
be reached by no _law_.  Edgar Bauer’s whole attempt comes to a _change
of masters_.  Instead of wanting to make the _people_ free, he should
have had his mind on the sole realizable freedom, his own.

In the constitutional State _absolutism_ itself has at last come in
conflict with itself, as it has been shattered into a duality; the
government wants to be absolute, and the people wants to be absolute.
These two absolutes will wear out against each other.

Edgar Bauer inveighs against the determination of the regent _by birth_,
by _chance_.  But, when “the people” have become “the sole power in the
State” (p.  132), have _we_ not then in it a master from _chance?_ Why,
what is the people?  The people has always been only the _body_ of the
government: it is many under one hat (a prince’s hat) or many under one
constitution.  And the constitution is the — prince.  Princes and
peoples will persist so long as both do not _col_lapse, _i.  e._, fall
_together_.  If under one constitution there are many “peoples” — as in
the ancient Persian monarchy and today —then these “peoples” rank only
as “provinces.” For me the people is in any case an —accidental power, a
force of nature, an enemy that I must overcome.

What is one to think of under the name of an “organized” people (p.
132)?  A people “that no longer has a government,” that governs itself.
In which, therefore, no ego stands out prominently; a people organized
by ostracism.  The banishment of egos, ostracism, makes the people
autocrat.

If you speak of the people, you must speak of the prince; for the
people, if it is to be a subject[78] and make history, must, like
everything that acts, have a _head_, its “supreme head.” Weitling sets
this forth in [_Die Europäische_] Triarchie, and Proudhon declares,
“_une société, pour ainsi dire acéphale, ne peut vivre_.”[79]

The _vox populi_ is now always held up to us, and “public opinion” is to
rule our princes.  Certainly the _vox populi_ is at the same time _vox
dei;_ but is either of any use, and is not the _vox principis_ also _vox
dei_?

At this point the “Nationals” may be brought to mind.  To demand of the
thirty-eight States of Germany that they shall act as _one nation_ can
only be put alongside the senseless desire that thirty-eight swarms of
bees, led by thirty-eight queen-bees, shall unite themselves into one
swarm.  _Bees_ they all remain; but it is not the bees as bees that
belong together and can join themselves together, it is only that the
_subject_ bees are connected with the _ruling_ queens.  Bees and peoples
are destitute of will, and the _instinct_ of their queens leads them.

If one were to point the bees to their beehood, in which at any rate
they are all equal to each other, one would be doing the same thing that
they are now doing so stormily in pointing the Germans to their
Germanhood.  Why, Germanhood is just like beehood in this very thing,
that it bears in itself the necessity of cleavages and separations, yet
without pushing on to the last separation, where, with the complete
carrying through of the process of separating, its end appears: I mean,
to the separation of man from man.  Germanhood does indeed divide itself
into different peoples and tribes, _i.e._ beehives; but the individual
who has the quality of being a German is still as powerless as the
isolated bee.  And yet only individuals can enter into union with each
other, and all alliances and leagues of peoples are and remain
mechanical compoundings, because those who come together, at least so
far as the “peoples” are regarded as the ones that have come together,
are _destitute of will_.  Only with the last separation does separation
itself end and change to unification.

Now the Nationals are exerting themselves to set up the abstract,
lifeless unity of beehood; but the self-owned are going to fight for the
unity willed by their own will, for union.  This is the token of all
reactionary wishes, that they want to set up something _general_,
abstract, an empty, lifeless _concept_, in distinction from which the
self-owned aspire to relieve the robust, lively _particular_ from the
trashy burden of generalities.  The reactionaries would be glad to smite
a _people, a nation_, forth from the earth; the self-owned have before
their eyes only themselves.  In essentials the two efforts that are just
now the order of the day — to wit, the restoration of provincial rights
and of the old tribal divisions (Franks, Bavarians, Lusatia, etc.), and
the restoration of the entire nationality — coincide in one.  But the
Germans will come into unison, _i.e._ unite _themselves_, only when they
knock over their beehood as well as all the beehives; in other words,
when they are more than — Germans: only then can they form a “German
Union.” They must not want to turn back into their nationality, into the
womb, in order to be born again, but let every one turn in to _himself_.
How ridiculously sentimental when one German grasps another’s hand and
presses it with sacred awe because “he too is a German!” With that he is
something great!  But this will certainly still be thought touching as
long as people are enthusiastic for “brotherliness,” _i.e._ as long as
they have a _“family disposition”_.  From the superstition of “piety,”
from “brotherliness” or “childlikeness” or however else the soft-hearted
piety-phrases run — from the _family spirit_ — the Nationals, who want
to have a great _family of Germans_, cannot liberate themselves.

Aside from this, the so-called Nationals would only have to understand
themselves rightly in order to lift themselves out of their juncture
with the good-natured Teutomaniacs.  For the uniting for material ends
and interests, which they demand of the Germans, comes to nothing else
than a voluntary union.  Carrière, inspired, cries out,[80] “Railroads
are to the more penetrating eye the way to a _life of the people_ _e.g._
has not yet anywhere appeared in such significance.” Quite right, it
will be a life of the people that has nowhere appeared, because it is
not a — life of the people.  — So Carrière then combats himself (p.
10): “Pure humanity or manhood cannot be better represented than by a
people fulfilling its mission.” Why, by this nationality only is
represented.  “Washed-out generality is lower than the form complete in
itself, which is itself a whole, and lives as a living member of the
truly general, the organized.” Why, the people is this very “washed-out
generality,” and it is only a man that is the “form complete in itself.”

The impersonality of what they call “people, nation,” is clear also from
this: that a people which wants to bring its I into view to the best of
its power puts at its head the ruler _without will_.  It finds itself in
the alternative either to be subjected to a prince who realizes only
_himself, his individual pleasure —_ then it does not recognize in the
“absolute master” its own will, the so-called will of the people — or to
seat on the throne a prince who gives effect to no will of his own —
then it has a prince _without will_, whose place some ingenious
clockwork would perhaps fill just as well.  — Therefore insight need go
only a step farther; then it becomes clear of itself that the I of the
people is an impersonal, “spiritual” power, the — law.  The people’s I,
therefore, is a — spook, not an I.  I am I only by this, that I make
myself; _i.e._ that it is not another who makes me, but I must be my own
work.  But how is it with this I of the people?  _Chance_ plays it into
the people’s hand, chance gives it this or that born lord, accidents
procure it the chosen one; he is not its (the _“sovereign”_ people’s)
product, as I am _my_ product.  Conceive of one wanting to talk you into
believing that you were not your I, but Tom or Jack was your I!  But so
it is with the people, and rightly.  For the people has an I as little
as the eleven planets counted together have an I, though they revolve
around a common _center_.

Bailly’s utterance is representative of the slave-disposition that folks
manifest before the sovereign people, as before the prince.  “I have,”
says he, “no longer any extra reason when the general reason has
pronounced itself.  My first law was the nation’s will; as soon as it
had assembled I knew nothing beyond its sovereign will.” He would have
no “extra reason,” and yet this extra reason alone accomplishes
everything.  Just so Mirabeau inveighs in the words, “No power on earth
has the _right_ to say to the nation’s representatives, It is my will!”

As with the Greeks, there is now a wish to make man a _zoon politicon_,
a citizen of the State or political man.  So he ranked for a long time
as a “citizen of heaven.” But the Greek fell into ignominy along with
his _State_, the citizen of heaven likewise falls with heaven; we, on
the other hand, are not willing to go down along with the _people_, the
nation and nationality, not willing to be merely _political_ men or
politicians.  Since the Revolution they have striven to “make the people
happy,” and in making the people happy, great, etc., they make us
unhappy: the people’s good hap is — my mishap.

What empty talk the political liberals utter with emphatic decorum is
well seen again in Nauwerck’s “On Taking Part in the State”.  There
complaint is made of those who are indifferent and do not take part, who
are not in the full sense citizens, and the author speaks as if one
could not be man at all if one did not take a lively part in State
affairs, _i.e._ if one were not a politician.  In this he is right; for,
if the State ranks as the warder of everything “human,” we can have
nothing human without taking part in it.  But what does this make out
against the egoist?  Nothing at all, because the egoist is to himself
the warder of the human, and has nothing to say to the State except “Get
out of my sunshine.” Only when the State comes in contact with his
ownness does the egoist take an active interest in it.  If the condition
of the State does not bear hard on the closet-philosopher, is he to
occupy himself with it because it is his “most sacred duty?” So long as
the State does according to his wish, what need has he to look up from
his studies?  Let those who from an interest of their own want to have
conditions otherwise busy themselves with them.  Not now, nor evermore,
will “sacred duty” bring folks to reflect about the State — as little as
they become disciples of science, artists, etc., from “sacred duty.”
Egoism alone can impel them to it, and will as soon as things have
become much worse.  If you showed folks that their egoism demanded that
they busy themselves with State affairs, you would not have to call on
them long; if, on the other hand, you appeal to their love of fatherland
etc., you will long preach to deaf hearts in behalf of this “service of
love.” Certainly, in your sense the egoists will not participate in
State affairs at all.

Nauwerck utters a genuine liberal phrase on p.  16: “Man completely
fulfills his calling only in feeling and knowing himself as a member of
humanity, and being active as such.  The individual cannot realize the
idea of _manhood_ if he does not stay himself upon all humanity, if he
does not draw his powers from it like Antaeus.”

In the same place it is said: “Man’s relation to the _res publica_ is
degraded to a purely private matter by the theological view; is,
accordingly, made away with by denial.” As if the political view did
otherwise with religion!  There religion is a “private matter.”

If, instead of “sacred duty,” “man’s destiny,” the “calling to full
manhood,” and similar commandments, it were held up to people that their
_self-interest_ was infringed on when they let everything in the State
go as it goes, then, without declamations, they would be addressed as
one will have to address them at the decisive moment if he wants to
attain his end.  Instead of this, the theology-hating author says, “If
there has ever been a time when the _State_ laid claim to all that are
hers, such a time is ours.  — The thinking man sees in participation in
the theory and practice of the State a _duty_, one of the most sacred
duties that rest upon him” — and then takes under closer consideration
the “unconditional necessity that everybody participate in the State.”

He in whose head or heart or both the _State_ is seated, he who is
possessed by the State, or the _believer in the State_, is a politician,
and remains such to all eternity.

“The State is the most necessary means for the complete development of
mankind.” It assuredly has been so as long as we wanted to develop
mankind; but, if we want to develop ourselves, it can be to us only a
means of hindrance.

Can State and people still be reformed and bettered now?  As little as
the nobility, the clergy, the church, etc.: they can be abrogated,
annihilated, done away with, not reformed.  Can I change a piece of
nonsense into sense by reforming it, or must I drop it outright?

Henceforth what is to be done is no longer about the _State_ (the form
of the State, etc.), but about me.  With this all questions about the
prince’s power, the constitution, etc., sink into their true abyss and
their true nothingness.  I, this nothing, shall put forth my _creations_
from myself.


	* * *

To the chapter of society belongs also “the party,” whose praise has of
late been sung.

In the State the _party_ is current.  “Party, party, who should not join
one!” But the individual is _unique_,[_einzig_] not a member of the
party.  He unites freely, and separates freely again.  The party is
nothing but a State in the State, and in this smaller bee- State “peace”
is also to rule just as in the greater.  The very people who cry loudest
that there must be an _opposition_ in the State inveigh against every
discord in the party.  A proof that they too want only a —State.  All
parties are shattered not against the State, but against the ego.[_am
Einzigen_]

One hears nothing oftener now than the admonition to remain true to his
party; party men despise nothing so much as a mugwump.  One must run
with his party through thick and thin, and unconditionally approve and
represent its chief principles.  It does not indeed go quite so badly
here as with closed societies, because these bind their members to fixed
laws or statutes (_e.g._ the orders, the Society of Jesus, etc.).  But
yet the party ceases to be a union at the same moment at which it makes
certain principles _binding_ and wants to have them assured against
attacks; but this moment is the very birth-act of the party.  As party
it is already a _born society_, a dead union, an idea that has become
fixed.  As party of absolutism it cannot will that its members should
doubt the irrefragable truth of this principle; they could cherish this
doubt only if they were egoistic enough to want still to be something
outside their party, _i.e._ non-partisans.  Non-partisans they cannot be
as party-men, but only as egoists.  If you are a Protestant and belong
to that party, you must only justify Protestantism, at most “purge” it,
not reject it; if you are a Christian and belong among men to the
Christian party, you cannot be beyond this as a member of this party,
but only when your egoism, _i.e._ non-partisanship, impels you to it.
What exertions the Christians, down to Hegel and the Communists, have
put forth to make their party strong!  They stuck to it that
Christianity must contain the eternal truth, and that one needs only to
get at it, make sure of it, and justify it.

In short, the party cannot bear non-partisanship, and it is in this that
egoism appears.  What matters the party to me?  I shall find enough
anyhow who _unite_ with me without swearing allegiance to my flag.

He who passes over from one party to another is at once abused as a
“turncoat.” Certainly _morality_ demands that one stand by his party,
and to become apostate from it is to spot oneself with the stain of
“faithlessness”; but ownness knows no commandment of “faithlessness”;
adhesion, etc., ownness permits everything, even apostasy, defection.
Unconsciously even the moral themselves let themselves be led by this
principle when they have to judge one who passes over to _their_ party —
nay, they are likely to be making proselytes; they should only at the
same time acquire a consciousness of the fact that one must commit
_immoral_ actions in order to commit his own — _i.e._ here, that one
must break faith, yes, even his oath, in order to determine himself
instead of being determined by moral considerations.  In the eyes of
people of strict moral judgment an apostate always shimmers in equivocal
colors, and will not easily obtain their confidence; for there sticks to
him the taint of “faithlessness,” _i.e._ of an immorality.  In the lower
man this view is found almost generally; advanced thinkers fall here
too, as always, into an uncertainty and bewilderment, and the
contradiction necessarily founded in the principle of morality does not,
on account of the confusion of their concepts, come clearly to their
consciousness.  They do not venture to call the apostate downright
immoral, because they themselves entice to apostasy, to defection from
one religion to another, etc.; still, they cannot give up the standpoint
of morality either.  And yet here the occasion was to be seized to step
outside of morality.

Are the Own or Unique [_Einzigen_] perchance a party?  How could they be
_own_ if they were _e.g._ _belonged_ to a party?

Or is one to hold with no party?  In the very act of joining them and
entering their circle one forms a union with them that lasts as long as
party and I pursue one and the same goal.  But today I still share the
party’s tendency, as by tomorrow I can do so no longer and I become
“untrue” to it.  The party has nothing binding (obligatory) for me, and
I do not have respect for it; if it no longer pleases me, I become its
foe.

In every party that cares for itself and its persistence, the members
are unfree (or better, unown) in that degree, they lack egoism in that
degree, in which they serve this desire of the party.  The independence
of the party conditions the lack of independence in the party-members.

A party, of whatever kind it may be, can never do without a _confession
of faith_.  For those who belong to the party must _believe_ in its
principle, it must not be brought in doubt or put in question by them,
it must be the certain, indubitable thing for the party-member.  That
is: One must belong to a party body and soul, else one is not truly a
party-man, but more or less — an egoist.  Harbor a doubt of
Christianity, and you are already no longer a true Christian, you have
lifted yourself to the “effrontery” of putting a question beyond it and
haling Christianity before your egoistic judgment-seat.  You have —
_sinned_ against Christianity, this party cause (for it is surely not
_e.g._ a cause for the Jews, another party.) But well for you if you do
not let yourself be affrighted: your effrontery helps you to ownness.

So then an egoist could never embrace a party or take up with a party?
Oh, yes, only he cannot let himself be embraced and taken up by the
party.  For him the party remains all the time nothing but a gathering:
he is one of the party, he takes part.


	* * *

The best State will clearly be that which has the most loyal citizens,
and the more the devoted mind for _legality_ is lost, so much the more
will the State, this system of morality, this moral life itself, be
diminished in force and quality.  With the “good citizens” the good
State too perishes and dissolves into anarchy and lawlessness.  “Respect
for the law!” By this cement the total of the State is held together.
“The law is _sacred_, and he who affronts it a _criminal”_.  Without
crime no State: the moral world — and this the State is — is crammed
full of scamps, cheats, liars, thieves, etc.  Since the State is the
“lordship of law,” its hierarchy, it follows that the egoist, in all
cases where _his_ advantage runs against the State’s, can satisfy
himself only by crime.

The State cannot give up the claim that its _laws_ and ordinances are
_sacred_.[_heilig_] At this the individual ranks as the _unholy_
[_unheilig_] (barbarian, natural man, “egoist”) over against the State,
exactly as he was once regarded by the Church; before the individual the
State takes on the nimbus of a saint.[_Heiliger_] Thus it issues a law
against dueling.  Two men who are both at one in this, that they are
willing to stake their life for a cause (no matter what), are not to be
allowed this, because the State will not have it: it imposes a penalty
on it.  Where is the liberty of self-determination then?  It is at once
quite another situation if, as _e.g._ in North America, society
determines to let the duelists bear certain evil _consequences_ of their
act, _e.g._ withdrawal of the credit hitherto enjoyed.  To refuse credit
is everybody’s affair, and, if a society wants to withdraw it for this
or that reason, the man who is hit cannot therefore complain of
encroachment on his liberty: the society is simply availing itself of
its own liberty.  That is no penalty for sin, no penalty for a _crime_.
The duel is no crime there, but only an act against which the society
adopts counter-measures, resolves on a _defense_.  The State, on the
contrary, stamps the duel as a crime, _i.e._ as an injury to its sacred
law: it makes it a _criminal case_.  The society leaves it to the
individual’s decision whether he will draw upon himself evil
consequences and inconveniences by his mode of action, and hereby
recognizes his free decision; the State behaves in exactly the reverse
way, denying all right to the individual’s decision and, instead,
ascribing the sole right to its own decision, the law of the State, so
that he who transgresses the State’s commandment is looked upon as if he
were acting against God’s commandment — a view which likewise was once
maintained by the Church.  Here God is the Holy in and of himself, and
the commandments of the Church, as of the State, are the commandments of
this Holy One, which he transmits to the world through his anointed and
Lords-by-the-Grace-of-God.  If the Church had _deadly sins_, the State
has _capital crimes;_ if the one had _heretics_, the other has
_traitors;_ the one _ecclesiastical penalties_, the other _criminal
penalties;_ the one _inquisitorial_ processes, the other _fiscal;_ in
short, there sins, here crimes, there inquisition and here —
inquisition.  Will the sanctity of the State not fall like the Church’s?
The awe of its laws, the reverence for its highness, the humility of its
“subjects,” will this remain?  Will the “saint’s” face not be stripped
of its adornment?

What a folly, to ask of the State’s authority that it should enter into
an honourable fight with the individual, and, as they express themselves
in the matter of freedom of the press, share sun and wind equally!  If
the State, this thought, is to be a _de facto_ power, it simply must be
a superior power against the individual.  The State is “sacred” and must
not expose itself to the “impudent attacks” of individuals.  If the
State is _sacred_, there must be censorship.  The political liberals
admit the former and dispute the inference.  But in any case they
concede repressive measures to it, for — they stick to this, that State
is _more_ than the individual and exercises a justified revenge, called
punishment.

_Punishment_ has a meaning only when it is to afford expiation for the
injuring of a _sacred_ thing.  If something is sacred to any one, he
certainly deserves punishment when he acts as its enemy.  A man who lets
a man’s life continue in existence _because_ to him it is sacred and he
has a _dread_ of touching it is simply a — _religious_ man.

Weitling lays crime at the door of “social disorder,” and lives in the
expectation that under Communistic arrangements crimes will become
impossible, because the temptations to them, _e.g._ money, fall away.
As, however, his organized society is also exalted into a sacred and
inviolable one, he miscalculates in that good-hearted opinion.  _e.g._
with their mouth professed allegiance to the Communistic society, but
worked underhand for its ruin, would not be lacking.  Besides, Weitling
has to keep on with “curative means against the natural remainder of
human diseases and weaknesses,” and “curative means” always announce to
begin with that individuals will be looked upon as “called” to a
particular “salvation” and hence treated according to the requirements
of this “human calling.” _Curative means_ or _healing_ is only the
reverse side of _punishment_, the _theory of cure_ runs parallel with
the _theory of punishment;_ if the latter sees in an action a sin
against right, the former takes it for a sin of the man _against
himself_, as a decadence from his health.  But the correct thing is that
I regard it either as an action that _suits me_ or as one that _does not
suit me_, as hostile or friendly to _me_, _i.e._ that I treat it as my
_property_, which I cherish or demolish.  “Crime” or “disease” are not
either of them an _egoistic_ view of the matter, _i.e._ a judgment
_starting from me_, but starting from _another —_ to wit, whether it
injures _right_, general right, or the _health_ partly of the individual
(the sick one), partly of the generality (_society_).  “Crime” is
treated inexorably, “disease” with “loving gentleness, compassion,” etc.

Punishment follows crime.  If crime falls because the sacred vanishes,
punishment must not less be drawn into its fall; for it too has
significance only over against something sacred.  Ecclesiastical
punishments have been abolished.  Why?  Because how one behaves toward
the “holy God” is his own affair.  But, as this one punishment,
_ecclesiastical punishment_, has fallen, so all _punishments_ must fall.
As sin against the so-called God is a man’s own affair, so is that
against every kind of the so-called sacred.  According to our theories
of penal law, with whose “improvement in conformity to the times” people
are tormenting themselves in vain, they want to _punish_ men for this or
that “inhumanity”; and therein they make the silliness of these theories
especially plain by their consistency, hanging the little thieves and
letting the big ones run.  For injury to property they have the house of
correction, and for “violence to thought,” suppression of “natural
rights of man,” only —representations and petitions.

The criminal code has continued existence only through the sacred, and
perishes of itself if punishment is given up.  Now they want to create
everywhere a new penal law, without indulging in a misgiving about
punishment itself.  But it is exactly punishment that must make room for
satisfaction, which, again, cannot aim at satisfying right or justice,
but at procuring _us_ a satisfactory outcome.  If one does to us what we
_will not put up with_, we break his power and bring our own to bear: we
satisfy _ourselves_ on him, and do not fall into the folly of wanting to
satisfy right (the spook).  It is not the _sacred_ that is to defend
itself against man, but man against man; as _God_ too, you know, no
longer defends himself against man, God to whom formerly (and in part,
indeed, even now) all the “servants of God” offered their hands to
punish the blasphemer, as they still at this very day lend their hands
to the sacred.  This devotion to the sacred brings it to pass also that,
without lively participation of one’s own, one only delivers misdoers
into the hands of the police and courts: a non-participating making over
to the authorities, “who, of course, will best administer sacred
matters.” The people is quite crazy for hounding the police on against
everything that seems to it to be immoral, often only unseemly, and this
popular rage for the moral protects the police institution more than the
government could in any way protect it.

In crime the egoist has hitherto asserted himself and mocked at the
sacred; the break with the sacred, or rather of the sacred, may become
general.  A revolution never returns, but a mighty, reckless, shameless,
conscienceless.  proud —_crime_, does it not rumble in distant thunders,
and do you not see how the sky grows presciently silent and gloomy?


	* * *

He who refuses to spend his powers for such limited societies as family,
party, nation, is still always longing for a worthier society, and
thinks he has found the true object of love, perhaps, in “human society”
or “mankind,” to sacrifice himself to which constitutes his honor; from
now on he “lives for and serves _mankind_.”

_People_ is the name of the body, _State_ of the spirit, of that _ruling
person_ that has hitherto suppressed me.  Some have wanted to
transfigure peoples and States by broadening them out to “mankind” and
“general reason”; but servitude would only become still more intense
with this widening, and philanthropists and humanitarians are as
absolute masters as politicians and diplomats.

Modern critics inveigh against religion because it sets God, the divine,
moral, etc., _outside_ of man, or makes them something objective, in
opposition to which the critics rather transfer these very subjects
_into_ man.  But those critics none the less fall into the proper error
of religion, to give man a “destiny,” in that they too want to have him
divine, human, and the like: morality, freedom and humanity, etc., are
his essence.  And, like religion politics too wanted to _“educate”_ man,
to bring him to the realization of his “essence,” his “destiny,” to
_make_ something out of him — to wit, a “true man,” the one in the form
of the “true believer,” the other in that of the “true citizen or
subject.” In fact, it comes to the same whether one calls the destiny
the divine or human.

Under religion and politics man finds himself at the standpoint of
_should: he should_ become this and that, should be so and so.  With
this postulate, this commandment, every one steps not only in front of
another but also in front of himself.  Those critics say: You should be
a whole, free man.  Thus they too stand in the temptation to proclaim a
new _religion_, to set up a new absolute, an ideal — to wit, freedom.
Men _should_ be free.  Then there might even arise _missionaries_ of
freedom, as Christianity, in the conviction that all were properly
destined to become Christians, sent out missionaries of the faith.
Freedom would then (as have hitherto faith as Church, morality as State)
constitute itself as a new _community_ and carry on a like “propaganda”
therefrom.  Certainly no objection can be raised against a getting
together; but so much the more must one oppose every renewal of the old
_care_ for us, of culture directed toward an end — in short, the
principle of _making something_ out of us, no matter whether Christians,
subjects, or freemen and men.

One may well say with Feuerbach and others that religion has displaced
the human from man, and has transferred it so into another world that,
unattainable, it went on with its own existence there as something
personal in itself, as a “God”: but the error of religion is by no means
exhausted with this.  One might very well let fall the personality of
the displaced human, might transform God into the divine, and still
remain religious.  For the religious consists in discontent with the
_present_ men, in the setting up of a “perfection” to be striven for, in
“man wrestling for his completion.”[81] (“Ye therefore _should_ be
perfect as your father in heaven is perfect.” Matt.  5, 48): it consists
in the fixation of an ideal, an absolute.  Perfection is the “supreme
good,” the _finis bonorum;_ every one’s ideal is the perfect man, the
true, the free man, etc.

The efforts of modern times aim to set up the ideal of the “free man.”
If one could find it, there would be a new — religion, because a new
ideal; there would be a new longing, a new torment, a new devotion, a
new deity, a new contrition.

With the ideal of “absolute liberty,” the same turmoil is made as with
everything absolute, and according to Hess, _e.g._, it is said to “be
realizable in absolute human society.”[82] Nay, this realization is
immediately afterward styled a “vocation”; just so he then defines
liberty as “morality”: the kingdom of “justice” (equality) and
“morality” (_i.e._ liberty) is to begin, etc.

Ridiculous is he who, while fellows of his tribe, family, nation, rank
high, is — nothing but “puffed up” over the merit of his fellows; but
blinded too is he who wants only to be “man.” Neither of them puts his
worth in _exclusiveness_, but in _connectedness_, or in the “tie” that
conjoins him with others, in the ties of blood, of nationality, of
humanity.

Through the “Nationals” of today the conflict has again been stirred up
between those who think themselves to have merely human blood and human
ties of blood, and the others who brag of their special blood and the
special ties of blood.

If we disregard the fact that pride may mean conceit, and take it for
consciousness alone, there is found to be a vast difference between
pride in “belonging to” a nation and therefore being its property, and
that in calling a nationality one’s property.  Nationality is my
quality, but the nation my owner and mistress.  If you have bodily
strength, you can apply it at a suitable place and have a
self-consciousness or pride of it; if, on the contrary, your strong body
has you, then it pricks you everywhere, and at the most unsuitable
place, to show its strength: you can give nobody your hand without
squeezing his.

The perception that one is more than a member of the family, more than a
fellow of the tribe, more than an individual of the people, has finally
led to saying, one is more than all this because one is man, or, the man
is more than the Jew, German, etc.  “Therefore be every one wholly and
solely — man.” Could one not rather say: Because we are more than what
has been stated, therefore we will be this, as well as that “more” also?
Man and Germans, then, man and Guelph, etc.?  The Nationals are in the
right; one cannot deny his nationality: and the humanitarians are in the
right; one must not remain in the narrowness of the national.  In
_uniqueness_ [_Einzigkeit_] the contradiction is solved; the national is
my quality.  But I am not swallowed up in my quality — as the human too
is my quality, but I give to man his existence first through my
uniqueness.

History seeks for Man: but he is I, you, we.  Sought as a mysterious
_essence_, as the divine, first as _God_, then as Man (humanity,
humaneness, and mankind), he is found as the individual, the finite, the
unique one.

I am owner of humanity, am humanity, and do nothing for the good of
another humanity.  Fool, you who are a unique humanity, that you make a
merit of wanting to live for another than you are.

The hitherto-considered relation of me to the _world of men_ offers such
a wealth of phenomena that it will have to be taken up again and again
on other occasions, but here, where it was only to have its chief
outlines made clear to the eye, it must be broken off to make place for
an apprehension of two other sides toward which it radiates.  For, as I
find myself in relation not merely to men so far as they present in
themselves the concept “man” or are children of men (children of _Man_,
as children of God are spoken of), but also to that which they have of
man and call their own, and as therefore I relate myself not only to
that which they _are_ through man, but also to their human
_possessions:_ so, besides the world of men, the world of the senses and
of ideas will have to be included in our survey, and somewhat said of
what men call their own of sensuous goods, and of spiritual as well.

According as one had developed and clearly grasped the concept of man,
he gave it to us to respect as this or that _person of respect_, and
from the broadest understanding of this concept there proceeded at last
the command “to respect Man in every one.” But if I respect Man, my
respect must likewise extend to the human, or what is Man’s.

Men have somewhat of their _own_, and _I_ am to recognize this own and
hold it sacred.  Their own consists partly in outward, partly in inward
_possessions_.  The former are things, the latter spiritualities,
thoughts, convictions, noble feelings, etc.  But I am always to respect
only _rightful_ or _human_ possessions: the wrongful and unhuman I need
not spare, for only _Man’s_ own is men’s real own.  An inward possession
of this sort is, _e.g._, religion; because _religion_ is free, _i.  e._
is Man’s, _I_ must not strike at it.  Just so _honor_ is an inward
possession; it is free and must not be struck at my me.  (Action for
insult, caricatures, etc.) Religion and honor are “spiritual property.”
In tangible property the person stands foremost: my person is my first
property.  Hence freedom of the person; but only the _rightful_ or human
person is free, the other is locked up.  Your life is your property; but
it is sacred for men only if it is not that of an inhuman monster.

What a man as such cannot defend of bodily goods, we may take from him:
this is the meaning of competition, of freedom of occupation.  What he
cannot defend of spiritual goods falls a prey to us likewise: so far
goes the liberty of discussion, of science, of criticism.

But _consecrated_ goods are inviolable.  Consecrated and guarantied by
whom?  Proximately by the State, society, but properly by man or the
“concept,” the “concept of the thing”; for the concept of consecrated
goods is this, that they are truly human, or rather that the holder
possesses them as man and not as un-man.[83]

On the spiritual side man’s faith is such goods, his honor, his moral
feeling — yes, his feeling of decency, modesty, etc.  Actions (speeches,
writings) that touch honor are punishable; attacks on “the foundations
of all religion”; attacks on political faith; in short, attacks on
everything that a man “rightly” has.

How far critical liberalism would extend the sanctity of goods — on this
point it has not yet made any pronouncement, and doubtless fancies
itself to be ill-disposed toward all sanctity; but, as it combats
egoism, it must set limits to it, and must not let the un-man pounce on
the human.  To its theoretical contempt for the “masses” there must
correspond a practical snub if it should get into power.

What extension the concept “man” receives, and what comes to the
individual man through it — what, therefore, man and the human are — on
this point the various grades of liberalism differ, and the political,
the social, the humane man are each always claiming more than the other
for “man.” He who has best grasped this concept knows best what is
“man’s.” The State still grasps this concept in political restriction,
society in social; mankind, so it is said, is the first to comprehend it
entirely, or “the history of mankind develops it.” But, if “man is
discovered,” then we know also what pertains to man as his own, man’s
property, the human.

But let the individual man lay claim to ever so many rights because Man
or the concept man “entitles” him to them, because his being man does
it: what do I care for his right and his claim?  If he has his right
only from Man and does not have it from _me_, then for _me_ he has no
right.  His life, _e.g._, counts to _me_ only for what it is _worth_ to
_me_.  I respect neither a so-called right of property (or his claim to
tangible goods) nor yet his right to the “sanctuary of his inner nature”
(or his right to have the spiritual goods and divinities, his gods,
remain un-aggrieved).  His goods, the sensuous as well as the spiritual,
are _mine_, and I dispose of them as proprietor, in the measure of my —
might.

In the _property question_ lies a broader meaning than the limited
statement of the question allows to be brought out.  Referred solely to
what men call our possessions, it is capable of no solution; the
decision is to be found in him “from whom we have everything.” Property
depends on the _owner_.

The Revolution directed its weapons against everything which came “from
the grace of God,” _e.g._, against divine right, in whose place the
human was confirmed.  To that which is granted by the grace of God,
there is opposed that which is derived “from the essence of man.”

Now, as men’s relation to each other, in opposition to the religious
dogma which commands a “Love one another for God’s sake,” had to receive
its human position by a “Love each other for man’s sake,” so the
revolutionary teaching could not do otherwise than, first, as to what
concerns the relation of men to the things of this world, settle it that
the world, which hitherto was arranged according to God’s ordinance,
henceforth belongs to “Man.”

The world belongs to “Man,” and is to be respected by me as his
property.

Property is what is mine!

Property in the civic sense means _sacred_ property, such that I must
_respect_ your property.  “Respect for property!” Hence the politicians
would like to have every one possess his little bit of property, and
they have in part brought about an incredible parcellation by this
effort.  Each must have his bone on which he may find something to bite.

The position of affairs is different in the egoistic sense.  I do not
step shyly back from your property, but look upon it always as my
property, in which I need to “respect” nothing.  Pray do the like with
what you call my property!

With this view we shall most easily come to an understanding with each
other.

The political liberals are anxious that, if possible, all servitudes be
dissolved, and every one be free lord on his ground, even if this ground
has only so much area as can have its requirements adequately filled by
the manure of one person.  (The farmer in the story married even in his
old age “that he might profit by his wife’s dung.”) Be it ever so
little, if one only has somewhat of his own — to wit, a _respected_
property!  The more such owners, such cotters,[84] the more “free people
and good patriots” has the State.

Political liberalism, like everything religious, counts on _respect_,
humaneness, the virtues of love.  Therefore does it live in incessant
vexation.  For in practice people respect nothing, and every day the
small possessions are bought up again by greater proprietors, and the
“free people” change into day- laborers.

If, on the contrary, the “small proprietors” had reflected that the
great property was also theirs, they would not have respectfully shut
themselves out from it, and would not have been shut out.

Property as the civic liberals understand it deserves the attacks of the
Communists and Proudhon: it is untenable, because the civic proprietor
is in truth nothing but a property-less man, one who is everywhere _shut
out_.  Instead of owning the world, as he might, he does not own even
the paltry point on which he turns around.

Proudhon wants not the _propriétaire_ but the _possesseur_ or
_usufruitier_.[85] What does that mean?  He wants no one to own the
land; but the benefit of it — even though one were allowed only the
hundredth part of this benefit, this fruit — is at any rate one’s
property, which he can dispose of at will.  He who has only the benefit
of a field is assuredly not the proprietor of it; still less he who, as
Proudhon would have it, must give up so much of this benefit as is not
required for his wants; but he is the proprietor of the share that is
left him.  Proudhon, therefore, denies only such and such property, not
_property_ itself.  If we want no longer to leave the land to the landed
proprietors, but to appropriate it to _ourselves_, we unite ourselves to
this end, form a union, a _société_, that makes _itself_ proprietor; if
we have good luck in this, then those persons cease to be landed
proprietors.  And, as from the land, so we can drive them out of many
another property yet, in order to make it _our_ property, the property
of the — _conquerors_.  The conquerors form a society which one may
imagine so great that it by degrees embraces all humanity; but so-called
humanity too is as such only a thought (spook); the individuals are its
reality.  And these individuals as a collective (mass will treat land
and earth not less arbitrarily than an isolated individual or so-called
_propriétaire_.  Even so, therefore, _property_ remains standing, and
that as exclusive” too, in that _humanity_, this great society, excludes
the _individual_ from its property (perhaps only leases to him, gives
his as a fief, a piece of it) as it besides excludes everything that is
not humanity, _e.g._ does not allow animals to have property.  — So too
it will remain, and will grow to be.  That in which _all_ want to have a
_share_ will be withdrawn from that individual who wants to have it for
himself alone: it is made a _common estate_.  As a _common estate_ every
one has his _share_ in it, and this share is his _property_.  Why, so in
our old relations a house which belongs to five heirs is their common
estate; but the fifth part of the revenue is, each one’s property.
Proudhon might spare his prolix pathos if he said: “There are some
things that belong only to a few, and to which we others will from now
on lay claim or — siege.  Let us take them, because one comes to
property by taking, and the property of which for the present we are
still deprived came to the proprietors likewise only by taking.  It can
be utilized better if it is in the hands of us _all_ than if the few
control it.  Let us therefore associate ourselves for the purpose of
this robbery (_vol_).” — Instead of this, he tries to get us to believe
that society is the original possessor and the sole proprietor, of
imprescriptible right; against it the so-called proprietors have become
thieves (_La propriété c’est le vol_); if it now deprives of his
property the present proprietor, it robs him of nothing, as it is only
availing itself of its imprescriptible right.  — So far one comes with
the spook of society as a _moral person_.  On the contrary, what man can
obtain belongs to him: the world belongs to _me_.  Do you say anything
else by your opposite proposition?  “The world belongs to _all”_?  All
are I and again I, etc.  But you make out of the “all” a spook, and make
it sacred, so that then the “all” become the individual’s fearful
_master_.  Then the ghost of “right” places itself on their side.

Proudhon, like the Communists, fights against _egoism_.  Therefore they
are continuations and consistent carryings-out of the Christian
principle, the principle of love, of sacrifice for something general,
something alien.  They complete in property, _e.g.,_ only what has long
been extant as a matter of fact — to wit, the propertylessness of the
individual.  When the laws says, _Ad reges potestas omnium pertinet, ad
singulos proprietas; omnia rex imperio possidet, singuli dominio_, this
means: The king is proprietor, for he alone can control and dispose of
“everything,” he has _potestas_ and _imperium_ over it.  The Communists
make this clearer, transferring that _imperium_ to the “society of all.”
Therefore: Because enemies of egoism, they are on that account —
Christians, or, more generally speaking, religious men, believers in
ghosts, dependents, servants of some generality (God, society, etc.).
In this too Proudhon is like the Christians, that he ascribes to God
that which he denies to men.  He names him (_e.g._ page 90) the
Propriétaire of the earth.  Herewith he proves that he cannot think away
the _proprietor as such;_ he comes to a proprietor at last, but removes
him to the other world.

Neither God nor Man (“human society”) is proprietor, but the individual.


	* * *

Proudhon (Weitling too) thinks he is telling the worst about property
when he calls it theft (_vol_).  Passing quite over the embarrassing
question, what well-founded objection could be made against theft, we
only ask: Is the concept “theft” at all possible unless one allows
validity to the concept “property”?  How can one steal if property is
not already extant?  What belongs to no one cannot be _stolen;_ the
water that one draws out of the sea he does _not steal_.  Accordingly
property is not theft, but a theft becomes possible only through
property.  Weitling has to come to this too, as he does regard
everything as the _property of all:_ if something is “the property of
all,” then indeed the individual who appropriates it to himself steals.

Private property lives by grace of the _law_.  Only in the law has it
its warrant — for possession is not yet property, it becomes “mine” only
by assent of the law; it is not a fact, not _un fait_ as Proudhon
thinks, but a fiction, a thought.  This is legal property, legitimate
property, guarantied property.  It is mine not through _me_ but through
the — _law_.

Nevertheless, property is the expression for _unlimited dominion_ over
somewhat (thing, beast, man) which “I can judge and dispose of as seems
good to me.” According to Roman law, indeed, _jus utendi et abutendi re
sua, quatenus juris ratio patitur_, an _exclusive_ and _unlimited
right;_ but property is conditioned by might.  What I have in my power,
that is my own.  So long as I assert myself as holder, I am the
proprietor of the thing; if it gets away from me again, no matter by
what power, _e.g._ through my recognition of a title of others to the
thing — then the property is extinct.  Thus property and possession
coincide.  It is not a right lying outside my might that legitimizes me,
but solely my might: if I no longer have this, the thing vanishes away
from me.  When the Romans no longer had any might against the Germans,
the world-empire of Rome _belonged_ to the latter, and it would sound
ridiculous to insist that the Romans had nevertheless remained properly
the proprietors.  Whoever knows how to take and to defend the thing, to
him it belongs till it is again taken from him, as liberty belongs to
him who _takes_ it.—

Only might decides about property, and, as the State (no matter whether
State or well-to-do citizens or of ragamuffins or of men in the
absolute) is the sole mighty one, it alone is proprietor; I, the
unique,[_Einzige_] have nothing, and am only enfeoffed, am vassal and as
such, servitor.  Under the dominion of the State there is no property of
_mine_.

I want to raise the value of myself, the value of ownness, and should I
cheapen property?  No, as I was not respected hitherto because people,
mankind, and a thousand other generalities were put higher, so property
too has to this day not yet been recognized in its full value.  Property
too was only the property of a ghost, _e.g._ the people’s property; my
whole existence “belonged to the fatherland”; _I_ belonged to the
fatherland, the people, the State, and therefore also everything that I
called _my own_.  It is demanded of States that they make away with
pauperism.  It seems to me this is asking that the State should cut off
its own head and lay it at its feet; for so long as the State is the ego
the individual ego must remain a poor devil, a non-ego.  The State has
an interest only in being itself rich; whether Michael is rich and Peter
poor is alike to it; Peter might also be rich and Michael poor.  It
looks on indifferently as one grows poor and the other rich, unruffled
by this alternation.  As _individuals_ they are really equal before its
face; in this it is just: before it both of them are — nothing, as we
“are altogether sinners before God”; on the other hand, it has a very
great interest in this, that those individuals who make it their ego
should have a part in _its_ wealth; it makes them partakers in _its
property_.  Through property, with which it rewards the individuals, it
tames them; but this remains _its_ property, and every one has the
usufruct of it only so long as he bears in himself the ego of the State,
or is a “loyal member of society”; in the opposite case the property is
confiscated, or made to melt away by vexatious lawsuits.  The property,
then, is and remains _State property_, not property of the ego.  That
the State does not arbitrarily deprive the individual of what he has
from the State means simply that the State does not rob itself.  He who
is State-ego, _i.e._ a good citizen or subject, holds his fief
undisturbed as _such an ego_, not as being an ego of his own.  According
to the code, property is what I call mine “by virtue of God and law.”
But it is mine by virtue of God and law only so long as — the State has
nothing against it.

In expropriations, disarmaments, etc.  (as, when the exchequer
confiscates inheritances if the heirs do not put in an appearance early
enough) how plainly the else-veiled principle that only the _people_,
“the State,” is proprietor, while the individual is feoffee, strikes the
eye!

The State, I mean to say, cannot intend that anybody should _for his own
sake_ have property or actually be rich, nay, even well-to-do; it can
acknowledge nothing, yield nothing, grant nothing to me as me.  The
State cannot check pauperism, because the poverty of possession is a
poverty of me.  He who _is_ nothing but what chance or another — to wit,
the State — makes out of him also _has_ quite rightly nothing but what
another gives him.  And this other will _give_ him only what he
_deserves_, _i.e._ what he is worth by _service_.  It is not he that
realizes a value from himself; the State realizes a value from him.

National economy busies itself much with this subject.  It lies far out
beyond the “national,” however, and goes beyond the concepts and horizon
of the State, which knows only State property and can distribute nothing
else.  For this reason it binds the possessions of property to
_conditions —_ as it binds everything to them, _e.g._ marriage, allowing
validity only to the marriage sanctioned by it, and wresting this out of
my power.  But property is my property only when I hold it
_unconditionally_ : only I, an _unconditional_ ego, have property, enter
a relation of love, carry on free trade.

The State has no anxiety about me and mine, but about itself and its: I
count for something to it only as its _child_, as “a son of the
country”; as _ego_ I am nothing at all for it.  For the State’s
understanding, what befalls me as ego is something accidental, my wealth
as well as my impoverishment.  But, if I with all that is mine am an
accident in the State’s eyes, this proves that it cannot comprehend _me:
I_ go beyond its concepts, or, its understanding is too limited to
comprehend me.  Therefore it cannot do anything for me either.

Pauperism is the _valuelessness of me_, the phenomenon that I cannot
realize value from myself.  For this reason State and pauperism are one
and the same.  The State does not let me come to my value, and continues
in existence only through my valuelessness: it is forever intent on
_getting benefit_ from me, _i.e._ exploiting me, turning me to account,
using me up, even if the use it gets from me consists only in my
supplying a _proles_ (proletariat); it wants me to be “its creature.”

Pauperism can be removed only when I as ego _realize value_ from myself,
when I give my own self value, and make my price myself.  I must rise in
revolt to rise in the world.

What I produce, flour, linen, or iron and coal, which I toilsomely win
from the earth, is my work that I want to realize value from.  But then
I may long complain that I am not paid for my work according to its
value: the payer will not listen to me, and the State likewise will
maintain an apathetic attitude so long as it does not think it must
“appease” me that _I_ may not break out with my dreaded might.  But this
“appeasing” will be all, and, if it comes into my head to ask for more,
the State turns against me with all the force of its lion-paws and
eagle-claws: for it is the king of beasts, it is lion and eagle.  If I
refuse to be content with the price that it fixes for my ware and labor,
if I rather aspire to determine the price of my ware myself, _e.g._, “to
pay myself,” in the first place I come into a conflict with the buyers
of the ware.  If this were stilled by a mutual understanding, the State
would not readily make objections; for how individuals get along with
each other troubles it little, so long as therein they do not get in its
way.  Its damage and its danger begin only when they do not agree, but,
in the absence of a settlement, take each other by the hair.  The State
cannot endure that man stand in a direct relation to man; it must step
between as —_mediator_, must _— intervene_.  What Christ was, what the
saints, the Church were, the State has become — to wit, “mediator.” It
tears man from man to put itself between them as “spirit.” The laborers
who ask for higher pay are treated as criminals as soon as they want to
_compel_ it.  What are they to do?  Without compulsion they don’t get
it, and in compulsion the State sees a self-help, a determination of
price by the ego, a genuine, free realization of value from his
property, which it cannot admit of.  What then are the laborers to do?
Look to themselves and ask nothing about the State?

But, as is the situation with regard to my material work, so it is with
my intellectual too.  The State allows me to realize value from all my
thoughts and to find customers for them (I do realize value from them,
_e.g._ in the very fact that they bring me honor from the listeners,
etc.); but only so long as _my_ thoughts are —_its_ thoughts.  If, on
the other hand, I harbor thoughts that it cannot approve (_i.e._ make
its own), then it does not allow me at all to realize value from them,
to bring them into _exchange_ into _commerce.  My_ thoughts are free
only if they are granted to me by the State’s _grace_, _i.e._ if they
are the State’s thoughts.  It lets me philosophize freely only so far as
I approve myself a “philosopher of State”; _against_ the State I must
not philosophize, gladly as it tolerates my helping it out of its
“deficiencies,” “furthering” it.  — Therefore, as I may behave only as
an ego most graciously permitted by the State, provided with its
testimonial of legitimacy and police pass, so too it is not granted me
to realize value from what is mine, unless this proves to be its, which
I hold as fief from it.  My ways must be its ways, else it distrains me;
my thoughts its thoughts, else it stops my mouth.

The State has nothing to be more afraid of than the value of me, and
nothing must it more carefully guard against than every occasion that
offers itself to me for _realizing value_ from myself.  _I_ am the
deadly enemy of the State, which always hovers between the alternatives,
it or I.  Therefore it strictly insists not only on not letting _me_
have a standing, but also on keeping down what is _mine_.  In the State
there is no property, _i.e._ no property of the individual, but only
State property.  Only through the State have I what I have, as I am only
through it what I am.  My private property is only that which the State
leaves to me of _its, cutting off_ others from it (depriving them,
making it private); it is State property.

But, in opposition to the State, I feel more and more clearly that there
is still left me a great might, the might over myself, _i.e._ over
everything that pertains only to me and that _exists_ only in being my
own.

What do I do if my ways are no longer its ways, my thoughts no longer
its thoughts?  I look to myself, and ask nothing about it!  In _my_
thoughts, which I get sanctioned by no assent, grant, or grace, I have
my real property, a property with which I can trade.  For as mine they
are my _creatures_, and I am in a position to give them away in return
for _other_ thoughts: I give them up and take in exchange for them
others, which then are my new purchased property.

What then is _my_ property?  Nothing but what is in my _power!_ To what
property am I entitled?  To every property to which I — _empower_
myself.[A German idiom for “take upon myself,” “assume”] I give myself
the right of property in taking property to myself, or giving myself the
proprietor’s _power_, full power, empowerment.

Everything over which I have might that cannot be torn from me remains
my property; well, then let might decide about property, and I will
expect everything from my might!  Alien might, might that I leave to
another, makes me an owned slave: then let my own might make me an
owner.  Let me then withdraw the might that I have conceded to others
out of ignorance regarding the strength of my _own_ might!  Let me say
to myself, what my might reaches to is my property; and let me claim as
property everything that I feel myself strong enough to attain, and let
me extend my actual property as far as _I_ entitle, _i.  e._ — empower,
myself to take.

Here egoism, selfishness, must decide; not the principle of _love_, not
love-motives like mercy, gentleness, good-nature, or even justice and
equity (for _justitia_ too is a phenomenon of — love, a product of
love): love knows only _sacrifices_ and demands “self-sacrifice.”

Egoism does not think of sacrificing anything, giving away anything that
it wants; it simply decides, what I want I must have and will procure.

All attempts to enact rational laws about property have put out from the
bay of _love_ into a desolate sea of regulations.  Even Socialism and
Communism cannot be excepted from this.  Every one is to be provided
with adequate means, for which it is little to the point whether one
socialistically finds them still in a personal property, or
communistically draws them from the community of goods.  The
individual’s mind in this remains the same; it remains a mind of
dependence.  The distributing _board of equity_ lets me have only what
the sense of equity, its _loving_ care for all, prescribes.  For me, the
individual, there lies no less of a check in _collective wealth_ than in
that of _individual others;_ neither that is mine, nor this: whether the
wealth belongs to the collectivity, which confers part of it on me, or
to individual possessors, is for me the same constraint, as I cannot
decide about either of the two.  On the contrary, Communism, by the
abolition of all personal property, only presses me back still more into
dependence on another, _viz_., on the generality or collectivity; and,
loudly as it always attacks the “State,” what it intends is itself again
a State, a _status_, a condition hindering my free movement, a sovereign
power over me.  Communism rightly revolts against the pressure that I
experience from individual proprietors; but still more horrible is the
might that it puts in the hands of the collectivity.

Egoism takes another way to root out the non-possessing rabble.  It does
not say: Wait for what the board of equity will — bestow on you in the
name of the collectivity (for such bestowal took place in “States” from
the most ancient times, each receiving “according to his desert,” and
therefore according to the measure in which each was able to _deserve_
it, to acquire it by _service_), but: Take hold, and take what you
require!  With this the war of all against all is declared.  I alone
decide what I will have.

“Now, that is truly no new wisdom, for self-seekers have acted so at all
times!” Not at all necessary either that the thing be new, if only
_consciousness_ of it is present.  But this latter will not be able to
claim great age, unless perhaps one counts in the Egyptian and Spartan
law; for how little current it is appears even from the stricture above,
which speaks with contempt of “self-seekers.” One is to know just this,
that the procedure of taking hold is not contemptible, but manifests the
pure deed of the egoist at one with himself.

Only when I expect neither from individuals nor from a collectivity what
I can give to myself, only then do I slip out of the snares of —love;
the rabble ceases to be rabble only when it _takes hold_.  Only the
dread of taking hold, and the corresponding punishment thereof, makes it
a rabble.  Only that taking hold is _sin_, crime — only this dogma
creates a rabble.  For the fact that the rabble remains what it is, it
(because it allows validity to that dogma) is to blame as well as, more
especially, those who “self-seekingly” (to give them back their favorite
word) demand that the dogma be respected.  In short, the lack of
_consciousness_ of that “new wisdom,” the old consciousness of sin,
alone bears the blame.

If men reach the point of losing respect for property, every one will
have property, as all slaves become free men as soon as they no longer
respect the master as master.  _Unions_ will then, in this matter too,
multiply the individual’s means and secure his assailed property.

According to the Communists’ opinion the commune should be proprietor.
On the contrary, _I_ am proprietor, and I only come to an understanding
with others about my property.  If the commune does not do what suits
me, I rise against it and defend my property.  I am proprietor, but
property is _not sacred_.  I should be merely possessor?  No, hitherto
one was only possessor, secured in the possession of a parcel by leaving
others also in possession of a parcel; but now _everything_ belongs to
me, I am proprietor of _everything that I require_ and can get
possession of.  If it is said socialistically, society gives me what I
require — then the egoist says, I take what I require.  If the
Communists conduct themselves as ragamuffins, the egoist behaves as
proprietor.

All swan-fraternities,[86] and attempts at making the rabble happy, that
spring from the principle of love, must miscarry.  Only from egoism can
the rabble get help, and this help it must give to itself and — will
give to itself.  If it does not let itself be coerced into fear, it is a
power.  “People would lose all respect if one did not coerce them into
fear,” says bugbear Law in _Der gestiefelte Kater_.

Property, therefore, should not and cannot be abolished; it must rather
be torn from ghostly hands and become _my_ property; then the erroneous
consciousness, that I cannot entitle myself to as much as I require,
will vanish.  —

“But what cannot man require!” Well, whoever requires much, and
understands how to get it, has at all times helped himself to it, as
Napoleon did with the Continent and France with Algiers.  Hence the
exact point is that the respectful “rabble” should learn at last to help
itself to what it requires.  If it reaches out too far for you, why,
then defend yourselves.  You have no need at all to good-heartedly —
bestow anything on it; and, when it learns to know itself, it — or
rather: whoever of the rabble learns to know himself, he — casts off the
rabble-quality in refusing your alms with thanks.  But it remains
ridiculous that you declare the rabble “sinful and criminal” if it is
not pleased to live from your favors because it can do something in its
own favor.  Your bestowals cheat it and put it off.  Defend your
property, then you will be strong; if, on the other hand, you want to
retain your ability to bestow, and perhaps actually have the more
political rights the more alms (poor-rates) you can give, this will work
just as long as the recipients let you work it.[87]

In short, the property question cannot be solved so amicably as the
Socialists, yes, even the Communists, dream.  It is solved only by the
war of all against all.  The poor become free and proprietors only when
they — _rise_.  Bestow ever so much on them, they will still always want
more; for they want nothing less than that at last — nothing more be
bestowed.

It will be asked, but how then will it be when the have- nots take
heart?  Of what sort is the settlement to be?  One might as well ask
that I cast a child’s nativity.  What a slave will do as soon as he has
broken his fetters, one must —await.

In Kaiser’s pamphlet, worthless for lack of form as well as substance
(“_Die Persönlichkeit des Eigentümers in Bezug auf den Socialismus und
Communismus_,” etc.), he hopes from the _State_ that it will bring about
a leveling of property.  Always the State!  Herr Papa!  As the Church
was proclaimed and looked upon as the “mother” of believers, so the
State has altogether the face of the provident father.


	* * *

_Competition_ shows itself most strictly connected with the principle of
civism.  Is it anything else than _equality_ (_égalité_)?  And is not
equality a product of that same Revolution which was brought on by the
commonalty, the middle classes?  As no one is barred from competing with
all in the State (except the prince, because he represents the State
itself) and working himself up to their height, yes, overthrowing or
exploiting them for his own advantage, soaring above them and by
stronger exertion depriving them of their favorable circumstances — this
serves as a clear proof that before the State’s judgment-seat every one
has only the value of a “simple individual” and may not count on any
favoritism.  Outrun and outbid each other as much as you like and can;
that shall not trouble me, the State!  Among yourselves you are free in
competing, you are competitors; that is your _social_ position.  But
before me, the State, you are nothing but “simple individuals”![88]

What in the form of principle or theory was propounded as the equality
of all has found here in competition its realization and practical
carrying out; for _égalité_ is — free competition.  All are, before the
State —simple individuals; in society, or in relation to each other —
competitors.

I need be nothing further than a simple individual to be able to compete
with all others aside from the prince and his family: a freedom which
formerly was made impossible by the fact that only by means of one’s
corporation, and within it, did one enjoy any freedom of effort.

In the guild and feudality the State is in an intolerant and fastidious
attitude, granting _privileges;_ in competition and liberalism it is in
a tolerant and indulgent attitude, granting only _patents_ (letters
assuring the applicant that the business stands open (patent) to him) or
“concessions.” Now, as the State has thus left everything to the
_applicants_, it must come in conflict with all, because each and all
are entitled to make application.  It will be “stormed,” and will go
down in this storm.

Is “free competition” then really “free?” nay, is it really a
“competition” — to wit, one of _persons —_ as it gives itself out to be
because on this title it bases its right?  It originated, you know, in
persons becoming free of all personal rule.  Is a competition “free”
which the State, this ruler in the civic principle, hems in by a
thousand barriers?  There is a rich manufacturer doing a brilliant
business, and I should like to compete with him.  “Go ahead,” says the
State, “I have no objection to make to your _person_ as competitor.”
Yes, I reply, but for that I need a space for buildings, I need money!
“That’s bad; but, if you have no money, you cannot compete.  You must
not take anything from anybody, for I protect property and grant it
privileges.” Free competition is not “free,” because I lack the THINGS
for competition.  Against my _person_ no objection can be made, but
because I have not the things my person too must step to the rear.  And
who has the necessary things?  Perhaps that manufacturer?  Why, from him
I could take them away!  No, the State has them as property, the
manufacturer only as fief, as possession.

But, since it is no use trying it with the manufacturer, I will compete
with that professor of jurisprudence; the man is a booby, and I, who
know a hundred times more than he, shall make his class-room empty.
“Have you studied and graduated, friend?” No, but what of that?  I
understand abundantly what is necessary for instruction in that
department.  “Sorry, but competition is not ‘free’ here.  Against your
person there is nothing to be said, but the _thing_, the doctor’s
diploma, is lacking.  And this diploma I, the State, demand.  Ask me for
it respectfully first; then we will see what is to be done.”

This, therefore, is the “freedom” of competition.  The State, _my lord_,
first qualifies me to compete.

But do _persons_ really compete?  No, again _things_ only!  Moneys in
the first place, etc.

In the rivalry one will always be left behind another (_e.g._ a
poetaster behind a poet).  But it makes a difference whether the means
that the unlucky competitor lacks are personal or material, and likewise
whether the material means can be won by _personal energy_ or are to be
obtained only by _grace_, only as a present; as when _e.g._ the poorer
man must leave, _i.  e._ present, to the rich man his riches.  But, if I
must all along wait for the State’s _approval_ to obtain or to use
(_e.g._ in the case of graduation) the means, I have the means by the
_grace of the State_.[89]

Free competition, therefore, has only the following meaning: To the
State all rank as its equal children, and every one can scud and run to
earn the _State’s goods and largesse_.  Therefore all do chase after
havings, holdings, possessions (be it of money or offices, titles of
honor, etc.), after the _things_.

In the mind of the commonalty every one is possessor or “owner.” Now,
whence comes it that the most have in fact next to nothing?  From this,
that the most are already joyful over being possessors at all, even
though it be of some rags, as children are joyful in their first
trousers or even the first penny that is presented to them.  More
precisely, however, the matter is to be taken as follows.  Liberalism
came forward at once with the declaration that it belonged to man’s
essence not to be property, but proprietor.  As the consideration here
was about “man,” not about the individual, the how-much (which formed
exactly the point of the individual’s special interest) was left to him.
Hence the individual’s egoism retained room for the freest play in this
how- much, and carried on an indefatigable competition.

However, the lucky egoism had to become a snag in the way of the less
fortunate, and the latter, still keeping its feet planted on the
principle of humanity, put forward the question as to how-much of
possession, and answered it to the effect that “man must have as much as
he requires.”

Will it be possible for _my_ egoism to let itself be satisfied with
that?  What “man” requires furnishes by no means a scale for measuring
me and my needs; for I may have use for less or more.  I must rather
have so much as I am competent to appropriate.

Competition suffers from the unfavorable circumstance that the _means_
for competing are not at every one’s command, because they are not taken
from personality, but from accident.  Most are _without means_, and for
this reason _without goods_.

Hence the Socialists demand the _means_ for all, and aim at a society
that shall offer means.  Your money value, say they, we no longer
recognize as your “competence”; you must show another competence — to
wit, your _working force_.  In the possession of a property, or as
“possessor,” man does certainly show himself as man; it was for this
reason that we let the possessor, whom we called “proprietor,” keep his
standing so long.  Yet you possess the things only so long as you are
not “put out of this property.”

The possessor is competent, but only so far as the others are
incompetent.  Since your ware forms your competence only so long as you
are competent to defend it (_i.e._ as _we_ are not competent to do
anything with it), look about you for another competence; for we now, by
our might, surpass your alleged competence.

It was an extraordinarily large gain made, when the point of being
regarded as possessors was put through.  Therein bondservice was
abolished, and every one who till then had been bound to the lord’s
service, and more or less had been his property, now became a “lord.”
But henceforth your having, and what you have, are no longer adequate
and no longer recognized; _per contra_, your working and your work rise
in value.  We now respect your _subduing_ things, as we formerly did
your possessing them.  Your work is your competence!  You are lord or
possessor only of what comes by _work_, not by _inheritance_.  But as at
the time everything has come by inheritance, and every copper that you
possess bears not a labor-stamp but an inheritance-stamp, everything
must be melted over.

But is my work then really, as the Communists suppose, my sole
competence?  or does not this consist rather in everything that I am
competent for?  And does not the workers’ society itself have to concede
this, _e.g.,_ in supporting also the sick, children, old men — in short,
those who are incapable of work?  These are still competent for a good
deal, _e.g._ for instance, to preserve their life instead of taking it.
If they are competent to cause you to desire their continued existence,
they have a power over you.  To him who exercised utterly no power over
you, you would vouchsafe nothing; he might perish.

Therefore, what you are _competent_ for is your _competence!_ If you are
competent to furnish pleasure to thousands, then thousands will pay you
an honorarium for it; for it would stand in your power to forbear doing
it, hence they must purchase your deed.  If you are not competent to
_captivate_ any one, you may simply starve.

Now am I, who am competent for much, perchance to have no advantage over
the less competent?

We are all in the midst of abundance; now shall I not help myself as
well as I can, but only wait and see how much is left me in an equal
division?

Against competition there rises up the principle of ragamuffin society —
_partition_.

To be looked upon as a mere _part_, part of society, the individual
cannot bear — because he is _more;_ his uniqueness puts from it this
limited conception.

Hence he does not await his competence from the sharing of others, and
even in the workers’ society there arises the misgiving that in an equal
partition the strong will be exploited by the weak; he awaits his
competence rather from himself, and says now, what I am competent to
have, that is my competence.

What competence does not the child possess in its smiling, its playing,
its screaming!  in short, in its mere existence!  Are you capable of
resisting its desire?  Or do you not hold out to it, as mother, your
breast; as father, as much of your possessions as it needs?  It compels
you, therefore it possesses what you call yours.

If your person is of consequence to me, you pay me with your very
existence; if I am concerned only with one of your qualities, then your
compliance, perhaps, or your aid, has a value (a money value) for me,
and I _purchase_ it.

If you do not know how to give yourself any other than a money value in
my estimation, there may arise the case of which history tells us, that
Germans, sons of the fatherland, were sold to America.  Should those who
let themselves to be traded in be worth more to the seller?  He
preferred the cash to this living ware that did not understand how to
make itself precious to him.  That he discovered nothing more valuable
in it was assuredly a defect of his competence; but it takes a rogue to
give more than he has.  How should he show respect when he did not have
it, nay, hardly could have it for such a pack!

You behave egoistically when you respect each other neither as
possessors nor as ragamuffins or workers, but as a part of your
competence, as _“useful bodies”_.  Then you will neither give anything
to the possessor (“proprietor”) for his possessions, nor to him who
works, but only to him whom you _require_.  The North Americans ask
themselves, Do we require a king?  and answer, Not a farthing are he and
his work worth to us.

If it is said that competition throws every thing open to all, the
expression is not accurate, and it is better put thus: competition makes
everything purchasable.  In _abandoning_ [_preisgeben_] it to them,
competition leaves it to their appraisal [_Preis_] or their estimation,
and demands a price [_Preis_] for it.

But the would-be buyers mostly lack the means to make themselves buyers:
they have no money.  For money, then, the purchasable things are indeed
to be had (“For money everything is to be had!”), but it is exactly
money that is lacking.  Where is one to get money, this current or
circulating property?  Know then, you have as much money [_Geld_] as you
have — might; for you count [_gelten_] for as much as you make yourself
count for.

One pays not with money, of which there may come a lack, but with his
competence, by which alone we are “competent”;[Equivalent in ordinary
German use to our “possessed of a competence”] for one is proprietor
only so far as the arm of our power reaches.

Weitling has thought out a new means of payment — work.  But the true
means of payment remains, as always, _competence_.  With what you have
“within your competence” you pay.  Therefore think on the enlargement of
your competence.

This being admitted, they are nevertheless right on hand again with the
motto, “To each according to his competence!” Who is to _give_ to me
according to my competence?  Society?  Then I should have to put up with
its estimation.  Rather, I shall _take_ according to my competence.

“All belongs to all!” This proposition springs from the same
unsubstantial theory.  To each belongs only what he is competent for.
If I say, The world belongs to me, properly that too is empty talk,
which has a meaning only in so far as I respect no alien property.  But
to me belongs only as much as I am competent for, or have within my
competence.

One is not worthy to have what one, through weakness, lets be taken from
him; one is not worthy of it because one is not capable of it.

They raise a mighty uproar over the “wrong of a thousand years” which is
being committed by the rich against the poor.  As if the rich were to
blame for poverty, and the poor were not in like manner responsible for
riches!  Is there another difference between the two than that of
competence and incompetence, of the competent and incompetent?  Wherein,
pray, does the crime of the rich consist?  “In their hardheartedness.”
But who then have maintained the poor?  Who have cared for their
nourishment?  Who have given alms, those alms that have even their name
from mercy (_eleemosyne_)?  Have not the rich been “merciful” at all
times?  Are they not to this day “tender-hearted,” as poor-taxes,
hospitals, foundations of all sorts, etc., prove?

But all this does not satisfy you!  Doubtless, then, they are to _share_
with the poor?  Now you are demanding that they shall abolish poverty.
Aside from the point that there might be hardly one among you who would
act so, and that this one would be a fool for it, do ask yourselves: why
should the rich let go their fleeces and give up _themselves_, thereby
pursuing the advantage of the poor rather than their own?  You, who have
your thaler daily, are rich above thousands who live on four groschen.
Is it for your interest to share with the thousands, or is it not rather
for theirs?

With competition is connected less the intention to do the thing _best_
than the intention to make it as _profitable_, as productive, as
possible.  Hence people study to get into the civil service (pot-boiling
study), study cringing and flattery, routine and “acquaintance with
business,” work “for appearance.” Hence, while it is apparently a matter
of doing “good service,” in truth only a “good business” and earning of
money are looked out for.  The job is done only ostensibly for the job’s
sake, but in fact on account of the gain that it yields.  One would
indeed prefer not to be censor, but one wants to be — advanced; one
would like to judge, administer, etc., according to his best
convictions, but one is afraid of transference or even dismissal; one
must, above all things — live.

Thus these goings-on are a fight for _dear life_, and, in gradation
upward, for more or less of a “good living.”

And yet, withal, their whole round of toil and care brings in for most
only “bitter life” and “bitter poverty.” All the bitter painstaking for
this!

Restless acquisition does not let us take breath, take a calm
_enjoyment:_ we do not get the comfort of our possessions.

But the organization of labor touches only such labors as others can do
for us, slaughtering, tillage, etc.; the rest remain egoistic, because
no one can in your stead elaborate your musical compositions, carry out
your projects of painting, etc.; nobody can replace Raphael’s labors.
The latter are labors of a unique person,[_Einzige_] which only he is
competent to achieve, while the former deserved to be called “human,”
since what is anybody’s _own_ in them is of slight account, and almost
“any man” can be trained to it.

Now, as society can regard only labors for the common benefit, _human_
labors, he who does anything _unique_ remains without its care; nay, he
may find himself disturbed by its intervention.  The unique person will
work himself forth out of society all right, but society brings forth no
unique person.

Hence it is at any rate helpful that we come to an agreement about
_human_ labors, that they may not, as under competition, claim all our
time and toil.  So far Communism will bear its fruits.  For before the
dominion of the commonalty even that for which all men are qualified, or
can be qualified, was tied up to a few and withheld from the rest: it
was a privilege.  To the commonalty it looked equitable to leave free
all that seemed to exist for every “man.” But, because left [Literally,
“given”] free, it was yet given to no one, but rather left to each to be
got hold of by his _human_ power.  By this the mind was turned to the
acquisition of the human, which henceforth beckoned to every one; and
there arose a movement which one hears so loudly bemoaned under the name
of “materialism.”

Communism seeks to check its course, spreading the belief that the human
is not worth so much discomfort, and, with sensible arrangements, could
be gained without the great expense of time and powers which has
hitherto seemed requisite.

But for whom is time to be gained?  For what does man require more time
than is necessary to refresh his wearied powers of labor?  Here
Communism is silent.

For what?  To take comfort in himself as the unique, after he has done
his part as man!

In the first joy over being allowed to stretch out their hands toward
everything human, people forgot to want anything else; and they competed
away vigorously, as if the possession of the human were the goal of all
our wishes.

But they have run themselves tired, and are gradually noticing that
“possession does not give happiness.” Therefore they are thinking of
obtaining the necessary by an easier bargain, and spending on it only so
much time and toil as its indispensableness exacts.  Riches fall in
price, and contented poverty, the care-free ragamuffin, becomes the
seductive ideal.

Should such human activities, that every one is confident of his
capacity for, be highly salaried, and sought for with toil and
expenditure of all life-forces?  Even in the everyday form of speech,
“If I were minister, or even the., then it should go quite otherwise,”
that confidence expresses itself — that one holds himself capable of
playing the part of such a dignitary; one does get a perception that to
things of this sort there belongs not uniqueness, but only a culture
which is attainable, even if not exactly by all, at any rate by many;
_i.e._ that for such a thing one need only be an ordinary man.

If we assume that, as _order_ belongs to the essence of the State, so
_subordination_ too is founded in its nature, then we see that the
subordinates, or those who have received preferment, disproportionately
_overcharge_ and _overreach_ those who are put in the lower ranks.  But
the latter take heart (first from the Socialist standpoint, but
certainly with egoistic consciousness later, of which we will therefore
at once give their speech some coloring) for the question, By what then
is your property secure, you creatures of preferment?  — and give
themselves the answer, By our refraining from interference!  And so by
_our_ protection!  And what do you give us for it?  Kicks and disdain
you give to the “common people”; police supervision, and a catechism
with the chief sentence “Respect what is _not yours_, what belongs to
_others!_ respect others, and especially your superiors!” But we reply,
“If you want our respect, _buy_ it for a price agreeable to us.  We will
leave you your property, if you give a due equivalent for this leaving.”
Really, what equivalent does the general in time of peace give for the
many thousands of his yearly income.?  — another for the sheer
hundred-thousands and millions yearly?  What equivalent do you give for
our chewing potatoes and looking calmly on while you swallow oysters?
Only buy the oysters of us as dear as we have to buy the potatoes of
you, then you may go on eating them.  Or do you suppose the oysters do
not belong to us as much as to you?  You will make an outcry over
_violence_ if we reach out our hands and help consume them, and you are
right.  Without violence we do not get them, as you no less have them by
doing violence to us.

But take the oysters and have done with it, and let us consider our
nearer property, labor; for the other is only possession.  We distress
ourselves twelve hours in the sweat of our face, and you offer us a few
groschen for it.  Then take the like for your labor too.  Are you not
willing?  You fancy that our labor is richly repaid with that wage,
while yours on the other hands is worth a wage of many thousands.  But,
if you did not rate yours so high, and gave us a better chance to
realize value from ours, then we might well, if the case demanded it,
bring to pass still more important things than you do for the many
thousand thalers; and, if you got only such wages as we, you would soon
grow more industrious in order to receive more.  But, if you render any
service that seems to us worth ten and a hundred times more than our own
labor, why, then you shall get a hundred times more for it too; we, on
the other hand, think also to produce for you things for which you will
requite us more highly than with the ordinary day’s wages.  We shall be
willing to get along with each other all right, if only we have first
agreed on this — that neither any longer needs to — _present_ anything
to the other.  Then we may perhaps actually go so far as to pay even the
cripples and sick and old an appropriate price for not parting from us
by hunger and want; for, if we want them to live, it is fitting also
that we — purchase the fulfillment of our will.  I say “purchase,” and
therefore do not mean a wretched “alms.” For their life is the property
even of those who cannot work; if we (no matter for what reason) want
them not to withdraw this life from us, we can mean to bring this to
pass only by purchase; nay, we shall perhaps (maybe because we like to
have friendly faces about us) even want a life of comfort for them.  In
short, we want nothing presented by you, but neither will we present you
with anything.  For centuries we have handed alms to you from
goodhearted — stupidity, have doled out the mite of the poor and given
to the masters the things that are — not the masters’; now just open
your wallet, for henceforth our ware rises in price quite enormously.
We do not want to take from you anything, anything at all, only you are
to pay better for what you want to have.  What then have you?  “I have
an estate of a thousand acres.” And I am your plowman, and will
henceforth attend to your fields only for one thaler a day wages.  “Then
I’ll take another.” You won’t find any, for we plowmen are no longer
doing otherwise, and, if one puts in an appearance who takes less, then
let him beware of us.  There is the housemaid, she too is now demanding
as much, and you will no longer find one below this price.  “Why, then
it is all over with me.” Not so fast!  You will doubtless take in as
much as we; and, if it should not be so, we will take off so much that
you shall have wherewith to live like us.  “But I am accustomed to live
better.” We have nothing against that, but it is not our look-out; if
you can clear more, go ahead.  Are we to hire out under rates, that you
may have a good living?  The rich man always puts off the poor with the
words, “What does your want concern me?  See to it how you make your way
through the world; that is _your affair_, not mine.” Well, let us let it
be our affair, then, and let us not let the means that we have to
realize value from ourselves be pilfered from us by the rich.  “But you
uncultured people really do not need so much.” Well, we are taking
somewhat more in order that for it we may procure the culture that we
perhaps need.  “But, if you thus bring down the rich, who is then to
support the arts and sciences hereafter?” Oh, well, we must make it up
by numbers; we club together, that gives a nice little sum — besides,
you rich men now buy only the most tasteless books and the most
lamentable Madonnas or a pair of lively dancer’s legs.  “O ill-starred
equality!” No, my good old sir, nothing of equality.  We only want to
count for what we are worth, and, if you are worth more, you shall count
for more right along.  We only want to be _worth our price_, and think
to show ourselves worth the price that you will pay.

Is the State likely to be able to awaken so secure a temper and so
forceful a self-consciousness in the menial?  Can it make man feel
himself?  Nay, may it even do so much as set this goal for itself?  Can
it want the individual to recognize his value and realize this value
from himself?  Let us keep the parts of the double question separate,
and see first whether the State can bring about such a thing.  As the
unanimity of the plowmen is required, only this unanimity can bring it
to pass, and a State law would be evaded in a thousand ways by
competition and in secret.  But can the State bear with it?  The State
cannot possibly bear with people’s suffering coercion from another than
it; it could not, therefore, admit the self-help of the unanimous
plowmen against those who want to engage for lower wages.  Suppose,
however, that the State made the law, and all the plowmen were in accord
with it: could the State bear with it then?

In the isolated case — yes; but the isolated case is more than that, it
is a case of _principle_.  The question therein is of the whole range of
the _ego’s self-realization of value from himself_, and therefore also
of his self-consciousness _against_ the State.  So far the Communists
keep company; but, as self-realization of value from self necessarily
directs itself against the State, so it does against _society_ too, and
therewith reaches out beyond the commune and the communistic — out of
egoism.

Communism makes the maxim of the commonalty, that every one is a
possessor (“proprietor”), into an irrefragable truth, into a reality,
since the anxiety about _obtaining_ now ceases and every one _has_ from
the start what he requires.  In his labor-force he _has_ his competence,
and, if he makes no use of it, that is his fault.  The grasping and
hounding is at an end, and no competition is left (as so often now)
without fruit, because with every stroke of labor an adequate supply of
the needful is brought into the house.  Now for the first time one is a
_real possessor_, because what one has in his labor-force can no longer
escape from him as it was continually threatening to do under the system
of competition.  One is a _care-free_ and assured possessor.  And one is
this precisely by seeking his competence no longer in a ware, but in his
own labor, his competence for labor; and therefore by being a
_ragamuffin_, a man of only ideal wealth.  _I_, however, cannot content
myself with the little that I scrape up by my competence for labor,
because my competence does not consist merely in my labor.

By labor I can perform the official functions of a president, a
minister, etc.; these offices demand only a general culture — to wit,
such a culture as is generally attainable (for general culture is not
merely that which every one has attained, but broadly that which every
one can attain, and therefore every special culture, _e.g._ medical,
military, philological, of which no “cultivated man” believes that they
surpass his powers), or, broadly, only a skill possible to all.

But, even if these offices may vest in every one, yet it is only the
individual’s unique force, peculiar to him alone.  that gives them, so
to speak, life and significance.  That he does not manage his office
like an “ordinary man.” but puts in the competence of his uniqueness,
this he is not yet paid for when he is paid only in general as an
official or a minister.  If he has done it so as to earn your thanks,
and you wish to retain this thank-worthy force of the unique one, you
must not pay him like a mere man who performed only what was human, but
as one who accomplishes what is unique.  Do the like with your labor,
do!

There cannot be a general schedule-price fixed for my uniqueness as
there can for what I do as man.  Only for the latter can a
schedule-price be set.

Go right on, then, setting up a general appraisal for human labors, but
do not deprive your uniqueness of its desert.

_Human_ or _general_ needs can be satisfied through society; for
satisfaction of _unique_ needs you must do some seeking.  A friend and a
friendly service, or even an individual’s service, society cannot
procure you.  And yet you will every moment be in need of such a
service, and on the slightest occasions require somebody who is helpful
to you.  Therefore do not rely on society, but see to it that you have
the wherewithal to — purchase the fulfillment of your wishes.

Whether money is to be retained among egoists?  To the old stamp an
inherited possession adheres.  If you no longer let yourselves be paid
with it, it is ruined: if you do nothing for this money, it loses all
power.  Cancel the _inheritance_, and you have broken off the executor’s
court-seal.  For now everything is an inheritance, whether it be already
inherited or await its heir.  If it is yours, wherefore do you let it be
sealed up from you?  Why do you respect the seal?

But why should you not create a new money?  Do you then annihilate the
ware in taking from it the hereditary stamp?  Now, money is a ware, and
an essential _means_ or competence.  For it protects against the
ossification of resources, keeps them in flux and brings to pass their
exchange.  If you know a better medium of exchange, go ahead; yet it
will be a “money” again.  It is not the money that does you damage, but
your incompetence to take it.  Let your competence take effect, collect
yourselves, and there will be no lack of money — of your money, the
money of _your_ stamp.  But working I do not call “letting your
competence take effect.” Those who are only “looking for work” and
“willing to work hard” are preparing for their own selves the infallible
upshot — to be out of work.

Good and bad luck depend on money.  It is a power in the _bourgeois_
period for this reason, that it is only wooed on all hands like a girl,
indissolubly wedded by nobody.  All the romance and chivalry of _wooing_
for a dear object come to life again in competition.  Money, an object
of longing, is carried off by the bold “knights of industry.”[A German
phrase for sharpers]

He who has luck takes home the bride.  The ragamuffin has luck; he takes
her into his household, “society,” and destroys the virgin.  In his
house she is no longer bride, but wife; and with her virginity her
family name is also lost.  As housewife the maiden Money is called
“Labor,” for “Labor” is her husband’s name.  She is a possession of her
husband’s.

To bring this figure to an end, the child of Labor and Money is again a
girl, an unwedded one and therefore Money but with the certain descent
from Labor, her father.  The form of the face, the “effigy,” bears
another stamp.

Finally, as regards competition once more, it has a continued existence
by this very means, that all do not attend to _their affair_ and come to
an _understanding_ with each other about it.  Bread _e.g._ is a need of
all the inhabitants of a city; therefore they might easily agree on
setting up a public bakery.  Instead of this, they leave the furnishing
of the needful to the competing bakers.  Just so meat to the butchers,
wine to wine-dealers, etc.

Abolishing competition is not equivalent to favoring the guild.  The
difference is this: In the _guild_ baking, etc., is the affair of the
guild-brothers; in _competition_, the affair of chance competitors; in
the _union_, of those who require baked goods, and therefore my affair,
yours, the affair of neither the guildic nor the concessionary baker,
but the affair of the _united_.

If _I_ do not trouble myself about my affair, I must be _content_ with
what it pleases others to vouchsafe me.  To have bread is my affair, my
wish and desire, and yet people leave that to the bakers and hope at
most to obtain through their wrangling, their getting ahead of each
other, their rivalry —in short, their competition — an advantage which
one could not count on in the case of the guild-brothers who were lodged
_entirely_ and _alone_ in the proprietorship of the baking franchise.  —
What every one requires, every one should also take a hand in procuring
and producing; it is _his_ affair, his property, not the property of the
guildic or concessionary master.

Let us look back once more.  The world belongs to the children of this
world, the children of men; it is no longer God’s world, but man’s.  As
much as every man can procure of it, let him call his; only the true
man, the State, human society or mankind, will look to it that each
shall make nothing else his own than what he appropriates as man, _i.e._
in human fashion.  Unhuman appropriation is that which is not consented
to by man, _i.e._, it is a “criminal” appropriation, as the human, _vice
versa_, is a “rightful” one, one acquired in the “way of law.”

So they talk since the Revolution.

But my property is not a thing, since this has an existence independent
of me; only my might is my own.  Not this tree, but my might or control
over it, is what is mine.

Now, how is this might perversely expressed?  They say I have a _right_
to this tree, or it is my _rightful_ property.  So I have _earned_ it by
might.  That the might must last in order that the tree may also be
_held —_ or better, that the might is not a thing existing of itself,
but has existence solely in the _mighty ego_, in me the mighty — is
forgotten.  Might, like other of my _qualities_ (_e.g._ humanity,
majesty, etc.), is exalted to something existing of itself, so that it
still exists long after it has ceased to be _my_ might.  Thus
transformed into a ghost, might is — _right_.  This _eternalized_ might
is not extinguished even with my death, but is transferred to
“bequeathed.”

Things now really belong not to me, but to right.

On the other side, this is nothing but a hallucination of vision.  For
the individual’s might becomes permanent and a right only by others
joining their might with his.  The delusion consists in their believing
that they cannot withdraw their might.  The same phenomenon over again;
might is separated from me.  I cannot take back the might that I gave to
the possessor.  One has “granted power of attorney,” has given away his
power, has renounced coming to a better mind.

The proprietor can give up his might and his right to a thing by giving
the thing away, squandering it, etc.  And _we_ should not be able
likewise to let go the might that we lend to him?

The rightful man, the _just_, desires to call nothing his own that he
does not have “rightly” or have the right to, and therefore only
_legitimate property_.

Now, who is to be judge, and adjudge his right to him?  At last, surely,
Man, who imparts to him the rights of man: then he can say, in an
infinitely broader sense than Terence, _humani nihil a me alienum puto_,
_e.g._, _the human is my property_.  However he may go about it, so long
as he occupies this standpoint he cannot get clear of a judge; and in
our time the multifarious judges that had been selected have set
themselves against each other in two persons at deadly enmity — to wit,
in God and Man.  The one party appeal to divine right, the other to
human right or the rights of man.

So much is clear, that in neither case does the individual do the
entitling himself.

Just pick me out an action today that would not be a violation of right!
Every moment the rights of man are trampled under foot by one side,
while their opponents cannot open their mouth without uttering a
blasphemy against divine right.  Give an alms, you mock at a right of
man, because the relation of beggar and benefactor is an inhuman
relation; utter a doubt, you sin against a divine right.  Eat dry bread
with contentment, you violate the right of man by your equanimity; eat
it with discontent, you revile divine right by your repining.  There is
not one among you who does not commit a crime at every moment; your
speeches are crimes, and every hindrance to your freedom of speech is no
less a crime.  Ye are criminals altogether!

Yet you are so only in that you all stand on the _ground of right_,
_i.e._ in that you do not even know, and understand how to value, the
fact that you are criminals.

Inviolable or _sacred_ property has grown on this very ground: it is a
_juridical concept_.

A dog sees the bone in another’s power, — and stands off only if it
feels itself too weak.  But man respects the other’s _right_ to his
bone.  The latter action, therefore, ranks as _human_, the former as
_brutal_ or “egoistic.”

And as here, so in general, it is called _“human”_ when one sees in
everything something _spiritual_ (here right), _i.e._ makes everything a
ghost and takes his attitude toward it as toward a ghost, which one can
indeed scare away at its appearance, but cannot kill.  It is human to
look at what is individual not as individual, but as a generality.

In nature as such I no longer respect anything, but know myself to be
entitled to everything against it; in the tree in that garden, on the
other hand, I must respect _alienness_ (they say in one-sided fashion
“property”), I must keep my hand off it.  This comes to an end only when
I can indeed leave that tree to another as I leave my stick.  etc., to
another, but do not in advance regard it as alien to me, _i.e._ sacred.
Rather, I make to myself no _crime_ of felling it if I will, and it
remains my property, however long as I resign it to others: it is and
remains _mine_.  In the banker’s fortune I as little see anything alien
as Napoleon did in the territories of kings: we have no _dread_ of
_“conquering”_ it, and we look about us also for the means thereto.  We
strip off from it, therefore, the _spirit_ of _alienness_, of which we
had been afraid.

Therefore it is necessary that I do not lay claim to, anything more _as
man_, but to everything as I, this I; and accordingly to nothing human,
but to mine; _i.  e._, nothing that pertains to me as man, but — what I
will and because I will it.

Rightful, or legitimate, property of another will be only that which
_you_ are content to recognize as such.  If your content ceases, then
this property has lost legitimacy for you, and you will laugh at
absolute right to it.

Besides the hitherto discussed property in the limited sense, there is
held up to our reverent heart another property against which we are far
less “to sin.” This property consists in spiritual goods, in the
“sanctuary of the inner nature.” What a man holds sacred, no other is to
gibe at; because, untrue as it may be, and zealously as one may “in
loving and modest wise” seek to convince of a true sanctity the man who
adheres to it and believes in it, yet _the sacred_ itself is always to
be honored in it: the mistaken man does believe in the sacred, even
though in an incorrect essence of it, and so his belief in the sacred
must at least be respected.

In ruder times than ours it was customary to demand a particular faith,
and devotion to a particular sacred essence, and they did not take the
gentlest way with those who believed otherwise; since, however, “freedom
of belief” spread itself more and more abroad, the “jealous God and sole
Lord” gradually melted into a pretty general “supreme being,” and it
satisfied humane tolerance if only every one revered “something sacred.”

Reduced to the most human expression, this sacred essence is “man
himself” and “the human.” With the deceptive semblance as if the human
were altogether our own, and free from all the otherworldliness with
which the divine is tainted — yes, as if Man were as much as I or you —
there may arise even the proud fancy that the talk is no longer of a
“sacred essence” and that we now feel ourselves everywhere at home and
no longer in the uncanny,[Literally, “unhomely”] _i.e._ in the sacred
and in sacred awe: in the ecstasy over “Man discovered at last” the
egoistic cry of pain passes unheard, and the spook that has become so
intimate is taken for our true ego.

But “Humanus is the saint’s name” (see Goethe), and the humane is only
the most clarified sanctity.

The egoist makes the reverse declaration.  For this precise reason,
because you hold something sacred, I gibe at you; and, even if I
respected everything in you, your sanctuary is precisely what I should
not respect.

With these opposed views there must also be assumed a contradictory
relation to spiritual goods: the egoist insults them, the religious man
(_i.e._ every one who puts his “essence” above himself) must
consistently — protect them.  But what kind of spiritual goods are to be
protected, and what left unprotected, depends entirely on the concept
that one forms of the “supreme being”; and he who fears God, _e.g._, has
more to shelter than he (the liberal) who fears Man.

In spiritual goods we are (in distinction from the sensuous) injured in
a spiritual way, and the sin against them consists in a direct
_desecration_, while against the sensuous a purloining or alienation
takes place; the goods themselves are robbed of value and of
consecration, not merely taken away; the sacred is immediately
compromised.  With the word “irreverence” or “flippancy” is designated
everything that can be committed as _crime_ against spiritual goods,
_i.e._ against everything that is sacred for us; and scoffing, reviling,
contempt, doubt, etc., are only different shades of _criminal
flippancy_.

That desecration can be practiced in the most manifold way is here to be
passed over, and only that desecration is to be preferentially mentioned
which threatens the sacred with danger through an _unrestricted press_.

As long as respect is demanded even for one spiritual essence, speech
and the press must be enthralled in the name of this essence; for just
so long the egoist might “trespass” against it by his _utterances_, from
which thing he must be hindered by “due punishment” at least, if one
does not prefer to take up the more correct means against it, the
preventive use of police authority, _e.g._ censorship.

What a sighing for liberty of the press!  What then is the press to be
liberated from?  Surely from a dependence, a belonging, and a liability
to service!  But to liberate himself from that is every one’s affair,
and it may with safety be assumed that, when you have delivered yourself
from liability to service, that which you compose and write will also
belong to you as your _own_ instead of having been thought and indicted
_in_ the service of some power.  What can a believer in Christ say and
have printed, that should be freer from that belief in Christ than he
himself is?  If I cannot or may not write something, perhaps the primary
fault lies with _me_.  Little as this seems to hit the point, so near is
the application nevertheless to be found.  By a press-law I draw a
boundary for my publications, or let one be drawn, beyond which wrong
and its _punishment_ follows.  I myself _limit_ myself.

If the press was to be free, nothing would be so important as precisely
its liberation from every coercion that could be put on it in the _name
of a law_.  And, that it might come to that, I my own self should have
to have absolved myself from obedience to the law.

Certainly, the absolute liberty of the press is like every absolute
liberty, a nonentity.  The press can become free from full many a thing,
but always only from what I too am free from.  If we make ourselves free
from the sacred, if we have become _graceless_ and _lawless_, our words
too will become so.

As little as _we_ can be declared clear of every coercion in the world,
so little can our writing be withdrawn from it.  But as free as we are,
so free we can make it too.

It must therefore become our _own_, instead of, as hitherto, serving a
spook.

People do not yet know what they mean by their cry for liberty of the
press.  What they ostensibly ask is that the State shall set the press
free; but what they are really after, without knowing it themselves, is
that the press become free from the State, or clear of the State.  The
former is a _petition to_ the State, the latter an _insurrection
against_ the State.  As a “petition for right,” even as a serious
demanding of the right of liberty of the press, it presupposes the State
as the giver, and can hope only for a _present_, a permission, a
chartering.  Possible, no doubt, that a State acts so senselessly as to
grant the demanded present; but you may bet everything that those who
receive the present will not know how to use it so long as they regard
the State as a truth: they will not trespass against this “sacred
thing,” and will call for a penal press-law against every one who would
be willing to dare this.

In a word, the press does not become free from what I am not free from.

Do I perhaps hereby show myself an opponent of the liberty of the press?
On the contrary, I only assert that one will never get it if one wants
only it, the liberty of the press, _i.e._ if one sets out only for an
unrestricted permission.  Only beg right along for this permission: you
may wait forever for it, for there is no one in the world who could give
it to you.  As long as you want to have yourselves “entitled” to the use
of the press by a permission, _i.e._ liberty of the press, you live in
vain hope and complaint.

“Nonsense!  Why, you yourself, who harbor such thoughts as stand in your
book, can unfortunately bring them to publicity only through a lucky
chance or by stealth; nevertheless you will inveigh against one’s
pressing and importuning his own State till it gives the refused
permission to print?” But an author thus addressed would perhaps — for
the impudence of such people goes far — give the following reply:
“Consider well what you say!  What then do I do to procure myself
liberty of the press for my book?  Do I ask for permission, or do I not
rather, without any question of legality, seek a favorable occasion and
grasp it in complete recklessness of the State and its wishes?  I — the
terrifying word must be uttered — I cheat the State.  You unconsciously
do the same.  From your tribunes you talk it into the idea that it must
give up its sanctity and inviolability, it must lay itself bare to the
attacks of writers, without needing on that account to fear danger.  But
you are imposing on it; for its existence is done for as soon as it
loses its unapproachableness.  To _you_ indeed it might well accord
liberty of writing, as England has done; you are _believers in the
State_ and incapable of writing against the State, however much you
would like to reform it and ‘remedy its defects.’ But what if opponents
of the State availed themselves of free utterance, and stormed out
against Church, State, morals, and everything ‘sacred’ with inexorable
reasons?  You would then be the first, in terrible agonies, to call into
life the _September laws_.  Too late would you then rue the stupidity
that earlier made you so ready to fool and palaver into compliance the
State, or the government of the State.  — But, I prove by my act only
two things.  This for one, that the liberty of the press is always bound
to ‘favorable opportunities,’ and accordingly will never be an absolute
liberty; but secondly this, that he who would enjoy it must seek out
and, if possible, create the favorable opportunity, availing himself of
his _own advantage_ against the State; and counting himself and his will
more than the State and every ‘superior’ power.  Not in the State, but
only against it, can the liberty of the press be carried through; if it
is to be established, it is to be obtained not as the consequence of a
_petition_ but as the work of an _insurrection_.  Every petition and
every motion for liberty of the press is already an insurrection, be it
conscious or unconscious: a thing which Philistine halfness alone will
not and cannot confess to itself until, with a shrinking shudder, it
shall see it clearly and irrefutably by the outcome.  For the requested
liberty of the press has indeed a friendly and well-meaning face at the
beginning, as it is not in the least minded ever to let the ‘insolence
of the press’ come into vogue; but little by little its heart grows more
hardened, and the inference flatters its way in that really a liberty is
not a liberty if it stands in the _service_ of the State, of morals, or
of the law.  A liberty indeed from the coercion of censorship, it is yet
not a liberty from the coercion of law.  The press, once seized by the
lust for liberty, always wants to grow freer, till at last the writer
says to himself, really I am not wholly free till I ask about nothing;
and writing is free only when it is my _own_, dictated to me by no power
or authority, by no faith, no dread; the press must not be free — that
is too little — it must be _mine: — ownness of the press_ or _property
in the press_, that is what I will take.

“Why, liberty of the press is only _permission of the press_, and the
State never will or can voluntarily permit me to grind it to nothingness
by the press.”

Let us now, in conclusion, bettering the above language, which is still
vague, owing to the phrase ‘liberty of the press,’ rather put it thus:
_“liberty of the press_, the liberals’ loud demand, is assuredly
possible in the State; yes, it is possible only _in_ the State, because
it is a _permission_, and consequently the permitter (the State) must
not be lacking.  But as permission it has its limit in this very State,
which surely should not in reason permit more than is compatible with
itself and its welfare: the State fixes for it this limit as the _law_
of its existence and of its extension.  That one State brooks more than
another is only a quantitative distinction, which alone, nevertheless,
lies at the heart of the political liberals: they want in Germany, _i.
e._, only a ’_more extended, broader_ accordance of free utterance.’ The
liberty of the press which is sought for is an affair of the _people’s_,
and before the people (the State) possesses it I may make no use of it.
From the standpoint of property in the press, the situation is
different.  Let my people, if they will, go without liberty of free
press, I will manage to print by force or ruse; I get my permission to
print only from — _myself_ and my strength.

If the press is _my own_, I as little need a permission of the State for
employing it as I seek that permission in order to blow my nose.  The
press is my _property_ from the moment when nothing is more to me than
myself; for from this moment State, Church, people, society, etc.,
cease, because they have to thank for their existence only the
disrespect that I have for myself, and with the vanishing of this
undervaluation they themselves are extinguished: they exist only when
they exist _above me_, exist only as _powers_ and _power-holders_.  Or
can you imagine a State whose citizens one and all think nothing of it?
It would be as certainly a dream, an existence in seeming, as ‘united
Germany.’

The press is my own as soon as I myself am my own, a self- owned man: to
the egoist belongs the world, because he belongs to no power of the
world.

With this my press might still be very _unfree_, as _e.g._ at this
moment.  But the world is large, and one helps himself as well as he
can.  If I were willing to abate from the _property_ of my press, I
could easily attain the point where I might everywhere have as much
printed as my fingers produced.  But, as I want to assert my property, I
must necessarily swindle my enemies.  ‘Would you not accept their
permission if it were given you?’ Certainly, with joy; for their
permission would be to me a proof that I had fooled them and started
them on the road to ruin.  I am not concerned for their permission, but
so much the more for their folly and their overthrow.  I do not sue for
their permission as if I flattered myself (like the political liberals)
that we both, they and I, could make out peaceably alongside and with
each other, yes, probably raise and prop each other; but I sue for it in
order to make them bleed to death by it, that the permitters themselves
may cease at last.  I act as a conscious enemy, overreaching them and
_utilizing_ their heedlessness.

The press is _mine_ when I recognize outside myself no _judge_ whatever
over its utilization, _i.e._ when my writing is no longer determined by
morality or religion or respect for the State laws or the like, but by
me and my egoism!”

Now, what have you to reply to him who gives you so impudent an answer?
— We shall perhaps put the question most strikingly by phrasing it as
follows: Whose is the press, the people’s (State’s) or mine?  The
politicals on their side intend nothing further than to liberate the
press from personal and arbitrary interferences of the possessors of
power, without thinking of the point that to be really open for
everybody it would also have to be free from the laws, from the people’s
(State’s) will.  They want to make a “people’s affair” of it.

But, having become the people’s property, it is still far from being
mine; rather, it retains for me the subordinate significance of a
_permission_.  The people plays judge over my thoughts; it has the right
of calling me to account for them, or, I am responsible to it for them.
Jurors, when their fixed ideas are attacked, have just as hard heads as
the stiffest despots and their servile officials.

In the “_Liberale Bestrebungen_”[90] Edgar Bauer asserts that liberty of
the press is impossible in the absolutist and the constitutional State,
whereas in the “free State” it finds its place.  “Here,” the statement
is, “it is recognized that the individual, because he is no longer an
individual but a member of a true and rational generality, has the right
to utter his mind.” So not the individual, but the “member,” has liberty
of the press.  But, if for the purpose of liberty of the press the
individual must first give proof of himself regarding his belief in the
generality, the people; if he does not have this liberty _through might
of his own —_ then it is a _people’s liberty_, a liberty that he is
invested with for the sake of his faith, his “membership.” The reverse
is the case: it is precisely as an individual that every one has open to
him the liberty to utter his mind.  But he has not the “right”: that
liberty is assuredly not his “sacred right.” He has only the _might;_
but the might alone makes him owner.  I need no concession for the
liberty of the press, do not need the people’s consent to it, do not
need the “right” to it, nor any “justification.” The liberty of the
press too, like every liberty, I must “take”; the people, “as being the
sole judge,” cannot _give_ it to me.  It can put up with me the liberty
that I take, or defend itself against it; give, bestow, grant it cannot.
I exercise it _despite_ the people, purely as an individual; _i.e._ I
get it by fighting the people, my — enemy, and obtain it only when I
really get it by such fighting, _i.  e.  take_ it.  But I take it
because it is my property.

Sander, against whom E.  Bauer writes, lays claim (page 99) to the
liberty of the press “as the right and the liberty of the _citizens in
the State”_.  What else does Edgar Bauer do?  To him also it is only a
right of the free _citizen_.

The liberty of the press is also demanded under the name of a “general
human right.” Against this the objection was well-founded that not every
man knew how to use it rightly, for not every individual was truly man.
Never did a government refuse it to _Man_ as such; but _Man_ writes
nothing, for the reason that he is a ghost.  It always refused it to
_individuals_ only, and gave it to others, _e.g._ its organs.  If then
one would have it for all, one must assert outright that it is due to
the individual, me, not to man or to the individual so far as he is man.
Besides, another than a man (a beast) can make no use of it.  The French
government, _e.g._, does not dispute the liberty of the press as a right
of man, but demands from the individual a security for his really being
man; for it assigns liberty of the press not to the individual, but to
man.

Under the exact pretense that it was _not human_, what was mine was
taken from me!  What was human was left to me undiminished.

Liberty of the press can bring about only a _responsible_ press; the
_irresponsible_ proceeds solely from property in the press.


	* * *

For intercourse with men an express law (conformity to which one may
venture at times sinfully to forget, but the absolute value of which one
at no time ventures to deny) is placed foremost among all who live
religiously: this is the law — of _love_, to which not even those who
seem to fight against its principle, and who hate its name, have as yet
become untrue; for they also still have love, yes, they love with a
deeper and more sublimated love, they love “man and mankind.”

If we formulate the sense of this law, it will be about as follows:
Every man must have a something that is more to him than himself.  You
are to put your “private interest” in the background when it is a
question of the welfare of others, the weal of the fatherland, of
society, the common weal, the weal of mankind, the good cause, etc.!
Fatherland, society, mankind, must be more to you than yourself, and as
against their interest your “private interest” must stand back; for you
must not be an — egoist.

Love is a far-reaching religious demand, which is not, as might be
supposed, limited to love to God and man, but stands foremost in every
regard.  Whatever we do, think, will, the ground of it is always to be
love.  Thus we may indeed judge, but only “with love.” The Bible may
assuredly be criticized, and that very thoroughly, but the critic must
before all things _love_ it and see in it the sacred book.  Is this
anything else than to say he must not criticize it to death, he must
leave it standing, and that as a sacred thing that cannot be upset?  —
In our criticism on men too, love must remain the unchanged key-note.
Certainly judgments that hatred inspires are not at all our _own_
judgments, but judgments of the hatred that rules us, “rancorous
judgments.” But are judgments that love inspires in us any more our
_own_?  They are judgments of the love that rules us, they are “loving,
lenient” judgments, they are not our _own_, and accordingly not real
judgments at all.  He who burns with love for justice cries out, _fiat
justitia, pereat mundus!_ He can doubtless ask and investigate what
justice properly is or demands, and _in what_ it consists, but not
_whether_ it is anything.

It is very true, “He who abides in love abides in God, and God in him.”
(1 John 4.  16.) God abides in him, he does not get rid of God, does not
become godless; and he abides in God, does not come to himself and into
his own home, abides in love to God and does not become loveless.

“God is love!  All times and all races recognize in this word the
central point of Christianity.” God, who is love, is an officious God:
he cannot leave the world in peace, but wants to make it _blest_.  “God
became man to make men divine.”[91] He has his hand in the game
everywhere, and nothing happens without it; everywhere he has his “best
purposes,” his “incomprehensible plans and decrees.” Reason, which he
himself is, is to be forwarded and realized in the whole world.  His
fatherly care deprives us of all independence.  We can do nothing
sensible without its being said, God did that, and can bring upon
ourselves no misfortune without hearing, God ordained that; we have
nothing that we have not from him, he “gave” everything.  But, as God
does, so does Man.  God wants perforce to make the world _blest_, and
Man wants to make it _happy_, to make all men happy.  Hence every “man”
wants to awaken in all men the reason which he supposes his own self to
have: everything is to be rational throughout.  God torments himself
with the devil, and the philosopher does it with unreason and the
accidental.  God lets no being go _its own_ gait, and Man likewise wants
to make us walk only in human wise.

But whoso is full of sacred (religious, moral, humane) love loves only
the spook, the “true man,” and persecutes with dull mercilessness the
individual, the real man, under the phlegmatic legal title of measures
against the “un- man.” He finds it praiseworthy and indispensable to
exercise pitilessness in the harshest measure; for love to the spook or
generality commands him to hate him who is not ghostly, _i.e._ the
egoist or individual; such is the meaning of the renowned
love-phenomenon that is called “justice.”

The criminally arraigned man can expect no forbearance, and no one
spreads a friendly veil over his unhappy nakedness.  Without emotion the
stern judge tears the last rags of excuse from the body of the poor
accused; without compassion the jailer drags him into his damp abode;
without placability, when the time of punishment has expired, he thrusts
the branded man again among men, his good, Christian, loyal brethren,
who contemptuously spit on him.  Yes, without grace a criminal
“deserving of death” is led to the scaffold, and before the eyes of a
jubilating crowd the appeased moral law celebrates its sublime —
revenge.  For only one can live, the moral law or the criminal.  Where
criminals live unpunished, the moral law has fallen; and, where this
prevails, those must go down.  Their enmity is indestructible.

The Christian age is precisely that of _mercy, love_, solicitude to have
men receive what is due them, yes, to bring them to fulfil their human
(divine) calling.  Therefore the principle has been put foremost for
intercourse, that this and that is man’s essence and consequently his
calling, to which either God has called him or (according to the
concepts of today) his being man (the species) calls him.  Hence the
zeal for conversion.  That the Communists and the humane expect from man
more than the Christians do does not change the standpoint in the least.
Man shall get what is human!  If it was enough for the pious that what
was divine became his part, the humane demand that he be not curtailed
of what is human.  Both set themselves against what is egoistic.  Of
course; for what is egoistic cannot be accorded to him or vested in him
(a fief); he must procure it for himself.  Love imparts the former, the
latter can be given to me by myself alone.

Intercourse hitherto has rested on love, _regardful_ behavior, doing for
each other.  As one owed it to himself to make himself blessed, or owed
himself the bliss of taking up into himself the supreme essence and
bringing it to a _vérité_ (a truth and reality), so one owed it to
_others_ to help them realize their essence and their calling: in both
cases one owed it to the essence of man to contribute to its
realization.

But one owes it neither to himself to make anything out of himself, nor
to others to make anything out of them; for one owes nothing to his
essence and that of others.  Intercourse resting on essence is an
intercourse with the spook, not with anything real.  If I hold
intercourse with the supreme essence, I am not holding intercourse with
myself, and, if I hold intercourse with the essence of man, I am not
holding intercourse with men.

The natural man’s love becomes through culture a _commandment_.  But as
commandment it belongs to _Man_ as such.  not to me; it is my
_essence_,[_Wesen_] about which much ado [_Wesen_] is made.  not my
property.  _Man_, _i.e._ humanity, presents that demand to me; love _is
demanded_, it is my _duty_.  Instead, therefore, of being really won for
_me_, it has been won for the generality, _Man_, as his property or
peculiarity: “it becomes man, every man, to love; love is the duty and
calling of man,” etc.

Consequently I must again vindicate love for _myself_, and deliver it
out of the power of Man with the great M.

What was originally _mine_, but _accidentally_ mine, instinctively mine,
I was invested with as the property of Man; I became feoffee in loving,
I became the retainer of mankind, only a specimen of this species, and
acted, loving, not as _I_, but as _man_, as a specimen of man, the
humanly.  The whole condition of civilization is the _feudal system_,
the property being Man’s or mankind’s, not _mine_.  A monstrous feudal
State was founded, the individual robbed of everything, everything left
to “man.” The individual had to appear at last as a “sinner through and
through.”

Am I perchance to have no lively interest in the person of another, are
_his_ joy and _his_ weal not to lie at my heart, is the enjoyment that I
furnish him not to be more to me than other enjoyments of my own?  On
the contrary, I can with joy sacrifice to him numberless enjoyments, I
can deny myself numberless things for the enhancement of _his_ pleasure,
and I can hazard for him what without him was the dearest to me, my
life, my welfare, my freedom.  Why, it constitutes my pleasure and my
happiness to refresh myself with his happiness and his pleasure.  But
_myself, my own self_, I do not sacrifice to him, but remain an egoist
and — enjoy him.  If I sacrifice to him everything that but for my love
to him I should keep, that is very simple, and even more usual in life
than it seems to be; but it proves nothing further than that this one
passion is more powerful in me than all the rest.  Christianity too
teaches us to sacrifice all other passions to this.  But, if to one
passion I sacrifice others, I do not on that account go so far as to
sacrifice _myself_, nor sacrifice anything of that whereby I truly am
myself; I do not sacrifice my peculiar value, my _ownness_.  Where this
bad case occurs, love cuts no better figure than any other passion that
I obey blindly.  The ambitious man, who is carried away by ambition and
remains deaf to every warning that a calm moment begets in him, has let
this passion grow up into a despot against whom he abandons all power of
dissolution: he has given up himself, because he cannot _dissolve_
himself, and consequently cannot absolve himself from the passion: he is
possessed.

I love men too — not merely individuals, but every one.  But I love them
with the consciousness of egoism; I love them because love makes _me_
happy, I love because loving is natural to me, because it pleases me.  I
know no “commandment of love.” I have a _fellow-feeling_ with every
feeling being, and their torment torments, their refreshment refreshes
me too; I can kill them, not torture them.  _Per contra_, the
high-souled, virtuous Philistine prince Rudolph in _The Mysteries of
Paris_, because the wicked provoke his “indignation,” plans their
torture.  That fellow-feeling proves only that the feeling of those who
feel is mine too, my property; in opposition to which the pitiless
dealing of the “righteous” man (_e.g._ against notary Ferrand) is like
the unfeelingness of that robber [Procrustes] who cut _off_ or stretched
his prisoners’ legs to the measure of his bedstead: Rudolph’s bedstead,
which he cuts men to fit, is the concept of the “good.” The for right,
virtue, etc., makes people hard-hearted and intolerant.  Rudolph does
not feel like the notary, but the reverse; he feels that “it serves the
rascal right”; that is no fellow-feeling.

You love man, therefore you torture the individual man, the egoist; your
philanthropy (love of men) is the tormenting of men.

If I see the loved one suffer, I suffer with him, and I know no rest
till I have tried everything to comfort and cheer him; if I see him
glad, I too become glad over his joy.  From this it does not follow that
suffering or joy is caused in me by the same thing that brings out this
effect in him, as is sufficiently proved by every bodily pain which I do
not feel as he does; his tooth pains him, but his pain pains me.

But, because I cannot bear the troubled crease on the beloved forehead,
for that reason, and therefore for my sake, I kiss it away.  If I did
not love this person, he might go right on making creases, they would
not trouble me; I am only driving away _my_ trouble.

How now, has anybody or anything, whom and which I do not love, a
_right_ to be loved by me?  Is my love first, or is his right first?
Parents, kinsfolk, fatherland, nation, native town, etc., finally
fellowmen in general (“brothers, fraternity”), assert that they have a
right to my love, and lay claim to it without further ceremony.  They
look upon it as _their property_, and upon me, if I do not respect this,
as a robber who takes from them what pertains to them and is theirs.  I
_should_ love.  If love is a commandment and law, then I must be
educated into it, cultivated up to it, and, if I trespass against it,
punished.  Hence people will exercise as strong a “moral influence” as
possible on me to bring me to love.  And there is no doubt that one can
work up and seduce men to love as one can to other passions — if you
like, to hate.  Hate runs through whole races merely because the
ancestors of the one belonged to the Guelphs, those of the other to the
Ghibellines.

But love is not a commandment, but, like each of my feelings, _my
property.  Acquire_, _i.e._ purchase, my property, and then I will make
it over to you.  A church, a nation, a fatherland, a family, etc., that
does not know how to acquire my love, I need not love; and I fix the
purchase price of my love quite at my pleasure.

Selfish love is far distant from unselfish, mystical, or romantic love.
One can love everything possible, not merely men, but an “object” in
general (wine, one’s fatherland, etc.).  Love becomes blind and crazy by
a _must_ taking it out of my power (infatuation), romantic by a _should_
entering into it, _i.e._ by the “objects” becoming sacred for me, or my
becoming bound to it by duty, conscience, oath.  Now the object no
longer exists for me, but I for it.

Love is a possessedness, not as my feeling — as such I rather keep it in
my possession as property — but through the alienness of the object.
For religious love consists in the commandment to love in the beloved a
“holy one,” or to adhere to a holy one; for unselfish love there are
objects _absolutely lovable_ for which my heart is to beat, _e.g._
fellow-men, or my wedded mate, kinsfolk, etc.  Holy Love loves the holy
in the beloved, and therefore exerts itself also to make of the beloved
more and more a holy one (a “man”).

The beloved is an object that _should_ be loved by me.  He is not an
object of my love on account of, because of, or by, my loving him, but
is an object of love in and of himself.  Not I make him an object of
love, but he is such to begin with; for it is here irrelevant that he
has become so by my choice, if so it be (as with a _fiancée_, a spouse,
etc.), since even so he has in any case, as the person once chosen,
obtained a “right of his own to my love,” and I, because I have loved
him, am under obligation to love him forever.  He is therefore not an
object of _my_ love, but of love in general: an object that _should_ be
loved.  Love appertains to him, is due to him, or is his _right_, while
I am under _obligation_ to love him.  My love, _i.e._ the toll of love
that I pay him, is in truth _his_ love, which he only collects from me
as toll.

Every love to which there clings but the smallest speck of obligation is
an unselfish love, and, so far as this speck reaches, a possessedness.
He who believes that he _owes_ the object of his love anything loves
romantically or religiously.

Family love, _e.g._ as it is usually understood as “piety,” is a
religious love; love of fatherland, preached as “patriotism,” likewise.
All our romantic loves move in the same pattern: everywhere the
hypocrisy, or rather self-deception, of an “unselfish love,” an interest
in the object for the object’s sake, not for my sake and mine alone.

Religious or romantic love is distinguished from sensual love by the
difference of the object indeed, but not by the dependence of the
relation to it.  In the latter regard both are possessedness; but in the
former the one object is profane, the other sacred.  The dominion of the
object over me is the same in both cases, only that it is one time a
sensuous one, the other time a spiritual (ghostly) one.  My love is my
own only when it consists altogether in a selfish and egoistic interest,
and when consequently the object of my love is really _my_ object or my
property.  I owe my property nothing, and have no duty to it, as little
as I might have a duty to my eye; if nevertheless I guard it with the
greatest care, I do so on my account.

Antiquity lacked love as little as do Christian times; the god of love
is older than the God of Love.  But the mystical possessedness belongs
to the moderns.

The possessedness of love lies in the alienation of the object, or in my
powerlessness as against its alienness and superior power.  To the
egoist nothing is high enough for him to humble himself before it,
nothing so independent that he would live for love of it, nothing so
sacred that he would sacrifice himself to it.  The egoist’s love rises
in selfishness, flows in the bed of selfishness, and empties into
selfishness again.

Whether this can still be called love?  If you know another word for it,
go ahead and choose it; then the sweet word love may wither with the
departed world; for the present I at least find none in our _Christian_
language, and hence stick to the old sound and “love” _my_ object, my —
property.

Only as one of my feelings do I harbor love; but as a power above me, as
a divine power, as Feuerbach says, as a passion that I am not to cast
off, as a religious and moral duty, I — scorn it.  As my feeling it is
_mine;_ as a principle to which I consecrate and “vow” my soul it is a
dominator and _divine_, just as hatred as a principle _is diabolical;_
one not better than the other.  In short, egoistic love, _i.e._ my love,
is neither holy nor unholy, neither divine nor diabolical.

“A love that is limited by faith is an untrue love.  The sole limitation
that does not contradict the essence of love is the self-limitation of
love by reason, intelligence.  Love that scorns the rigor, the law, of
intelligence, is theoretically a false love, practically a ruinous
one.”[92] So love is in its essence _rational!_ So thinks Feuerbach; the
believer, on the contrary, thinks, Love is in its essence _believing_.
The one inveighs against _irrational_, the other against _unbelieving_,
love.  To both it can at most rank as a _splendidum vitium_.  Do not
both leave love standing, even in the form of unreason and unbelief?
They do not dare to say, irrational or unbelieving love is nonsense, is
not love; as little as they are willing to say, irrational or
unbelieving tears are not tears.  But, if even irrational love, etc.,
must count as love, and if they are nevertheless to be unworthy of man,
there follows simply this: love is not the highest thing, but reason or
faith; even the unreasonable and the unbelieving can love; but love has
value only when it is that of a rational or believing person.  It is an
illusion when Feuerbach calls the rationality of love its
“self-limitation”; the believer might with the same right call belief
its “self-limitation.” Irrational love is neither “false” nor “ruinous”;
its does its service as love.

Toward the world, especially toward men, I am to _assume a particular
feeling_, and “meet them with love,” with the feeling of love, from the
beginning.  Certainly, in this there is revealed far more free-will and
self-determination than when I let myself be stormed, by way of the
world, by all possible feelings, and remain exposed to the most
checkered, most accidental impressions.  I go to the world rather with a
preconceived feeling, as if it were a prejudice and a preconceived
opinion; I have prescribed to myself in advance my behavior toward it,
and, despite all its temptations, feel and think about it only as I have
once determined to.  Against the dominion of the world I secure myself
by the principle of love; for, whatever may come, I — love.  The ugly —
_e.g._ —makes a repulsive impression on me; but, determined to love, I
master this impression as I do every antipathy.

But the feeling to which I have determined and — condemned myself from
the start is a _narrow_ feeling, because it is a predestined one, of
which I myself am not able to get clear or to declare myself clear.
Because preconceived, it is a _prejudice.  I_ no longer show myself in
face of the world, but my love shows itself.  The _world_ indeed does
not rule me, but so much the more inevitably does the spirit of _love_
rule this spirit.

If I first said, I love the world, I now add likewise: I do not love it,
for I _annihilate_ it as I annihilate myself; I _dissolve it_.  I do not
limit myself to one feeling for men, but give free play to all that I am
capable of.  Why should I not dare speak it out in all its glaringness?
Yes, I _utilize_ the world and men!  With this I can keep myself open to
every impression without being torn away from myself by one of them.  I
can love, love with a full heart, and let the most consuming glow of
passion burn in my heart, without taking the beloved one for anything
else than the _nourishment_ of my passion, on which it ever refreshes
itself anew.  All my care for him applies only to the _object of my
love_, only to him whom my love _requires_, only to him, the “warmly
loved.” How indifferent would he be to me without this — my love!  I
feed only my love with him, I _utilize_ him for this only: I _enjoy_
him.

Let us choose another convenient example.  I see how men are fretted in
dark superstition by a swarm of ghosts.  If to the extent of my powers I
let a bit of daylight fall in on the nocturnal spookery, is it perchance
because love to you inspires this in me?  Do I write out of love to men?
No, I write because I want to procure for _my_ thoughts an existence in
the world; and, even if I foresaw that these thoughts would deprive you
of your rest and your peace, even if I saw the bloodiest wars and the
fall of many generations springing up from this seed of thought — I
would nevertheless scatter it.  Do with it what you will and can, that
is your affair and does not trouble me.  You will perhaps have only
trouble, combat, and death from it, very few will draw joy from it.  If
your weal lay at my heart, I should act as the church did in withholding
the Bible from the laity, or Christian governments, which make it a
sacred duty for themselves to “protect the common people from bad
books.”

But not only not for your sake, not even for truth’s sake either do I
speak out what I think.  No —

<quote>

I sing as the bird sings

That on the bough alights;

The song that from me springs

Is pay that well requites.

</quote>

I sing because — I am a singer.  But I _use_[_gebrauche_] you for it
because I — need [_brauche_] ears.

Where the world comes in my way — and it comes in my way everywhere — I
consume it to quiet the hunger of my egoism.  For me you are nothing but
—my food, even as I too am fed upon and turned to use by you.  We have
only one relation to each other, that of _usableness_, of utility, of
use.  We owe _each other_ nothing, for what I seem to owe you I owe at
most to myself.  If I show you a cheery air in order to cheer you
likewise, then your cheeriness is of consequence to _me_, and my air
serves _my_ wish; to a thousand others, whom I do not aim to cheer, I do
not show it.


	* * *

One has to be educated up to that love which founds itself on the
“essence of man” or, in the ecclesiastical and moral period, lies upon
us as a “commandment.” In what fashion moral influence, the chief
ingredient of our education, seeks to regulate the intercourse of men
shall here be looked at with egoistic eyes in one example at least.

Those who educate us make it their concern early to break us of lying
and to inculcate the principle that one must always tell the truth.  If
selfishness were made the basis for this rule, every one would easily
understand how by lying he fools away that confidence in him which he
hopes to awaken in others, and how correct the maxim proves, Nobody
believes a liar even when he tells the truth.  Yet, at the same time, he
would also feel that he had to meet with truth only him whom _he_
authorized to hear the truth.  If a spy walks in disguise through the
hostile camp, and is asked who he is, the askers are assuredly entitled
to inquire after his name, but the disguised man does not give them the
right to learn the truth from him; he tells them what he likes, only not
the fact.  And yet morality demands, “Thou shalt not lie!” By morality
those persons are vested with the right to expect the truth; but by me
they are not vested with that right, and I recognize only the right that
_I_ impart.  In a gathering of revolutionists the police force their way
in and ask the orator for his name; everybody knows that the police have
the right to do so, but they do not have it from the _revolutionist_,
since he is their enemy; he tells them a false name and —cheats them
with a lie.  The police do not act so foolishly either as to count on
their enemies’ love of truth; on the contrary, they do not believe
without further ceremony, but have the questioned individual
“identified” if they can.  Nay, the State — everywhere proceeds
incredulously with individuals, because in their egoism it recognizes
its natural enemy; it invariably demands a “voucher,” and he who cannot
show vouchers falls a prey to its investigating inquisition.  The State
does not believe nor trust the individual, and so of itself places
itself with him in the _convention of lying_; it trusts me only when it
has _convinced_ itself of the truth of my statement, for which there
often remains to it no other means than the oath.  How clearly, too,
this (the oath) proves that the State does not count on our credibility
and love of truth, but on our _interest_, our selfishness: it relies on
our not wanting to fall foul of God by a perjury.

Now, let one imagine a French revolutionist in the year 1788, who among
friends let fall the now well-known phrase, “the world will have no rest
till the last king is hanged with the guts of the last priest.” The king
then still had all power, and, when the utterance is betrayed by an
accident, yet without its being possible to produce witnesses,
confession is demanded from the accused.  Is he to confess or not?  If
he denies, he lies and — remains unpunished; if he confesses, he is
candid and — is beheaded.  If truth is more than everything else to him,
all right, let him die.  Only a paltry poet could try to make a tragedy
out of the end of his life; for what interest is there in seeing how a
man succumbs from cowardice?  But, if he had the courage not to be a
slave of truth and sincerity, he would ask somewhat thus: Why need the
judges know what I have spoken among friends?  If I had _wished_ them to
know, I should have said it to them as I said it to my friends.  I will
not have them know it.  They force themselves into my confidence without
my having called them to it and made them my confidants; they _will_
learn what I _will_ keep secret.  Come on then, you who wish to break my
will by your will, and try your arts.  You can torture me by the rack,
you can threaten me with hell and eternal damnation, you can make me so
nerveless that I swear a false oath, but the truth you shall not press
out of me, for I _will_ lie to you because I have given you no claim and
no right to my sincerity.  Let God, “who is truth,” look down ever so
threateningly on me, let lying come ever so hard to me, I have
nevertheless the courage of a lie; and, even if I were weary of my life,
even if nothing appeared to me more welcome than your executioner’s
sword, you nevertheless should not have the joy of finding in me a slave
of truth, whom by your priestly arts you make a traitor to his _will_.
When I spoke those treasonable words, I would not have had you know
anything of them; I now retain the same will, and do not let myself be
frightened by the curse of the lie.

Sigismund is not a miserable caitiff because he broke his princely word,
but he broke the word because he was a caitiff; he might have kept his
word and would still have been a caitiff, a priest-ridden man.  Luther,
driven by a higher power, became unfaithful to his monastic vow: he
became so for God’s sake.  Both broke their oath as possessed persons:
Sigismund, because he wanted to appear as a _sincere_ professor of the
divine _truth_, _i.  e._, of the true, genuinely Catholic faith; Luther,
in order to give testimony for the gospel _sincerely_ and with entire
truth.  with body and soul; both became perjured in order to be sincere
toward the “higher truth.” Only, the priests absolved the one, the other
absolved himself.  What else did both observe than what is contained in
those apostolic words, “Thou hast not lied to men, but to God?” They
lied to men, broke their oath before the world’s eyes, in order not to
lie to God, but to serve him.  Thus they show us a way to deal with
truth before men.  For God’s glory, and for God’s sake, a — breach of
oath, a lie, a prince’s word broken!

How would it be, now, if we changed the thing a little and wrote, A
perjury and lie for — _my sake?_ Would not that be pleading for every
baseness?  It seems so, assuredly, only in this it is altogether like
the “for God’s sake.” For was not every baseness committed for God’s
sake, were not all the scaffolds filled for his sake and all the
_autos-da-fé_ held for his sake, was not all stupefaction introduced for
his sake?  And do they not today still for God’s sake fetter the mind in
tender children by religious education?  Were not sacred vows broken for
his sake, and do not missionaries and priests still go around every day
to bring Jews, heathen, Protestants or Catholics, to treason against the
faith of their fathers — for his sake?  And that should be worse with
the _for my sake?_ What then does _on my account_ mean?  There people
immediately think of _“filthy lucre”_.  But he who acts from love of
filthy lucre does it on his own account indeed, as there is nothing
anyhow that one does not do for his own sake — among other things,
everything that is done for God’s glory; yet he, for whom he seeks the
lucre, is a slave of lucre, not raised above lucre; he is one who
belongs to lucre, the money-bag, not to himself; he is not his own.
Must not a man whom the passion of avarice rules follow the commands of
this _master?_ And, if a weak goodnaturedness once beguiles him, does
this not appear as simply an exceptional case of precisely the same sort
as when pious believers are sometimes forsaken by their Lord’s guidance
and ensnared by the arts of the “devil?” So an avaricious man is not a
self-owned man, but a servant; and he can do nothing for his own sake
without at the same time doing it for his lord’s sake — precisely like
the godly man.

Famous is the breach of oath which Francis I committed against Emperor
Charles V.  Not later, when he ripely weighed his promise, but at once,
when he swore the oath, King Francis took it back in thought as well as
by a secret protestation documentarily subscribed before his
councillors; he uttered a perjury aforethought.  Francis did not show
himself disinclined to buy his release, but the price that Charles put
on it seemed to him too high and unreasonable.  Even though Charles
behaved himself in a sordid fashion when he sought to extort as much as
possible, it was yet shabby of Francis to want to purchase his freedom
for a lower ransom; and his later dealings, among which there occurs yet
a second breach of his word, prove sufficiently how the huckster spirit
held him enthralled and made him a shabby swindler.  However, what shall
we say to the reproach of perjury against him?  In the first place,
surely, this again: that not the perjury, but his sordidness, shamed
him; that he did not deserve contempt for his perjury, but made himself
guilty of perjury because he was a contemptible man.  But Francis’s
perjury, regarded in itself, demands another judgment.  One might say
Francis did not respond to the confidence that Charles put in him in
setting him free.  But, if Charles had really favored him with
confidence, he would have named to him the price that he considered the
release worth, and would then have set him at liberty and expected
Francis to pay the redemption-sum.  Charles harbored no such trust, but
only believed in Francis’s impotence and credulity, which would not
allow him to act against his oath; but Francis deceived only this —
credulous calculation.  When Charles believed he was assuring himself of
his enemy by an oath, right there he was freeing him from every
obligation.  Charles had given the king credit for a piece of stupidity,
a narrow conscience, and, without confidence in Francis, counted only on
Francis’s stupidity, _e.g._, conscientiousness: he let him go from the
Madrid prison only to hold him the more securely in the prison of
conscientiousness, the great jail built about the mind of man by
religion: he sent him back to France locked fast in invisible chains,
what wonder if Francis sought to escape and sawed the chains apart?  No
man would have taken it amiss of him if he had secretly fled from
Madrid, for he was in an enemy’s power; but every good Christian cries
out upon him, that he wanted to loose himself from God’s bonds too.  (It
was only later that the pope absolved him from his oath.)

It is despicable to deceive a confidence that we voluntarily call forth;
but it is no shame to egoism to let every one who wants to get us into
his power by an oath bleed to death by the failure of his untrustful
craft.  If you have wanted to bind me, then learn that I know how to
burst your bonds.

The point is whether I give the confider the right to confidence.  If
the pursuer of my friend asks me where he has fled to, I shall surely
put him on a false trail.  Why does he ask precisely me, the pursued
man’s friend?  In order not to be a false, traitorous friend, I prefer
to be false to the enemy.  I might certainly in courageous
conscientiousness, answer, “I will not tell” (so Fichte decides the
case); by that I should salve my love of truth and do for my friend as
much as — nothing, for, if I do not mislead the enemy, he may
accidentally take the right street, and my love of truth would have
given up my friend as a prey, because it hindered me from the —courage
for a lie.  He who has in the truth an idol, a sacred thing, must
_humble_ himself before it, must not defy its demands, not resist
courageously; in short, he must renounce the _heroism of the lie_.  For
to the lie belongs not less courage than to the truth: a courage that
young men are most apt to be defective in, who would rather confess the
truth and mount the scaffold for it than confound the enemy’s power by
the impudence of a lie.  To them the truth is “sacred,” and the sacred
at all times demands blind reverence, submission, and self-sacrifice.
If you are not impudent, not mockers of the sacred, you are tame and its
servants.  Let one but lay a grain of truth in the trap for you, you
peck at it to a certainty, and the fool is caught.  You will not lie?
Well, then, fall as sacrifices to the truth and become — martyrs!
Martyrs!  — for what?  For yourselves, for self-ownership?  No, for your
goddess — the truth.  You know only two _services_, only two kinds of
servants: servants of the truth and servants of the lie.  Then in God’s
name serve the truth!

Others, again, serve the truth also; but they serve it “in moderation,”
and make, _e.g._ a great distinction between a simple lie and a lie
sworn to.  And yet the whole chapter of the oath coincides with that of
the lie, since an oath, everybody knows, is only a strongly assured
statement.  You consider yourselves entitled to lie, if only you do not
swear to it besides?  One who is particular about it must judge and
condemn a lie as sharply as a false oath.  But now there has been kept
up in morality an ancient point of controversy, which is customarily
treated of under the name of the “lie of necessity.” No one who dares
plead for this can consistently put from him an “oath of necessity.” If
I justify my lie as a lie of necessity, I should not be so pusillanimous
as to rob the justified lie of the strongest corroboration.  Whatever I
do, why should I not do it entirely and without reservations
(_reservatio mentalis_)?  If I once lie, why then not lie completely,
with entire consciousness and all my might?  As a spy I should have to
swear to each of my false statements at the enemy’s demand; determined
to lie to him, should I suddenly become cowardly and undecided in face
of an oath?  Then I should have been ruined in advance for a liar and
spy; for, you see, I should be voluntarily putting into the enemy’s
hands a means to catch me.  — The State too fears the oath of necessity,
and for this reason does not give the accused a chance to swear.  But
you do not justify the State’s fear; you lie, but do not swear falsely.
If, _e.g._ you show some one a kindness, and he is not to know it, but
he guesses it and tells you so to your face, you deny; if he insists,
you say, “honestly, no!” If it came to swearing, then you would refuse;
for, from fear of the sacred, you always stop half way.  _Against_ the
sacred you have no _will of your own_.  You lie in — moderation, as you
are free “in moderation,” religious “in moderation” (the clergy are not
to “encroach”; over this point the most rapid of controversies is now
being carried on, on the part of the university against the church),
monarchically disposed “in moderation” (you want a monarch limited by
the constitution, by a fundamental law of the State), everything nicely
_tempered_, lukewarm, half God’s, half the devil’s.

There was a university where the usage was that every word of honor that
must be given to the university judge was looked upon by the students as
null and void.  For the students saw in the demanding of it nothing but
a snare, which they could not escape otherwise than by taking away all
its significance.  He who at that same university broke his word of
honor to one of the fellows was infamous; he who gave it to the
university judge derided, in union with these very fellows, the dupe who
fancied that a word had the same value among friends and among foes.  It
was less a correct theory than the constraint of practice that had there
taught the students to act so, as, without that means of getting out,
they would have been pitilessly driven to treachery against their
comrades.  But, as the means approved itself in practice, so it has its
theoretical probation too.  A word of honor, an oath, is one only for
him whom I entitle to receive it; he who forces me to it obtains only a
forced, _i.e._ a _hostile_ word, the word of a foe, whom one has no
right to trust; for the foe does not give us the right.

Aside from this, the courts of the State do not even recognize the
inviolability of an oath.  For, if I had sworn to one who comes under
examination that I would not declare anything against him, the court
would demand my declaration in spite of the fact that an oath binds me,
and, in case of refusal, would lock me up till I decided to become — an
oath-breaker.  The court “absolves me from my oath”; — how magnanimous!
If any power can absolve me from the oath, I myself am surely the very
first power that has a claim to.

As a curiosity, and to remind us of customary oaths of all sorts, let
place be given here to that which Emperor Paul commanded the captured
Poles (Kosciuszko, Potocki, Niemcewicz, and others) to take when he
released them: “We not merely swear fidelity and obedience to the
emperor, but also further promise to pour out our blood for his glory;
we obligate ourselves to discover everything threatening to his person
or his empire that we ever learn; we declare finally that, in whatever
part of the earth we may be, a single word of the emperor shall suffice
to make us leave everything and repair to him at once.”


	* * *

In one domain the principle of love seems to have been long outsoared by
egoism, and to be still in need only of sure consciousness, as it were
of victory with a good conscience.  This domain is speculation, in its
double manifestation as thinking and as trade.  One thinks with a will,
whatever may come of it; one speculates, however many may suffer under
our speculative undertakings.  But, when it finally becomes serious,
when even the last remnant of religiousness, romance, or “humanity” is
to be done away, then the pulse of religious conscience beats, and one
at least _professes_ humanity.  The avaricious speculator throws some
coppers into the poor-box and “does good,” the bold thinker consoles
himself with the fact that he is working for the advancement of the
human race and that his devastation “turns to the good” of mankind, or,
in another case, that he is “serving the idea”; mankind, the idea, is to
him that something of which he must say, It is more to me than myself.

To this day thinking and trading have been done for — God’s sake.  Those
who for six days were trampling down everything by their selfish aims
sacrificed on the seventh to the Lord; and those who destroyed a hundred
“good causes” by their reckless thinking still did this in the service
of another “good cause,” and had yet to think of another — besides
themselves — to whose good their self-indulgence should turn; of the
people, mankind, etc.  But this other thing is a being above them, a
higher or supreme being; and therefore I say, they are toiling for God’s
sake.

Hence I can also say that the ultimate basis of their actions is — love.
Not a voluntary love however, not their own, but a tributary love, or
the higher being’s own (God’s, who himself is love); in short, not the
egoistic, but the religious; a love that springs from their fancy that
they _must_ discharge a tribute of love, _i.e._ that they must not be
“egoists.”

If _we_ want to deliver the world from many kinds of unfreedom, we want
this not on its account but on ours; for, as we are not world-liberators
by profession and out of “love,” we only want to win it away from
others.  We want to make it _our_ own; it is not to be any longer _owned
as serf_ by God (the church) nor by the law (State), but to be _our
own_; therefore we seek to “win” it, to “captivate” it, and, by meeting
it halfway and “devoting” ourselves to it as to ourselves as soon as it
belongs to us, to complete and make superfluous the force that it turns
against us.  If the world is ours, it no longer attempts any force
_against_ us, but only _with us_.  My selfishness has an interest in the
liberation of the world, that it may become — my property.

Not isolation or being alone, but society, is man’s original state.  Our
existence begins with the most intimate conjunction, as we are already
living with our mother before we breathe; when we see the light of the
world, we at once lie on a human being’s breast again, her love cradles
us in the lap, leads us in the go-cart, and chains us to her person with
a thousand ties.  Society is our _state of nature_.  And this is why,
the more we learn to feel ourselves, the connection that was formerly
most intimate becomes ever looser and the dissolution of the original
society more unmistakable.  To have once again for herself the child
that once lay under her heart, the mother must fetch it from the street
and from the midst of its playmates.  The child prefers the
_intercourse_ that it enters into with _its fellows_ to the _society_
that it has not entered into, but only been born in.

But the dissolution of _society_ is _intercourse_ or _union_.  A society
does assuredly arise by union too, but only as a fixed idea arises by a
thought — to wit, by the vanishing of the energy of the thought (the
thinking itself, this restless taking back all thoughts that make
themselves fast) from the thought.  If a union [_Verein_] has
crystallized into a society, it has ceased to be a coalition;
[_Vereinigung_] for coalition is an incessant self-uniting; it has
become a unitedness, come to a standstill, degenerated into a fixity; it
is — _dead_ as a union, it is the corpse of the union or the coalition,
_i.e._ it is —society, community.  A striking example of this kind is
furnished by the _party_.

That a society (_e.g._ the society of the State) diminishes my _liberty_
offends me little.  Why, I have to let my liberty be limited by all
sorts of powers and by every one who is stronger; nay, by every
fellow-man; and, were I the autocrat of all the R..., I yet should not
enjoy absolute liberty.  But _ownness_ I will not have taken from me.
And ownness is precisely what every society has designs on, precisely
what is to succumb to its power.

A society which I join does indeed take from me many liberties, but in
return it affords me other liberties; neither does it matter if I myself
deprive myself of this and that liberty (_e.g._ by any contract).  On
the other hand, I want to hold jealously to my ownness.  Every community
has the propensity, stronger or weaker according to the fullness of its
power, to become an _authority_ to its members and to set _limits_ for
them: it asks, and must ask, for a “subject’s limited understanding”; it
asks that those who belong to it be subjected to it, be its “subjects”;
it exists only by _subjection_.  In this a certain tolerance need by no
means be excluded; on the contrary, the society will welcome
improvements, corrections, and blame, so far as such are calculated for
its gain: but the blame must be “well-meaning,” it may not be “insolent
and disrespectful” — in other words, one must leave uninjured, and hold
sacred, the substance of the society.  The society demands that those
who belong to it shall not _go beyond it_ and exalt themselves, but
remain “within the bounds of legality,” _e.g._, allow themselves only so
much as the society and its law allow them.

There is a difference whether my liberty or my ownness is limited by a
society.  If the former only is the case, it is a coalition, an
agreement, a union; but, if ruin is threatened to ownness, it is _a
power of itself_, a power _above me_, a thing unattainable by me, which
I can indeed admire, adore, reverence, respect, but cannot subdue and
consume, and that for the reason that I _am resigned_.  It exists by my
_resignation_, my _self-renunciation_, my
spiritlessness,[_Muthlösigkeit_] called — HUMILITY.[_Demuth_] My
humility makes its courage,[_Muth_] my submissiveness gives it its
dominion.

But in reference to _liberty_, State and union are subject to no
essential difference.  The latter can just as little come into
existence, or continue in existence, without liberty’s being limited in
all sorts of ways, as the State is compatible with unmeasured liberty.
Limitation of liberty is inevitable everywhere, for one cannot get _rid_
of everything; one cannot fly like a bird merely because one would like
to fly so, for one does not get free from his own weight; one cannot
live under water as long as he likes, like a fish, because one cannot do
without air and cannot get free from this indispensable necessity; etc.
As religion, and most decidedly Christianity, tormented man with the
demand to realize the unnatural and self- contradictory, so it is to be
looked upon only as the true logical outcome of that religious
over-straining and overwroughtness that finally _liberty itself,
absolute liberty_, was exalted into an ideal, and thus the nonsense of
the impossible to come glaringly to the light.  — The union will
assuredly offer a greater measure of liberty, as well as (and especially
because by it one escapes all the coercion peculiar to State and society
life) admit of being considered as “a new liberty”; but nevertheless it
will still contain enough of unfreedom and involuntariness.  For its
object is not this — liberty (which on the contrary it sacrifices to
ownness), but only _ownness_.  Referred to this, the difference between
State and union is great enough.  The former is an enemy and murderer of
_ownness_, the latter a son and co-worker of it; the former a spirit
that would be adored in spirit and in truth, the latter my work, my
product ; the State is the lord of my spirit, who demands faith and
prescribes to me articles of faith, the creed of legality; it exerts
moral influence, dominates my spirit, drives away my ego to put itself
in its place as “my true ego” — in short, the State is sacred, and as
against me, the individual man, it is the true man, the spirit, the
ghost; but the union is my own creation, my creature, not sacred, not a
spiritual power above my spirit, as little as any association of
whatever sort.  As I am not willing to be a slave of my maxims, but lay
them bare to my continual criticism without _any warrant_, and admit no
bail at all for their persistence, so still less do I obligate myself to
the union for my future and pledge my soul to it, as is said to be done
with the devil, and is really the case with the State and all spiritual
authority; but I am and remain _more_ to myself than State, Church, God,
etc.; consequently infinitely more than the union too.

That society which Communism wants to found seems to stand nearest to
_coalition_.  For it is to aim at the “welfare of all,” oh, yes, of all,
cries Weitling innumerable times, of all!  That does really look as if
in it no one needed to take a back seat.  But what then will this
welfare be?  Have all one and the same welfare, are all equally well off
with one and the same thing?  If that be so, the question is of the
“true welfare.” Do we not with this come right to the point where
religion begins its dominion of violence?  Christianity says, Look not
on earthly toys, but seek your true welfare, become — pious Christians;
being Christians is the true welfare.  It is the true welfare of “all,”
because it is the welfare of Man as such (this spook).  Now, the welfare
of all is surely to be _your_ and _my_ welfare too?  But, if you and I
do not look upon that welfare as _our_ welfare, will care then be taken
for that in which _we_ feel well?  On the contrary, society has decreed
a welfare as the “true welfare,” if this welfare were called _e.g._
“enjoyment honestly worked for”; but if you preferred enjoyable
laziness, enjoyment without work, then society, which cares for the
“welfare of all,” would wisely avoid caring for that in which you are
well off.  Communism, in proclaiming the welfare of all, annuls outright
the well-being of those who hitherto lived on their income from
investments and apparently felt better in that than in the prospect of
Weitling’s strict hours of labor.  Hence the latter asserts that with
the welfare of thousands the welfare of millions cannot exist, and the
former must give up _their_ special welfare “for the sake of the general
welfare.” No, let people not be summoned to sacrifice their special
welfare for the general, for this Christian admonition will not carry
you through; they will better understand the opposite admonition, not to
let their _own_ welfare be snatched from them by anybody, but to put it
on a permanent foundation.  Then they are of themselves led to the point
that they care best for their welfare if they _unite_ with others for
this purpose, _e.g._, “sacrifice a part of their liberty,” yet not to
the welfare of others, but to their own.  An appeal to men’s
self-sacrificing disposition end self- renouncing love ought at least to
have lost its seductive plausibility when, after an activity of
thousands of years, it has left nothing behind but the — _misère_ of
today.  Why then still fruitlessly expect self-sacrifice to bring us
better time?  Why not rather hope for them from _usurpation?_ Salvation
comes no longer from the giver, the bestower, the loving one, but from
the _taker_, the appropriator (usurper), the owner.  Communism, and,
consciously, egoism-reviling humanism, still count on _love_.

If community is once a need of man, and he finds himself furthered by it
in his aims, then very soon, because it has become his principle, it
prescribes to him its laws too, the laws of — society.  The principle of
men exalts itself into a sovereign power over them, becomes their
supreme essence, their God, and, as such — law-giver.  Communism gives
this principle the strictest effect, and Christianity is the religion of
society, for, as Feuerbach rightly says, although he does not mean it
rightly, love is the essence of man; _e.g._, the essence of society or
of societary (Communistic) man.  All religion is a cult of society, this
principle by which societary (cultivated) man is dominated; neither is
any god an ego’s exclusive god, but always a society’s or community’s,
be it of the society, “family” (Lar, Penates) or of a “people”
(“national god”) or of “all men” (“he is a Father of all men”).

Consequently one has a prospect of extirpating religion down to the
ground only when one antiquates _society_ and everything that flows from
this principle.  But it is precisely in Communism that this principle
seeks to culminate, as in it everything is to become _common_ for the
establishment of — “equality.” If this “equality” is won, “liberty” too
is not lacking.  But whose liberty?  _Society’s_!  Society is then all
in all, and men are only “for each other.” It would be the glory of the
— love-State.

But I would rather be referred to men’s selfishness than to their
“kindnesses,”[Literally, “love-services”] their mercy, pity, etc.  The
former demands _reciprocity_ (as thou to me, so I to thee), does nothing
“gratis,” and may be won and — _bought_.  But with what shall I obtain
the kindness?  It is a matter of chance whether I am at the time having
to do with a “loving” person.  The affectionate one’s service can be had
only by — _begging_, be it by my lamentable appearance, by my need of
help, my misery, my — _suffering_.  What can I offer him for his
assistance?  Nothing!  I must accept it as a —present.  Love is
_unpayable_, or rather, love can assuredly be paid for, but only by
counter-love (“One good turn deserves another”).  What paltriness and
beggarliness does it not take to accept gifts year in and year out
without service in return, as they are regularly collected _e.g._ from
the poor day-laborer?  What can the receiver do for him and his donated
pennies, in which his wealth consists?  The day- laborer would really
have more enjoyment if the receiver with his laws, his institutions,
etc., all of which the day-laborer has to pay for though, did not exist
at all.  And yet, with it all, the poor wight _loves_ his master.

No, community, as the “goal” of history hitherto, is impossible.  Let us
rather renounce every hypocrisy of community, and recognize that, if we
are equal as men, we are not equal for the very reason that we are not
men.  We are equal _only in thoughts_, only when “we” are _thought_, not
as we really and bodily are.  I am ego, and you are ego: but I am not
this thought-of ego; this ego in which we are all equal is only my
_thought_.  I am man, and you are man: but “man” is only a thought, a
generality; neither I nor you are speakable, we are _unutterable_,
because only _thoughts_ are speakable and consist in speaking.

Let us therefore not aspire to community, but to _one-sidedness_.  Let
us not seek the most comprehensive commune, “human society,” but let us
seek in others only means and organs which we may use as our property!
As we do not see our equals in the tree, the beast, so the
presupposition that others are _our equals_ springs from a hypocrisy.
No one is _my equal_, but I regard him, equally with all other beings,
as my property.  In opposition to this I am told that I should be a man
among “fellow-men” (_Judenfrage_, p.  60); I should “respect” the
fellow-man in them.  For me no one is a person to be respected, not even
the fellow-man, but solely, like other beings, an _object_ in which I
take an interest or else do not, an interesting or uninteresting object,
a usable or unusable person.

And, if I can use him, I doubtless come to an understanding and make
myself at one with him, in order, by the agreement, to strengthen _my
power_, and by combined force to accomplish more than individual force
could effect.  In this combination I see nothing whatever but a
multiplication of my force, and I retain it only so long as it is my
multiplied force.  But thus it is a — union.

Neither a natural ligature nor a spiritual one holds the union together,
and it is not a natural, not a spiritual league.  It is not brought
about by one _blood_, not by one _faith_ (spirit).  In a natural league
— like a family, a tribe, a nation, yes, mankind — the individuals have
only the value of _specimens_ of the same species or genus; in a
spiritual league — like a commune, a church — the individual signifies
only a _member_ of the same spirit; what you are in both cases as a
unique person must be — suppressed.  Only in the union can you assert
yourself as unique, because the union does not possess you, but you
possess it or make it of use to you.

Property is recognized in the union, and only in the union, because one
no longer holds what is his as a fief from any being.  The Communists
are only consistently carrying further what had already been long
present during religious evolution, and especially in the State; to wit,
propertylessness, the feudal system.

The State exerts itself to tame the desirous man; in other words, it
seeks to direct his desire to it alone, and to _content_ that desire
with what it offers.  To sate the desire for the desirous man’s sake
does not come into the mind: on the contrary, it stigmatizes as an
“egoistic man” the man who breathes out unbridled desire, and the
“egoistic man” is its enemy.  He is this for it because the capacity to
agree with him is wanting to the State; the egoist is precisely what it
cannot “comprehend.” Since the State (as nothing else is possible) has
to do only for itself, it does not take care for my needs, but takes
care only of how it make away with me, _i.e._ make out of me another
ego, a good citizen.  It takes measures for the “improvement of morals.”
— And with what does it win individuals for itself?  With itself, _i.e._
with what is the State’s, with _State property_.  It will be
unremittingly active in making all participants in its “goods,”
providing all with the “good things of culture”; it presents them its
education, opens to them the access to its institutions of culture,
capacitates them to come to property (_i.e._ to a fief) in the way of
industry, etc.  For all these _fiefs_ it demands only the just rent of
continual _thanks_.  But the “unthankful” forget to pay these thanks.  —
Now, neither can “society” do essentially otherwise than the State.

You bring into a union your whole power, your competence, and _make
yourself count_; in a society you are _employed_, with your working
power; in the former you live egoistically, in the latter humanly,
_i.e._ religiously, as a “member in the body of this Lord”; to a society
you owe what you have, and are in duty bound to it, are — possessed by
“social duties”; a union you utilize, and give it up undutifully and
unfaithfully when you see no way to use it further.  If a society is
more than you, then it is more to you than yourself; a union is only
your instrument, or the sword with which you sharpen and increase your
natural force; the union exists for you and through you, the society
conversely lays claim to you for itself and exists even without you, in
short, the society is _sacred_, the union your _own_; consumes _you,
you_ consume the union.

Nevertheless people will not be backward with the objection that the
agreement which has been concluded may again become burdensome to us and
limit our freedom; they will say, we too would at last come to this,
that “every one must sacrifice a part of his freedom for the sake of the
generality.” But the sacrifice would not be made for the “generality’s”
sake a bit, as little as I concluded the agreement for the
“generality’s” or even for any other man’s sake; rather I came into it
only for the sake of my own benefit, from _selfishness_.[Literally,
“own-benefit”] But, as regards the sacrificing, surely I “sacrifice”
only that which does not stand in my power, _i.  e._, I “sacrifice”
nothing at all.

To come back to property, the lord is proprietor.  Choose then whether
you want to be lord, or whether society shall be!  On this depends
whether you are to be an _owner_ or a _ragamuffin_!  The egoist is
owner, the Socialist a ragamuffin.  But ragamuffinism or
propertylessness is the sense of feudalism, of the feudal system which
since the last century has only changed its overlord, putting “Man” in
the place of God, and accepting as a fief from Man what had before been
a fief from the grace of God.  That the ragamuffinism of Communism is
carried out by the humane principle into the absolute or most
ragamuffinly ragamuffinism has been shown above; but at the same time
also, how ragamuffinism can only thus swing around into ownness.  The
_old_ feudal system was so thoroughly trampled into the ground in the
Revolution that since then all reactionary craft has remained fruitless,
and will always remain fruitless, because the dead is — dead; but the
resurrection too had to prove itself a truth in Christian history, and
has so proved itself: for in another world feudalism is risen again with
a glorified body, the _new_ feudalism under the suzerainty of “Man.”

Christianity is not annihilated, but the faithful are right in having
hitherto trustfully assumed of every combat against it that this could
serve only for the purgation and confirmation of Christianity; for it
has really only been glorified, and “Christianity exposed” is the —
_human Christianity_.  We are still living entirely in the Christian
age, and the very ones who feel worst about it are the most zealously
contributing to “complete” it.  The more human, the dearer has feudalism
become to us; for we the less believe that it still is feudalism, we
take it the more confidently for ownness and think we have found what is
“most absolutely our own” when we discover “the human.”

Liberalism wants to give me what is mine, but it thinks to procure it
for me not under the title of mine, but under that of the “human.” As if
it were attainable under this mask!  The rights of man, the precious
work of the Revolution, have the meaning that the Man in me _entitles_
[Literally, furnishes me with a _right_] me to this and that; I as
individual, _i.e._ as this man, am not entitled, but Man has the right
and entitles me.  Hence as man I may well be entitled; but, as I am more
than man, to wit, a _special_ man, it may be refused to this very me,
the special one.  If on the other hand you insist on the _value_ of your
gifts, keep up their price, do not let yourselves be forced to sell out
below price, do not let yourselves be talked into the idea that your
ware is not worth its price.  do not make yourself ridiculous by a
“ridiculous price,” but imitate the brave man who says, I will _sell_ my
life (property) dear, the enemy shall not have it at a cheap _bargain_;
then you have recognized the reverse of Communism as the correct thing,
and the word then is not “Give up your property!” but _“Get the value
out of_ your property!”

Over the portal of our time stands not that “Know thyself” of Apollo,
but a _“Get the value out of thyself!”_

Proudhon calls property “robbery” (_le vol_).  But alien property — and
he is talking of this alone — is not less existent by renunciation,
cession, and humility; it is a _present_.  Why so sentimentally call for
compassion as a poor victim of robbery, when one is just a foolish,
cowardly giver of presents?  Why here again put the fault on others as
if they were robbing us, while we ourselves do bear the fault in leaving
the others unrobbed?  The poor are to blame for there being rich men.

Universally, no one grows indignant at _his_, but at _alien_ property.
They do not in truth attack property, but the alienation of property.
They want to be able to call _more_, not less, _theirs_; they want to
call everything _theirs_.  They are fighting, therefore, against
_alienness_, or, to form a word similar to property, against alienty.
And how do they help themselves therein?  Instead of transforming the
alien into own, they play impartial and ask only that all property be
left to a third party, _e.g._ human society.  They revindicate the alien
not in their own name but in a third party’s.  Now the “egoistic”
coloring is wiped off, and everything is so clean and — human!

Propertylessness or ragamuffinism, this then is the “essence of
Christianity,” as it is essence of all religiousness (_i.e._ godliness,
morality, humanity), and only announced itself most clearly, and, as
glad tidings, became a gospel capable of development, in the “absolute
religion.” We have before us the most striking development in the
present fight against property, a fight which is to bring “Man” to
victory and make propertylessness complete: victorious humanity is the
victory of —Christianity.  But the “Christianity exposed” thus is
feudalism completed.  the most all-embracing feudal system, _i.e._
perfect ragamuffinism.

Once more then, doubtless, a “revolution” against the feudal system?  —

Revolution and insurrection must not be looked upon as synonymous.  The
former consists in an overturning of conditions, of the established
condition or status, the State or society, and is accordingly a
_political_ or _social_ act; the latter has indeed for its unavoidable
consequence a transformation of circumstances, yet does not start from
it but from men’s discontent with themselves, is not an armed rising,
but a rising of individuals, a getting up, without regard to the
arrangements that spring from it.  The Revolution aimed at new
_arrangements_; insurrection leads us no longer to _let_ ourselves be
arranged, but to arrange ourselves, and sets no glittering hopes on
“institutions.” It is not a fight against the established, since, if it
prospers, the established collapses of itself; it is only a working
forth of me out of the established.  If I leave the established, it is
dead and passes into decay.  Now, as my object is not the overthrow of
an established order but my elevation above it, my purpose and deed are
not a political or social but (as directed toward myself and my ownness
alone) an _egoistic_ purpose and deed.

The revolution commands one to make _arrangements_, the insurrection
[_Empörung_] demands that he _rise or exalt himself_.[_sich auf-oder
empörzurichten_] What _constitution_ was to be chosen, this question
busied the revolutionary heads, and the whole political period foams
with constitutional fights and constitutional questions, as the social
talents too were uncommonly inventive in societary arrangements
(phalansteries etc.).  The insurgent [93] strives to become
constitutionless.

While, to get greater clearness, I am thinking up a comparison, the
founding of Christianity comes unexpectedly into my mind.  On the
liberal side it is noted as a bad point in the first Christians that
they preached obedience to the established heathen civil order, enjoined
recognition of the heathen authorities, and confidently delivered a
command, “Give to the emperor that which is the emperor’s.” Yet how much
disturbance arose at the same time against the Roman supremacy, how
mutinous did the Jews and even the Romans show themselves against their
own temporal government!  In short, how popular was “political
discontent!” Those Christians would hear nothing of it; would not side
with the “liberal tendencies.” The time was politically so agitated
that, as is said in the gospels, people thought they could not accuse
the founder of Christianity more successfully than if they arraigned him
for “political intrigue,” and yet the same gospels report that he was
precisely the one who took least part in these political doings.  But
why was he not a revolutionist, not a demagogue, as the Jews would
gladly have seen him?  Why was he not a liberal?  Because he expected no
salvation from a change of _conditions_, and this whole business was
indifferent to him.  He was not a revolutionist, like _e.g._ Caesar, but
an insurgent; not a State-overturner, but one who straightened _himself_
up.  That was why it was for him only a matter of “Be ye wise as
serpents,” which expresses the same sense as, in the special case, that
“Give to the emperor that which is the emperor’s”; for he was not
carrying on any liberal or political fight against the established
authorities, but wanted to walk his _own_ way, untroubled about, and
undisturbed by, these authorities.  Not less indifferent to him than the
government were its enemies, for neither understood what he wanted, and
he had only to keep them off from him with the wisdom of the serpent.
But, even though not a ringleader of popular mutiny, not a demagogue or
revolutionist, he (and every one of the ancient Christians) was so much
the more an _insurgent_, who lifted himself above everything that seemed
sublime to the government and its opponents, and absolved himself from
everything that they remained bound to, and who at the same time cut off
the sources of life of the whole heathen world, with which the
established State must wither away as a matter of course; precisely
because he put from him the upsetting of the established, he was its
deadly enemy and real annihilator; for he walled it in, confidently and
recklessly carrying up the building of _his_ temple over it, without
heeding the pains of the immured.

Now, as it happened to the heathen order of the world, will the
Christian order fare likewise?  A revolution certainly does not bring on
the end if an insurrection is not consummated first!

My intercourse with the world, what does it aim at?  I want to have the
enjoyment of it, therefore it must be my property, and therefore I want
to win it.  I do not want the liberty of men, nor their equality; I want
only _my_ power over them, I want to make them my property, _i.e.
material for enjoyment_.  And, if I do not succeed in that, well, then I
call even the power over life and death, which Church and State reserved
to themselves — mine.  Brand that officer’s widow who, in the flight in
Russia, after her leg has been shot away, takes the garter from it,
strangles her child therewith, and then bleeds to death alongside the
corpse — brand the memory of the — infanticide.  Who knows, if this
child had remained alive, how much it might have “been of use to the
world!” The mother murdered it because she wanted to die _satisfied_ and
at rest.  Perhaps this case still appeals to your sentimentality, and
you do not know how to read out of it anything further.  Be it so; I on
my part use it as an example for this, that _my_ satisfaction decides
about my relation to men, and that I do not renounce, from any access of
humility, even the power over life and death.

As regards “social duties” in general, another does not give me my
position toward others, therefore neither God nor humanity prescribes to
me my relation to men, but I give myself this position.  This is more
strikingly said thus: I have no _duty_ to others, as I have a duty even
to myself (_e.g._ that of self-preservation, and therefore not suicide)
only so long as I distinguish myself from myself (my immortal soul from
my earthly existence, etc.).

I no longer _humble_ myself before any power, and I recognize that all
powers are only my power, which I have to subject at once when they
threaten to become a power _against_ or _above_ me; each of them must be
only one of _my means_ to carry my point, as a hound is our power
against game, but is killed by us if it should fall upon us ourselves.
All powers that dominate me I then reduce to serving me.  The idols
exist through me; I need only refrain from creating them anew, then they
exist no longer: “higher powers” exist only through my exalting them and
abasing myself.

Consequently my relation to the world is this: I no longer do anything
for it “for God’s sake,” I do nothing “for man’s sake,” but what I do I
do “for my sake.” Thus alone does the world satisfy me, while it is
characteristic of the religious standpoint, in which I include the moral
and humane also, that from it everything remains a pious wish (_pium
desiderium_), _i.e._ an other-world matter, something unattained.  Thus
the general salvation of men, the moral world of a general love, eternal
peace, the cessation of egoism, etc.  “Nothing in this world is
perfect.” With this miserable phrase the good part from it, and take
flight into their closet to God, or into their proud
“self-consciousness.” But we remain in this “imperfect” world, because
even so we can use it for our — self-enjoyment.

My intercourse with the world consists in my enjoying it, and so
consuming it for my self-enjoyment.  _Intercourse_ is the _enjoyment of
the world_, and belongs to my — self-enjoyment.

*** III.  My Self-Enjoyment

We stand at the boundary of a period.  The world hitherto took thought
for nothing but the gain of life, took care for — _life_.  For whether
all activity is put on the stretch for the life of this world or of the
other, for the temporal or for the eternal, whether one hankers for
“daily bread” (“Give us our daily bread”) or for “holy bread” (“the true
bread from heaven” “the bread of God, that comes from heaven and _gives
life_ to the world”; “the bread of life,” John 6), whether one takes
care for “dear life” or for “life to eternity” — this does not change
the object of the strain and care, which in the one case as in the other
shows itself to be _life_.  Do the modern tendencies announce themselves
otherwise?  People now want nobody to be embarrassed for the most
indispensable necessaries of life, but want every one to feel secure as
to these; and on the other hand they teach that man has this life to
attend to and the real world to adapt himself to, without vain care for
another.

Let us take up the same thing from another side.  When one is anxious
only to live, he easily, in this solicitude, forgets the enjoyment of
life.  If his only concern is for life, and he thinks “if I only have my
dear life,” he does not apply his full strength to using, _i.  e._,
enjoying, life.  But how does one use life?  In using it up, like the
candle, which one uses in burning it up.  One uses life, and
consequently himself the living one, in _consuming_ it and himself.
_Enjoyment of life_ is using life up.

Now — we are in search of the _enjoyment_ of life!  And what did the
religious world do?  It went in search of life.  Wherein consists the
true life, the blessed life; etc.?  How is it to be attained?  What must
man do and become in order to become a truly living man?  How does he
fulfil this calling?  These and similar questions indicate that the
askers were still seeking for _themselves —_ to wit, themselves in the
true sense, in the sense of true living.  “What I am is foam and shadow;
what I shall be is my true self.” To chase after this self, to produce
it, to realize it, constitutes the hard task of mortals, who die only to
_rise again_, live only to die, live only to find the true life.

Not till I am certain of myself, and no longer seeking for myself, am I
really my property; I have myself, therefore I use and enjoy myself.  On
the other hand, I can never take comfort in myself as long as I think
that I have still to find my true self and that it must come to this,
that not I but Christ or some other spiritual, _i.e._ ghostly, self
(_e.g._ the true man, the essence of man, etc.) lives in me.

A vast interval separates the two views.  In the old I go toward myself,
in the new I start from myself; in the former I long for myself, in the
latter I have myself and do with myself as one does with any other
property — I enjoy myself at my pleasure.  I am no longer afraid for my
life, but “squander” it.

Henceforth, the question runs, not how one can acquire life, but how one
can squander, enjoy it; or, not how one is to produce the true self in
himself, but how one is to dissolve himself, to live himself out.

What else should the ideal be but the sought-for ever-distant self?  One
seeks for himself, consequently one doth not yet have himself; one
aspires toward what one _ought_ to be, consequently one _is_ not it.
One lives in _longing_ and has lived thousands of years in it, in
_hope_.  Living is quite another thing in — _enjoyment!_

Does this perchance apply only to the so-called pious?  No, it applies
to all who belong to the departing period of history, even to its men of
pleasure.  For them too the work-days were followed by a Sunday, and the
rush of the world by the dream of a better world, of a general happiness
of humanity; in short by an ideal.  But philosophers especially are
contrasted with the pious.  Now, have they been thinking of anything
else than the ideal, been planning for anything else than the absolute
self?  Longing and hope everywhere, and nothing but these.  For me, call
it romanticism.

If the _enjoyment of life_ is to triumph over the _longing for life_ or
hope of life, it must vanquish this in its double significance which
Schiller introduces in his “Ideal and Life”; it must crush spiritual and
secular poverty, exterminate the ideal and — the want of daily bread.
He who must expend his life to prolong life cannot enjoy it, and he who
is still seeking for his life does not have it and can as little enjoy
it: both are poor, but “blessed are the poor.”

Those who are hungering for the true life have no power over their
present life, but must apply it for the purpose of thereby gaining that
true life, and must sacrifice it entirely to this aspiration and this
task.  If in the case of those devotees who hope for a life in the other
world, and look upon that in this world as merely a preparation for it,
the tributariness of their earthly existence, which they put solely into
the service of the hoped-for heavenly existence, is pretty distinctly
apparent; one would yet go far wrong if one wanted to consider the most
rationalistic and enlightened as less self-sacrificing.  Oh, there is to
be found in the “true life” a much more comprehensive significance than
the “heavenly” is competent to express.  Now, is not — to introduce the
liberal concept of it at once — the “human” and “truly human” life the
true one?  And is every one already leading this truly human life from
the start, or must he first raise himself to it with hard toil?  Does he
already have it as his present life, or must he struggle for it as his
future life, which will become his part only when he “is no longer
tainted with any egoism”?  In this view life exists only to gain life,
and one lives only to make the essence of man alive in oneself, one
lives for the sake of this essence.  One has his life only in order to
procure by means of it the “true” life cleansed of all egoism.  Hence
one is afraid to make any use he likes of his life: it is to serve only
for the “right use.”

In short, one has a _calling in life_, a task in life; one has something
to realize and produce by his life, a something for which our life is
only means and implement, a something that is worth more than this life,
a something to which one _owes_ his life.  One has a God who asks a
_living sacrifice_.  Only the rudeness of human sacrifice has been lost
with time; human sacrifice itself has remained unabated, and criminals
hourly fall sacrifices to justice, and we “poor sinners” slay our own
selves as sacrifices for “the human essence,” the “idea of mankind,”
“humanity,” and whatever the idols or gods are called besides.

But, because we owe our life to that something, therefore —this is the
next point — we have no right to take it from us.

The conservative tendency of Christianity does not permit thinking of
death otherwise than with the purpose to take its sting from it and —
live on and preserve oneself nicely.  The Christian lets everything
happen and come upon him if he — the arch-Jew — can only haggle and
smuggle himself into heaven; he must not kill himself, he must only —
preserve himself and work at the “preparation of a future abode.”
Conservatism or “conquest of death” lies at his heart; “the last enemy
that is abolished is death.”[94] “Christ has taken the power from death
and brought life and _imperishable_ being to light by the gospel.”[95]
“Imperishableness,” stability.

The moral man wants the good, the right; and, if he takes to the means
that lead to this goal, really lead to it, then these means are not
_his_ means, but those of the good, right, etc., itself.  These means
are never immoral, because the good end itself mediates itself through
them: the end sanctifies the means.  They call this maxim jesuitical,
but it is “moral” through and through.  The moral man acts _in the
service_ of an end or an idea: he makes himself the _tool_ of the idea
of the good, as the pious man counts it his glory to be a tool or
instrument of God.  To await death is what the moral commandment
postulates as the good; to give it to oneself is immoral and bad:
_suicide_ finds no excuse before the judgment-seat of morality.  If the
religious man forbids it because “you have not given yourself life, but
God, who alone can also take it from you again” (as if, even taking in
this conception, God did not take it from me just as much when I kill
myself as when a tile from the roof, or a hostile bullet, fells me; for
he would have aroused the resolution of death in me too!), the moral man
forbids it because I owe my life to the fatherland, etc., “because I do
not know whether I may not yet accomplish good by my life.” Of course,
for in me good loses a tool, as God does an instrument.  If I am
immoral, the good is served in my _amendment_; if I am “ungodly,” God
has joy in my _penitence_.  Suicide, therefore, is ungodly as well as
nefarious.  If one whose standpoint is religiousness takes his own life,
he acts in forgetfulness of God; but, if the suicide’s standpoint is
morality, he acts in forgetfulness of duty, immorally.  People worried
themselves much with the question whether Emilia Galotti’s death can be
justified before morality (they take it as if it were suicide, which it
is too in substance).  That she is so infatuated with chastity, this
moral good, as to yield up even her life for it is certainly moral; but,
again, that she fears the weakness of her flesh is immoral.[96] Such
contradictions form the tragic conflict universally in the moral drama;
and one must think and feel morally to be able to take an interest in
it.

What holds good of piety and morality will necessarily apply to humanity
also, because one owes his life likewise to man, mankind or the species.
Only when I am under obligation to no being is the maintaining of life —
my affair.  “A leap from this bridge makes me free!”

But, if we owe the maintaining of our life to that being that we are to
make alive in ourselves, it is not less our duty not to lead this life
according to _our_ pleasure, but to shape it in conformity to that
being.  All my feeling, thinking, and willing, all my doing and
designing, belongs to — him.

What is in conformity to that being is to be inferred from his concept;
and how differently has this concept been conceived!  or how differently
has that being been imagined!  What demands the Supreme Being makes on
the Mohammedan; what different ones the Christian, again, thinks he
hears from him; how divergent, therefore, must the shaping of the lives
of the two turn out!  Only this do all hold fast, that the Supreme Being
is to _judge_ [Or, “regulate” (_richten_)] our life.

But the pious who have their judge in God, and in his word a book of
directions for their life, I everywhere pass by only reminiscently,
because they belong to a period of development that has been lived
through, and as petrifactions they may remain in their fixed place right
along; in our time it is no longer the pious, but the liberals, who have
the floor, and piety itself cannot keep from reddening its pale face
with liberal coloring.  But the liberals do not adore their judge in
God, and do not unfold their life by the directions of the divine word,
but regulate [_richten_] themselves by man: they want to be not “divine”
but “human,” and to live so.

Man is the liberal’s supreme being, man the _judge_ of his life,
humanity his _directions_, or catechism.  God is spirit, but man is the
“most perfect spirit,” the final result of the long chase after the
spirit or of the “searching in the depths of the Godhead,” _i.e._ in the
depths of the spirit.

Every one of your traits is to be human; you yourself are to be so from
top to toe, in the inward as in the outward; for humanity is your
calling.

Calling — destiny — task!  —

What one can become he does become.  A born poet may well be hindered by
the disfavor of circumstances from standing on the high level of his
time, and, after the great studies that are indispensable for this,
producing _consummate_ works of art; but he will make poetry, be he a
plowman or so lucky as to live at the court of Weimar.  A born musician
will make music, no matter whether on all instruments or only on an
oaten pipe.  A born philosophical head can give proof of itself as
university philosopher or as village philosopher.  Finally, a born dolt,
who, as is very well compatible with this, may at the same time be a
sly-boots, will (as probably every one who has visited schools is in a
position to exemplify to himself by many instances of fellow-scholars)
always remain a blockhead, let him have been drilled and trained into
the chief of a bureau, or let him serve that same chief as bootblack.
Nay, the born shallow-pates indisputably form the most numerous class of
men.  And why.  indeed, should not the same distinctions show themselves
in the human species that are unmistakable in every species of beasts?
The more gifted and the less gifted are to be found everywhere.

Only a few, however, are so imbecile that one could not get ideas into
them.  Hence, people usually consider all men capable of having
religion.  In a certain degree they may be trained to other ideas too,
_e.g._ to some musical intelligence, even some philosophy.  At this
point then the priesthood of religion, of morality, of culture, of
science, etc., takes its start, and the Communists, _e.g._ want to make
everything accessible to all by their “public school.” There is heard a
common assertion that this “great mass” cannot get along without
religion; the Communists broaden it into the proposition that not only
the “great mass,” but absolutely all, are called to everything.

Not enough that the great mass has been trained to religion, now it is
actually to have to occupy itself with “everything human.” Training is
growing ever more general and more comprehensive.

You poor beings who could live so happily if you might skip according to
your mind, you are to dance to the pipe of schoolmasters and
bear-leaders, in order to perform tricks that you yourselves would never
use yourselves for.  And you do not even kick out of the traces at last
against being always taken otherwise than you want to give yourselves.
No, you mechanically recite to yourselves the question that is recited
to you: “What am I called to?  What _ought_ I to do?” You need only ask
thus, to have yourselves _told_ what you ought to do and _ordered_ to do
it, to have your _calling_ marked out for you, or else to order
yourselves and impose it on yourselves according to the spirit’s
prescription.  Then in reference to the will the word is, I will to do
what I _ought_.

A man is “called” to nothing, and has no “calling,” no “destiny,” as
little as a plant or a beast has a “calling.” The flower does not follow
the calling to complete itself, but it spends all its forces to enjoy
and consume the world as well as it can — _i.e._ it sucks in as much of
the juices of the earth, as much air of the ether, as much light of the
sun, as it can get and lodge.  The bird lives up to no calling, but it
uses its forces as much as is practicable; it catches beetles and sings
to its heart’s delight.  But the forces of the flower and the bird are
slight in comparison to those of a man, and a man who applies his forces
will affect the world much more powerfully than flower and beast.  A
calling he has not, but he has forces that manifest themselves where
they are because their being consists solely in their manifestation, and
are as little able to abide inactive as life, which, if it “stood still”
only a second, would no longer be life.  Now, one might call out to the
man, “use your force.” Yet to this imperative would be given the meaning
that it was man’s task to use his force.  It is not so.  Rather, each
one really uses his force without first looking upon this as his
calling: at all times every one uses as much force as he possesses.  One
does say of a beaten man that he ought to have exerted his force more;
but one forgets that, if in the moment of succumbing he had the force to
exert his forces (_e.g._ bodily forces), he would not have failed to do
it: even if it was only the discouragement of a minute, this was yet a
—destitution of force, a minute long.  Forces may assuredly be sharpened
and redoubled, especially by hostile resistance or friendly assistance;
but where one misses their application one may be sure of their absence
too.  One can strike fire out of a stone, but without the blow none
comes out; in like manner a man too needs “impact.”

Now, for this reason that forces always of themselves show themselves
operative, the command to use them would be superfluous and senseless.
To use his forces is not man’s _calling_ and task, but is his _act_,
real and extant at all times.  Force is only a simpler word for
manifestation of force.

Now, as this rose is a true rose to begin with, this nightingale always
a true nightingale, so I am not for the first time a true man when I
fulfil my calling, live up to my destiny, but I am a “true man” from the
start.  My first babble is the token of the life of a “true man,” the
struggles of my life are the outpourings of his force, my last breath is
the last exhalation of the force of the “man.”

The true man does not lie in the future, an object of longing, but lies,
existent and real, in the present.  Whatever and whoever I may be,
joyous and suffering, a child or a graybeard, in confidence or doubt, in
sleep or in waking, I am it, I am the true man.

But, if I am Man, and have really found in myself him whom religious
humanity designated as the distant goal, then everything “truly human”
is also _my_ own.  What was ascribed to the idea of humanity belongs to
me.  That freedom of trade, _e.g._, which humanity has yet to attain —
and which, like an enchanting dream, people remove to humanity’s golden
future — I take by anticipation as my property, and carry it on for the
time in the form of smuggling.  There may indeed be but few smugglers
who have sufficient understanding to thus account to themselves for
their doings, but the instinct of egoism replaces their consciousness.
Above I have shown the same thing about freedom of the press.

Everything is my own, therefore I bring back to myself what wants to
withdraw from me; but above all I always bring myself back when I have
slipped away from myself to any tributariness.  But this too is not my
calling, but my natural act.

Enough, there is a mighty difference whether I make myself the
starting-point or the goal.  As the latter I do not have myself, am
consequently still alien to myself, am my _essence_, my “true essence,”
and this “true essence,” alien to me, will mock me as a spook of a
thousand different names.  Because I am not yet I, another (like God,
the true man, the truly pious man, the rational man, the freeman, etc.)
is I, my ego.

Still far from myself, I separate myself into two halves, of which one,
the one unattained and to be fulfilled, is the true one.  The one, the
untrue, must be brought as a sacrifice; to wit, the unspiritual one.
The other, the true, is to be the whole man; to wit, the spirit.  Then
it is said, “The spirit is man’s proper essence,” or, “man exists as man
only spiritually.” Now, there is a greedy rush to catch the spirit, as
if one would then have bagged _himself_; and so, in chasing after
himself, one loses sight of himself, whom he is.

And, as one stormily pursues his own self, the never-attained, so one
also despises shrewd people’s rule to take men as they are, and prefers
to take them as they should be; and, for this reason, hounds every one
on after his should-be self and “endeavors to make all into equally
entitled, equally respectable, equally moral or rational men.”[97]

Yes, “if men were what they _should_ be, _could_ be, if all men were
rational, all loved each other as brothers,” then it would be a
paradisiacal life.[98] — All right, men are as they should be, can be.
What should they be?  Surely not more than they can be!  And what can
they be?  Not more, again, than they — can, than they have the
competence, the force, to be.  But this they really are, because what
they are not they are _incapable_ of being; for to be capable means —
really to be.  One is not capable for anything that one really is not;
one is not capable of anything that one does not really do.  Could a man
blinded by cataracts see?  Oh, yes, if he had his cataracts successfully
removed.  But now he cannot see because he does not see.  Possibility
and reality always coincide.  One can do nothing that one does not, as
one does nothing that one cannot.

The singularity of this assertion vanishes when one reflects that the
words “it is possible that.” almost never contain another meaning than
“I can imagine that...,” _e.g._, It is possible for all men to live
rationally; _e.g._, I can imagine that all, etc.  Now — since my
thinking cannot, and accordingly does not, cause all men to live
rationally, but this must still be left to the men themselves — general
reason is for me only thinkable, a thinkableness, but as such in fact a
_reality_ that is called a possibility only in reference to what I _can_
not bring to pass, to wit, the rationality of others.  So far as depends
on you, all men might be rational, for you have nothing against it; nay,
so far as your thinking reaches, you perhaps cannot discover any
hindrance either, and accordingly nothing does stand in the way of the
thing in your thinking; it is thinkable to you.

As men are not all rational, though, it is probable that they — cannot
be so.

If something which one imagines to be easily possible is not, or does
not happen, then one may be assured that something stands in the way of
the thing, and that it is — impossible.  Our time has its art, science,
etc.; the art may be bad in all conscience; but may one say that we
deserved to have a better, and “could” have it if we only would?  We
have just as much art as we can have.  Our art of today is the _only art
possible_, and therefore real, at the time.

Even in the sense to which one might at last still reduce the word
“possible,” that it should mean “future,” it retains the full force of
the “real.” If one says, _e.g._, “It is possible that the sun will rise
tomorrow” — this means only, “for today tomorrow is the real future”;
for I suppose there is hardly need of the suggestion that a future is
real “future” only when it has not yet appeared.

Yet wherefore this dignifying of a word?  If the most prolific
misunderstanding of thousands of years were not in ambush behind it, if
this single concept of the little word “possible” were not haunted by
all the spooks of possessed men, its contemplation should trouble us
little here.

The thought, it was just now shown, rules the possessed world.  Well,
then, possibility is nothing but thinkableness, and innumerable
sacrifices have hitherto been made to hideous _thinkableness_.  It was
_thinkable_ that men might become rational; thinkable, that they might
know Christ; thinkable, that they might become moral and enthusiastic
for the good; thinkable, that they might all take refuge in the Church’s
lap; thinkable, that they might meditate, speak, and do, nothing
dangerous to the State; thinkable, that they _might_ be obedient
subjects; but, because it was thinkable, it was — so ran the inference —
possible, and further, because it was possible to men (right here lies
the deceptive point; because it is thinkable to me, it is possible to
_men_), therefore they ought to be so, it was their _calling_; and
finally — one is to take men only according to this calling, only as
_called_ men, “not as they are, but as they ought to be.”

And the further inference?  Man is not the individual, but man is a
_thought_, an _ideal_, to which the individual is related not even as
the child to the man, but as a chalk point to a point thought of, or as
a — finite creature to the eternal Creator, or, according to modern
views, as the specimen to the species.  Here then comes to light the
glorification of “humanity,” the “eternal, immortal,” for whose glory
(_in majorem humanitatis gloriam_) the individual must devote himself
and find his “immortal renown” in having done something for the “spirit
of humanity.”

Thus the _thinkers_ rule in the world as long as the age of priests or
of schoolmasters lasts, and what they think of is possible, but what is
possible must be realized.  They _think_ an ideal of man, which for the
time is real only in their thoughts; but they also think the possibility
of carrying it out, and there is no chance for dispute, the carrying out
is really — thinkable, it is an — idea.

But you and I, we may indeed be people of whom a Krummacher can _think_
that we might yet become good Christians; if, however, he wanted to
“labor with” us, we should soon make it palpable to him that our
Christianity is only _thinkable_, but in other respects _impossible_; if
he grinned on and on at us with his obtrusive _thoughts_, his “good
belief,” he would have to learn that we do not at all _need_ to become
what we do not like to become.

And so it goes on, far beyond the most pious of the pious.  “If all men
were rational, if all did right, if all were guided by philanthropy,
etc.”!  Reason, right, philanthropy, are put before the eyes of men as
their calling, as the goal of their aspiration.  And what does being
rational mean?  Giving oneself a hearing?[_vernünftig_, derived from
_vernehmen_, to hear] No, reason is a book full of laws, which are all
enacted against egoism.

History hitherto is the history of the _intellectual_ man.  After the
period of sensuality, history proper begins; _i.e._ the period of
intellectuality,[_Geistigkeit_] spirituality,[_Geistlichkeit_]
non-sensuality, supersensuality, nonsensicality.  Man now begins to want
to be and become _something_.  What?  Good, beautiful, true; more
precisely, moral, pious, agreeable, etc.  He wants to make of himself a
“proper man,” “something proper.” _Man_ is his goal, his ought, his
destiny, calling, task, his — _ideal_; he is to himself a future,
otherworldly he.  And _what_ makes a “proper fellow” of him?  Being
true, being good, being moral, etc.  Now he looks askance at every one
who does not recognize the same “what,” seek the same morality, have the
same faith, he chases out “separatists, heretics, sects,” etc.

No sheep, no dog, exerts itself to become a “proper sheep, a proper
dog”; no beast has its essence appear to it as a task, _i.e._ as a
concept that it has to realize.  It realizes itself in living itself
out, in dissolving itself, passing away.  It does not ask to be or to
become anything _other_ than it is.

Do I mean to advise you to be like the beasts?  That you ought to become
beasts is an exhortation which I certainly cannot give you, as that
would again be a task, an ideal (“How doth the little busy bee improve
each shining hour.  In works of labor or of skill I would be busy too,
for Satan finds some mischief still for idle hands to do”).  It would be
the same, too, as if one wished for the beasts that they should become
human beings.  Your nature is, once for all, a human one; you are human
natures, human beings.  But, just because you already are so, you do not
still need to become so.  Beasts too are “trained,” and a trained beast
executes many unnatural things.  But a trained dog is no better for
itself than a natural one, and has no profit from it, even if it is more
companionable for us.

Exertions to “form” all men into moral, rational, pious, human, “beings”
(_i.e._ training) were in vogue from of yore.  They are wrecked against
the indomitable quality of I, against own nature, against egoism.  Those
who are trained never attain their ideal, and only profess with their
_mouth_ the sublime principles, or make a _profession_, a profession of
faith.  In face of this profession they must in _life_ “acknowledge
themselves sinners altogether,” and they fall short of their ideal, are
“weak men,” and bear with them the consciousness of “human weakness.”

It is different if you do not chase after an _ideal_ as your “destiny,”
but dissolve yourself as time dissolves everything.  The dissolution is
not your “destiny,” because it is present time.

Yet the _culture_, the religiousness, of men has assuredly made them
free, but only free from one lord, to lead them to another.  I have
learned by religion to tame my appetite, I break the world’s resistance
by the cunning that is put in my hand by _science_; I even serve no man;
“I am no man’s lackey.” But then it comes.  You must obey God more than
man.  Just so I am indeed free from irrational determination by my
impulses.  but obedient to the master _Reason_.  I have gained
“spiritual freedom,” “freedom of the spirit.” But with that I have then
become subject to that very _spirit_.  The spirit gives me orders,
reason guides me, they are my leaders and commanders.  The “rational,”
the “servants of the spirit,” rule.  But, if _I_ am not flesh, I am in
truth not spirit either.  Freedom of the spirit is servitude of me,
because I am more than spirit or flesh.

Without doubt culture has made me _powerful_.  It has given me power
over all _motives_, over the impulses of my nature as well as over the
exactions and violences of the world.  I know, and have gained the force
for it by culture, that I need not let myself be coerced by any of my
appetites, pleasures, emotions, etc.; I am their — _master_; in like
manner I become, through the sciences and arts, the _master_ of the
refractory world, whom sea and earth obey, and to whom even the stars
must give an account of themselves.  The spirit has made me _master.  —_
But I have no power over the spirit itself.  From religion (culture) I
do learn the means for the “vanquishing of the world,” but not how I am
to subdue _God_ too and become master of him; for God “is the spirit.”
And this same spirit, of which I am unable to become master, may have
the most manifold shapes; he may be called God or National Spirit,
State, Family, Reason, also — Liberty, Humanity, Man.

_I_ receive with thanks what the centuries of culture have acquired for
me; I am not willing to throw away and give up anything of it: I have
not lived in vain.  The experience that I have _power_ over my nature,
and need not be the slave of my appetites, shall not be lost to me; the
experience that I can subdue the world by culture’s means is too dear-
bought for me to be able to forget it.  But I want still more.

People ask, what can man do?  What can he accomplish?  What goods
procure, and put down the highest of everything as a calling.  As if
everything were possible to _me!_

If one sees somebody going to ruin in a mania, a passion, etc.  (_e.g._
in the huckster-spirit, in jealousy), the desire is stirred to deliver
him out of this possession and to help him to “self-conquest.” “We want
to make a man of him!” That would be very fine if another possession
were not immediately put in the place of the earlier one.  But one frees
from the love of money him who is a thrall to it, only to deliver him
over to piety, humanity, or some principle else, and to transfer him to
a _fixed standpoint_ anew.

This transference from a narrow standpoint to a sublime one is declared
in the words that the sense must not be directed to the perishable, but
to the imperishable alone: not to the temporal, but to the eternal,
absolute, divine, purely human, etc.  — to the spiritual.

People very soon discerned that it was not indifferent what one set his
affections on, or what one occupied himself with; they recognized the
importance of the _object_.  An object exalted above the individuality
of things is the _essence_ of things; yes, the essence is alone the
thinkable in them.  it is for the _thinking_ man.  Therefore direct no
longer your _sense_ to the _things_, but your _thoughts_ to the
_essence_.  “Blessed are they who see not, and yet believe”; _i.  e._,
blessed are the _thinkers_, for they have to do with the invisible and
believe in it.  Yet even an object of thought, that constituted an
essential point of contention centuries long, comes at last to the point
of being “No longer worth speaking of.” This was discerned, but
nevertheless people always kept before their eyes again a self-valid
importance of the object, an absolute value of it, as if the doll were
not the most important thing to the child, the Koran to the Turk.  As
long as I am not the sole important thing to myself, it is indifferent
of what object I “make much,” and only my greater or lesser
_delinquency_ against it is of value.  The degree of my attachment and
devotion marks the standpoint of my liability to service, the degree of
my sinning shows the measure of my ownness.

But finally, and in general, one must know how to “put everything out of
his mind,” if only so as to be able to — go to sleep.  Nothing may
occupy us with which _we_ do not occupy ourselves: the victim of
ambition cannot run away from his ambitious plans, nor the God-fearing
man from the thought of God; infatuation and possessedness coincide.

To want to realize his essence or live comfortably to his concept (which
with believers in God signifies as much as to be “pious,” and with
believers in humanity means living “humanly”) is what only the sensual
and sinful man can propose to himself, the man so long as he has the
anxious choice between happiness of sense and peace of soul, so long as
he is a “poor sinner.” The Christian is nothing but a sensual man who,
knowing of the sacred and being conscious that he violates it, sees in
himself a poor sinner: sensualness, recognized as “sinfulness,” is
Christian consciousness, is the Christian himself.  And if “sin” and
“sinfulness” are now no longer taken into the mouths of moderns, but,
instead of that, “egoism,” “self-seeking,” “selfishness,” etc., engage
them; if the devil has been translated into the “un-man” or “egoistic
man” — is the Christian less present then than before?  Is not the old
discord between good and evil — is not a judge over us, man — is not a
calling, the calling to make oneself man — left?  If they no longer name
it calling, but “task” or, very likely, “duty,” the change of name is
quite correct, because “man” is not, like God, a personal being that can
“call”; but outside the name the thing remains as of old.


	* * *

Every one has a relation to objects, and more, every one is differently
related to them.  Let us choose as an example that book to which
millions of men had a relation for two thousand years, the Bible.  What
is it, what was it, to each?  Absolutely, only what he _made out of it!_
For him who makes to himself nothing at all out of it, it is nothing at
all; for him who uses it as an amulet, it has solely the value, the
significance, of a means of sorcery; for him who, like children, plays
with it, it is nothing but a plaything, etc.

Now, Christianity asks that it shall _be the same for all_: say the
sacred book or the “sacred Scriptures.” This means as much as that the
Christian’s view shall also be that of other men, and that no one may be
otherwise related to that object.  And with this the ownness of the
relation is destroyed, and one mind, one disposition, is fixed as the
“true”, the “only true” one.  In the limitation of the freedom to make
of the Bible what I will, the freedom of making in general is limited;
and the coercion of a view or a judgment is put in its place.  He who
should pass the judgment that the Bible was a long error of mankind
would judge — _criminally_.

In fact, the child who tears it to pieces or plays with it, the Inca
Atahualpa who lays his ear to it and throws it away contemptuously when
it remains dumb, judges just as correctly about the Bible as the priest
who praises in it the “Word of God,” or the critic who calls it a job of
men’s hands.  For how we toss things about is the affair of our
_option_, our _free will_: we use them according to our _heart’s
pleasure_, or, more clearly, we use them just as we _can_.  Why, what do
the parsons scream about when they see how Hegel and the speculative
theologians make speculative thoughts out of the contents of the Bible?
Precisely this, that they deal with it according to their heart’s
pleasure, or “proceed arbitrarily with it.”

But, because we all show ourselves arbitrary in the handling of objects,
_i.e._ do with them as we _like_ best, at our _liking_ (the philosopher
likes nothing so well as when he can trace out an “idea” in everything,
as the God-fearing man likes to make God his friend by everything, and
so, _e.g._, by keeping the Bible sacred), therefore we nowhere meet such
grievous arbitrariness, such a frightful tendency to violence, such
stupid coercion, as in this very domain of our — _own free will_.  If
_we_ proceed arbitrarily in taking the sacred objects thus or so, how is
it then that we want to take it ill of the parson-spirits if they take
us just as arbitrarily, _in their fashion_, and esteem us worthy of the
heretic’s fire or of another punishment, perhaps of the — censorship?

What a man is, he makes out of things; “as you look at the world, so it
looks at you again.” Then the wise advice makes itself heard again at
once, You must only look at it “rightly, unbiasedly,” etc.  As if the
child did not look at the Bible “rightly and unbiasedly” when it makes
it a plaything.  That shrewd precept is given us, _e.g._ by Feuerbach.
One does look at things rightly when one makes of them what one _will_
(by things objects in general are here understood, _e.g._ God, our
fellowmen, a sweetheart, a book, a beast, etc.).  And therefore the
things and the looking at them are not first, but I am, my will is.  One
_will_ brings thoughts out of the things, _will_ discover reason in the
world, _will_ have sacredness in it: therefore one shall find them.
“Seek and ye shall find.” _What_ I will seek, I determine: I want,
_e.g._, to get edification from the Bible; it is to be found; I want to
read and test the Bible thoroughly; my outcome will be a thorough
instruction and criticism — to the extent of my powers.  I elect for
myself what I have a fancy for, and in electing I show myself —
arbitrary.

Connected with this is the discernment that every judgment which I pass
upon an object is the _creature_ of my will; and that discernment again
leads me to not losing myself in the _creature_, the judgment, but
remaining the _creator_, the judge, who is ever creating anew.  All
predicates of objects are my statements, my judgments, my — creatures.
If they want to tear themselves loose from me and be something for
themselves, or actually overawe me, then I have nothing more pressing to
do than to take them back into their nothing, into me the creator.  God,
Christ, Trinity, morality, the good, etc., are such creatures, of which
I must not merely allow myself to say that they are truths, but also
that they are deceptions.  As I once willed and decreed their existence,
so I want to have license to will their non- existence too; I must not
let them grow over my head, must not have the weakness to let them
become something “absolute,” whereby they would be eternalized and
withdrawn from my power and decision.  With that I should fall a prey to
the _principle of stability_, the proper life-principle of religion,
which concerns itself with creating “sanctuaries that must not be
touched,” “eternal truths” — in short, that which shall be “sacred” —
and depriving you of what is _yours_.

The object makes us into possessed men in its sacred form just as in its
profane, as a supersensuous object, just as it does as a sensuous one.
The appetite or mania refers to both, and avarice and longing for heaven
stand on a level.  When the rationalists wanted to win people for the
sensuous world, Lavater preached the longing for the invisible.  The one
party wanted to call forth _emotion_, the other _motion_, activity.

The conception of objects is altogether diverse, even as God, Christ,
the world, were and are conceived of in the most manifold wise.  In this
every one is a “dissenter,” and after bloody combats so much has at last
been attained, that opposite views about one and the same object are no
longer condemned as heresies worthy of death.  The “dissenters”
reconcile themselves to each other.  But why should I only dissent
(think otherwise) about a thing?  Why not push the thinking otherwise to
its last extremity, that of no longer having any regard at all for the
thing, and therefore thinking its nothingness, crushing it?  Then the
_conception_ itself has an end, because there is no longer anything to
conceive of.  Why am I to say, let us suppose, “God is not Allah, not
Brahma, not Jehovah, but — God”; but not, “God is nothing but a
deception”?  Why do people brand me if I am an “atheist”?  Because they
put the creature above the creator (“They honor and serve the creature
more than the Creator”[99]) and require a _ruling object_, that the
subject may be right _submissive_.  I am to bend _beneath_ the absolute,
I _ought_ to.

By the “realm of thoughts” Christianity has completed itself; the
thought is that inwardness in which all the world’s lights go out, all
existence becomes existenceless, the inward.  man (the heart, the head)
is all in all.  This realm of thoughts awaits its deliverance, awaits,
like the Sphinx, Oedipus’s key- word to the riddle, that it may enter in
at last to its death.  I am the annihilator of its continuance, for in
the creator’s realm it no longer forms a realm of its own, not a State
in the State, but a creature of my creative — thoughtlessness.  Only
together and at the same time with the benumbed _thinking_ world can the
world of Christians, Christianity and religion itself, come to its
downfall; only when thoughts run out are there no more believers.  To
the thinker his thinking is a “sublime labor, a sacred activity,” and it
rests on a firm _faith_, the faith in truth.  At first praying is a
sacred activity, then this sacred “devotion” passes over into a rational
and reasoning “thinking,” which, however, likewise retains in the
“sacred truth” its underangeable basis of faith, and is only a marvelous
machine that the spirit of truth winds up for its service.  Free
thinking and free science busy _me —_ for it is not I that am free, not
_I_ that busy myself, but thinking is free and busies me — with heaven
and the heavenly or “divine”; _e.g._, properly, with the world and the
worldly, not this world but “another” world; it is only the reversing
and deranging of the world, a busying with the _essence_ of the world,
therefore a _derangement_.  The thinker is blind to the immediateness of
things, and incapable of mastering them: he does not eat, does not
drink, does not enjoy; for the eater and drinker is never the thinker,
nay, the latter forgets eating and drinking, his getting on in life, the
cares of nourishment, etc., over his thinking; he forgets it as the
praying man too forgets it.  This is why he appears to the forceful son
of nature as a queer Dick, a _fool —_ even if he does look upon him as
holy, just as lunatics appeared so to the ancients.  Free thinking is
lunacy, because it is _pure movement of the inwardness_, of the merely
_inward man_, which guides and regulates the rest of the man.  The
shaman and the speculative philosopher mark the bottom and top rounds on
the ladder of the _inward_ man, the — Mongol.  Shaman and philosopher
fight with ghosts, demons, _spirits_, gods.

Totally different from this _free_ thinking is _own_ thinking, _my_
thinking, a thinking which does not guide me, but is guided, continued,
or broken off, by me at my pleasure.  The distinction of this own
thinking from free thinking is similar to that of own sensuality, which
I satisfy at pleasure, from free, unruly sensuality to which I succumb.

Feuerbach, in the _Principles of the Philosophy of the Future_, is
always harping upon _being_.  In this he too, with all his antagonism to
Hegel and the absolute philosophy, is stuck fast in abstraction; for
“being” is abstraction, as is even “the I.” Only _I am_ not abstraction
alone: _I am_ all in all, consequently even abstraction or nothing; I am
all and nothing; I am not a mere thought, but at the same time I am full
of thoughts, a thought-world.  Hegel condemns the own, mine,[_das
Meinige_] — “opinion.” [_die —“Meinung_”] “Absolute thinking” is that
which forgets that it is _my_ thinking, that _I_ think, and that it
exists only through _me_.  But I, as I, swallow up again what is mine,
am its master; it is only my _opinion_, which I can at any moment
_change_, _i.e._ annihilate, take back into myself, and consume.
Feuerbach wants to smite Hegel’s “absolute thinking” with _unconquered
being_.  But in me being is as much conquered as thinking is.  It is
_my_ being, as the other is _my_ thinking.

With this, of course, Feuerbach does not get further than to the proof,
trivial in itself, that I require the _senses_ for everything, or that I
cannot entirely do without these organs.  Certainly I cannot think if I
do not exist sensuously.  But for thinking as well as for feeling, and
so for the abstract as well as for the sensuous, I need above all things
_myself_, this quite particular myself, this _unique_ myself.  If I were
not this one, _e.g._ Hegel, I should not look at the world as I do look
at it, I should not pick out of it that philosophical system which just
I as Hegel do, etc.  I should indeed have senses, as do other people
too, but I should not utilize them as I do.

Thus the reproach is brought up against Hegel by Feuerbach[100] that he
misuses language, understanding by many words something else than what
natural consciousness takes them for; and yet he too commits the same
fault when he gives the “sensuous” a sense of unusual eminence.  Thus it
is said, p.  69, “the sensuous is not the profane, the destitute of
thought, the obvious, that which is understood of itself.” But, if it is
the sacred, the full of thought, the recondite, that which can be
understood only through mediation — well, then it is no longer what
people call the sensuous.  The sensuous is only that which exists for
_the senses_; what, on the other hand, is enjoyable only to those who
enjoy with _more_ than the senses, who go beyond sense-enjoyment or
sense-reception, is at most mediated or introduced by the senses, _i.
e._, the senses constitute a _condition_ for obtaining it, but it is no
longer anything sensuous.  The sensuous, whatever it may be, when taken
up into me becomes something non-sensuous, which, however, may again
have sensuous effects, _e.g._ as by the stirring of my emotions and my
blood.

It is well that Feuerbach brings sensuousness to honor, but the only
thing he is able to do with it is to clothe the materialism of his “new
philosophy” with what had hitherto been the property of idealism, the
“absolute philosophy.” As little as people let it be talked into them
that one can live on the “spiritual” alone without bread, so little will
they believe his word that as a sensuous being one is already
everything, and so spiritual, full of thoughts, etc.

Nothing at all is justified by _being_.  What is thought of _is_ as well
as what is not thought of; the stone in the street _is_, and my notion
of it _is_ too.  Both are only in different _spaces_, the former in airy
space, the latter in my head, in _me_; for I am space like the street.

The professionals, the privileged, brook no freedom of thought, _i.e._
no thoughts that do not come from the “Giver of all good,” be he called
God, pope, church, or whatever else.  If anybody has such illegitimate
thoughts, he must whisper them into his confessor’s ear, and have
himself chastised by him till the slave-whip becomes unendurable to the
free thoughts.  In other ways too the professional spirit takes care
that free thoughts shall not come at all: first and foremost, by a wise
education.  He on whom the principles of morality have been duly
inculcated never becomes free again from moralizing thoughts, and
robbery, perjury, overreaching, etc., remain to him fixed ideas against
which no freedom of thought protects him.  He has his thoughts “from
above,” and gets no further.

It is different with the holders of concessions or patents.  Every one
must be able to have and form thoughts as he will.  If he has the
patent, or the concession, of a capacity to think, he needs no special
_privilege_.  But, as “all men are rational,” it is free to every one to
put into his head any thoughts whatever, and, to the extent of the
patent of his natural endowment, to have a greater or less wealth of
thoughts.  Now one hears the admonitions that one “is to honor all
opinions and convictions,” that “every conviction is authorized,” that
one must be “tolerant to the views of others,” etc.

But “your thoughts are not my thoughts, and your ways are not my ways.”
Or rather, I mean the reverse: Your thoughts are _my_ thoughts, which I
dispose of as I will, and which I strike down unmercifully; they are my
property, which I annihilate as I list.  I do not wait for authorization
from you first, to decompose and blow away your thoughts.  It does not
matter to me that you call these thoughts yours too, they remain mine
nevertheless, and how I will proceed with them is _my affair_, not a
usurpation.  It may please me to leave you in your thoughts; then I keep
still.  Do you believe thoughts fly around free like birds, so that
every one may get himself some which he may then make good against me as
his inviolable property?  What is flying around is all — _mine_.

Do you believe you have your thoughts for yourselves and need answer to
no one for them, or as you do also say, you have to give an account of
them to God only?  No, your great and small thoughts belong to me, and I
handle them at my pleasure.

The thought is my _own_ only when I have no misgiving about bringing it
in danger of death every moment, when I do not have to fear its loss as
a _loss for me_, a loss of me.  The thought is my own only when I can
indeed subjugate it, but it never can subjugate me, never fanaticizes
me, makes me the tool of its realization.

So freedom of thought exists when I can have all possible thoughts; but
the thoughts become property only by not being able to become masters.
In the time of freedom of thought, thoughts (ideas) _rule_; but, if I
attain to property in thought, they stand as my creatures.

If the hierarchy had not so penetrated men to the innermost as to take
from them all courage to pursue free thoughts, _e.g._, thoughts perhaps
displeasing to God, one would have to consider freedom of thought just
as empty a word as, say, a freedom of digestion.

According to the professionals’ opinion, the thought is _given_ to me;
according to the freethinkers’, I _seek_ the thought.  There the _truth_
is already found and extant, only I must — receive it from its Giver by
grace; here the truth is to be sought and is my goal, lying in the
future, toward which I have to run.

In both cases the truth (the true thought) lies outside me, and I aspire
to _get_ it, be it by presentation (grace), be it by earning (merit of
my own).  Therefore, (1) The truth is a _privilege_; (2) No, the way to
it is patent to all, and neither the Bible nor the holy fathers nor the
church nor any one else is in possession of the truth; but one can come
into possession of it by — speculating.

Both, one sees, are _property-less_ in relation to the truth: they have
it either as a _fief_ (for the “holy father,” _e.g._ is not a unique
person; as unique he is this Sixtus, Clement, but he does not have the
truth as Sixtus, Clement, but as “holy father,” _i.e._ as a spirit) or
as an _ideal_.  As a fief, it is only for a few (the privileged); as an
ideal, for _all_ (the patentees).

Freedom of thought, then, has the meaning that we do indeed all walk in
the dark and in the paths of error, but every one can on this path
approach _the truth_ and is accordingly on the right path (“All roads
lead to Rome, to the world’s end, etc.”).  Hence freedom of thought
means this much, that the true thought is not my _own_; for, if it were
this, how should people want to shut me off from it?

Thinking has become entirely free, and has laid down a lot of truths
which I must accommodate myself to.  It seeks to complete itself into a
_system_ and to bring itself to an absolute “constitution.” In the State
_e.g._ it seeks for the idea, say, till it has brought out the “rational
State,” in which I am then obliged to be suited; in man (anthropology),
till it “has found man.”

The thinker is distinguished from the believer only by believing much
more than the latter, who on his part thinks of much less as signified
by his faith (creed).  The thinker has a thousand tenets of faith where
the believer gets along with few; but the former brings _coherence_ into
his tenets, and takes the coherence in turn for the scale to estimate
their worth by.  If one or the other does not fit into his budget, he
throws it out.

The thinkers run parallel to the believers in their pronouncements.
Instead of “If it is from God you will not root it out,” the word is “If
it is from the _truth_, is true, etc.”; instead of “Give God the glory”
— “Give truth the glory.” But it is very much the same to me whether God
or the truth wins; first and foremost I want to win.

Aside from this, how is an “unlimited freedom” to be thinkable inside of
the State or society?  The State may well protect one against another,
but yet it must not let itself be endangered by an unmeasured freedom, a
so-called unbridledness.  Thus in “freedom of instruction” the _State_
declares only this — that it is suited with every one who instructs as
the State (or, speaking more comprehensibly, the political power) would
have it.  The point for the competitors is this “as the State would have
it.” If the clergy, _e.g._, does not will as the State does, then it
itself excludes itself from _competition_ (_vid._ France).  The limit
that is necessarily drawn in the State for any and all competition is
called “the oversight and superintendence of the State.” In bidding
freedom of instruction keep within the due bounds, the State at the same
time fixes the scope of freedom of thought; because, as a rule, people
do not think farther than their teachers have thought.

Hear Minister Guizot: “The great difficulty of today is the _guiding and
dominating of the mind_.  Formerly the church fulfilled this mission;
now it is not adequate to it.  It is from the university that this great
service must be expected, and the university will not fail to perform
it.  We, the _government_, have the duty of supporting it therein.  The
charter calls for the freedom of thought and that of conscience.”[101]
So, in favor of freedom of thought and conscience, the minister demands
“the guiding and dominating of the mind.”

Catholicism haled the examinee before the forum of ecclesiasticism,
Protestantism before that of biblical Christianity.  It would be but
little bettered if one haled him before that of reason, as Ruge, _e.g._,
wants to.  [102] Whether the church, the Bible, or reason (to which,
moreover, Luther and Huss already appealed) is the _sacred authority_
makes no difference in essentials.

The “question of our time” does not become soluble even when one puts it
thus: Is anything general authorized, or only the individual?  Is the
generality (_e.g._ State, law, custom, morality, etc.) authorized, or
individuality?  It becomes soluble for the first time when one no longer
asks after an “authorization” at all, and does not carry on a mere fight
against “privileges.” — A “rational” freedom of teaching, which
recognizes only the conscience of reason,”[103] does not bring us to the
goal; we require an _egoistic_ freedom of teaching rather, a freedom of
teaching for all ownness, wherein _I_ become audible and can announce
myself unchecked.  That I make myself _“audible”_[_vernehmbar_], this
alone is “reason,”[_Vernunft_] be I ever so irrational; in my making
myself heard, and so hearing myself, others as well as I myself enjoy
me, and at the same time consume me.

What would be gained if, as formerly the orthodox I, the loyal I, the
moral I, etc., was free, now the rational I should become free?  Would
this be the freedom of me?

If I am free as “rational I,” then the rational in me, or reason, is
free; and this freedom of reason, or freedom of the thought, was the
ideal of the Christian world from of old.  They wanted to make thinking
— and, as aforesaid, faith is also thinking, as thinking is faith —
free; the thinkers, _i.e._ the believers as well as the rational, were
to be free; for the rest freedom was impossible.  But the freedom of
thinkers is the “freedom of the children of God,” and at the same time
the most merciless —hierarchy or dominion of the thought; for _I_
succumb to the thought.  If thoughts are free, I am their slave; I have
no power over them, and am dominated by them.  But I want to have the
thought, want to be full of thoughts, but at the same time I want to be
thoughtless, and, instead of freedom of thought, I preserve for myself
thoughtlessness.

If the point is to have myself understood and to make communications,
then assuredly I can make use only of _human_ means, which are at my
command because I am at the same time man.  And really I have thoughts
only as _man_; as I, I am at the same time _thoughtless._[Literally,
“thought-rid”] He who cannot get rid of a thought is so far _only_ man,
is a thrall of _language_, this human institution, this treasury of
_human_ thoughts.  Language or “the word” tyrannizes hardest over us,
because it brings up against us a whole army of _fixed ideas_.  Just
observe yourself in the act of reflection, right now, and you will find
how you make progress only by becoming thoughtless and speechless every
moment.  You are not thoughtless and speechless merely in (say) sleep,
but even in the deepest reflection; yes, precisely then most so.  And
only by this thoughtlessness, this unrecognized “freedom of thought” or
freedom from the thought, are you your own.  Only from it do you arrive
at putting language to use as your _property_.

If thinking is not _my_ thinking, it is merely a spun-out thought; it is
slave work, or the work of a “servant obeying at the word.” For not a
thought, but I, am the beginning for my thinking, and therefore I am its
goal too, even as its whole course is only a course of my
self-enjoyment; for absolute or free thinking, on the other hand,
thinking itself is the beginning, and it plagues itself with propounding
this beginning as the extremest “abstraction” (_e.g._ as being).  This
very abstraction, or this thought, is then spun out further.

Absolute thinking is the affair of the human spirit, and this is a holy
spirit.  Hence this thinking is an affair of the parsons, who have “a
sense for it,” a sense for the “highest interests of mankind,” for “the
spirit.”

To the believer, truths are a _settled_ thing, a fact; to the
freethinker, a thing that is still to be _settled_.  Be absolute
thinking ever so unbelieving, its incredulity has its limits, and there
does remain a belief in the truth, in the spirit, in the idea and its
final victory: this thinking does not sin against the holy spirit.  But
all thinking that does not sin against the holy spirit is belief in
spirits or ghosts.

I can as little renounce thinking as feeling, the spirit’s activity as
little as the activity of the senses.  As feeling is our sense for
things, so thinking is our sense for essences (thoughts).  Essences have
their existence in everything sensuous, especially in the word.  The
power of words follows that of things: first one is coerced by the rod,
afterward by conviction.  The might of things overcomes our courage, our
spirit; against the power of a conviction, and so of the word, even the
rack and the sword lose their overpoweringness and force.  The men of
conviction are the priestly men, who resist every enticement of Satan.

Christianity took away from the things of this world only their
irresistibleness, made us independent of them.  In like manner I raise
myself above truths and their power: as I am supersensual, so I am
supertrue.  _Before me_ truths are as common and as indifferent as
things; they do not carry me away, and do not inspire me with
enthusiasm.  There exists not even one truth, not right, not freedom,
humanity, etc., that has stability before me, and to which I subject
myself.  They are _words_, nothing but words, as to the Christian
nothing but “vain things.” In words and truths (every word is a truth,
as Hegel asserts that one cannot _tell_ a lie) there is no salvation for
me, as little as there is for the Christian in things and vanities.  As
the riches of this world do not make me happy, so neither do its truths.
It is now no longer Satan, but the spirit, that plays the story of the
temptation; and he does not seduce by the things of this world, but by
its thoughts, by the “glitter of the idea.”

Along with worldly goods, all sacred goods too must be put away as no
longer valuable.

Truths are phrases, ways of speaking, words (lógos); brought into
connection, or into an articulate series, they form logic, science,
philosophy.

For thinking and speaking I need truths and words, as I do foods for
eating; without them I cannot think nor speak.  Truths are men’s
thoughts, set down in words and therefore just as extant as other
things, although extant only for the mind or for thinking.  They are
human institutions and human creatures, and, even if they are given out
for divine revelations, there still remains in them the quality of
alienness for me; yes, as my own creatures they are already alienated
from me after the act of creation.

The Christian man is the man with faith in thinking, who believes in the
supreme dominion of thoughts and wants to bring thoughts, so-called
“principles,” to dominion.  Many a one does indeed test the thoughts,
and chooses none of them for his master without criticism, but in this
he is like the dog who sniffs at people to smell out “his master”; he is
always aiming at the _ruling_ thought.  The Christian may reform and
revolt an infinite deal, may demolish the ruling concepts of centuries;
he will always aspire to a new “principle” or new master again, always
set up a higher or “deeper” truth again, always call forth a cult again,
always proclaim a spirit called to dominion, lay down a _law_ for all.

If there is even one truth only to which man has to devote his life and
his powers because he is man, then he is subjected to a rule, dominion,
law; he is a servingman.  It is supposed that, _e.g._ man, humanity,
liberty, etc., are such truths.

On the other hand, one can say thus: Whether you will further occupy
yourself with thinking depends on you; only know that, _if_ in your
thinking you would like to make out anything worthy of notice, many hard
problems are to be solved, without vanquishing which you cannot get far.
There exists, therefore, no duty and no calling for you to meddle with
thoughts (ideas, truths); but, if you will do so, you will do well to
utilize what the forces of others have already achieved toward clearing
up these difficult subjects.

Thus, therefore, he who will think does assuredly have a task, which
_he_ consciously or unconsciously sets for himself in willing that; but
no one has the task of thinking or of believing.  In the former case it
may be said, “You do not go far enough, you have a narrow and biased
interest, you do not go to the bottom of the thing; in short, you do not
completely subdue it.  But, on the other hand, however far you may come
at any time, you are still always at the end, you have no call to step
farther, and you can have it as you will or as you are able.  It stands
with this as with any other piece of work, which you can give up when
the humor for it wears off.  Just so, if you can no longer _believe_ a
thing, you do not have to force yourself into faith or to busy yourself
lastingly as if with a sacred truth of the faith, as theologians or
philosophers do, but you can tranquilly draw back your interest from it
and let it run.  Priestly spirits will indeed expound this your lack of
interest as “laziness, thoughtlessness, obduracy, self-deception,” etc.
But do you just let the trumpery lie, notwithstanding.  No
thing,[_Sache_] no so-called “highest interest of mankind,” no “sacred
cause,”[_Sache_] is worth your serving it, and occupying yourself with
it for _its sake_; you may seek its worth in this alone, whether it is
worth anything to _you_ for your sake.  Become like children, the
biblical saying admonishes us.  But children have no sacred interest and
know nothing of a “good cause.” They know all the more accurately what
they have a fancy for; and they think over, to the best of their powers,
how they are to arrive at it.

Thinking will as little cease as feeling.  But the power of thoughts and
ideas, the dominion of theories and principles, the sovereignty of the
spirit, in short the — _hierarchy_, lasts as long as the parsons,
_i.e._, theologians, philosophers, statesmen, philistines, liberals,
schoolmasters, servants, parents, children, married couples, Proudhon,
George Sand, Bluntschli, etc., etc., have the floor; the hierarchy will
endure as long as people believe in, think of, or even criticize,
principles; for even the most inexorable criticism, which undermines all
current principles, still does finally _believe in the principle_.

Every one criticises, but the criterion is different.  People run after
the “right” criterion.  The right criterion is the first presupposition.
The critic starts from a proposition, a truth, a belief.  This is not a
creation of the critic, but of the dogmatist; nay, commonly it is
actually taken up out of the culture of the time without further
ceremony, like _e.g._ “liberty,” “humanity,” etc.  The critic has not
“discovered man,” but this truth has been established as “man” by the
dogmatist, and the critic (who, besides, may be the same person with
him) believes in this truth, this article of faith.  In this faith, and
possessed by this faith, he criticises.

The secret of criticism is some “truth” or other: this remains its
energizing mystery.

But I distinguish between _servile_ and _own_ criticism.  If I criticize
under the presupposition of a supreme being, my criticism _serves_ the
being and is carried on for its sake: if _e.g._ I am possessed by the
belief in a “free State,” then everything that has a bearing on it I
criticize from the standpoint of whether it is suitable to this State,
for I _love_ this State; if I criticize as a pious man, then for me
everything falls into the classes of divine and diabolical, and before
my criticism nature consists of traces of God or traces of the devil
(hence names like Godsgift, Godmount, the Devil’s Pulpit), men of
believers and unbelievers; if I criticize while believing in man as the
“true essence,” then for me everything falls primarily into the classes
of man and the un-man, etc.

Criticism has to this day remained a work of love: for at all times we
exercised it for the love of some being.  All servile criticism is a
product of love, a possessedness, and proceeds according to that New
Testament precept, “Test everything and hold fast the _good.”_[104] “The
good” is the touchstone, the criterion.  The good, returning under a
thousand names and forms, remained always the presupposition, remained
the dogmatic fixed point for this criticism, remained the — fixed idea.

The critic, in setting to work, impartially presupposes the “truth,” and
seeks for the truth in the belief that it is to be found.  He wants to
ascertain the true, and has in it that very “good.”

Presuppose means nothing else than put a _thought_ in front, or think
something before everything else and think the rest from the
starting-point of this that has _been thought_, _i.e._ measure and
criticize it by this.  In other words, this is as much as to say that
thinking is to begin with something already thought.  If thinking began
at all, instead of being begun, if thinking were a subject, an acting
personality of its own, as even the plant is such, then indeed there
would be no abandoning the principle that thinking must begin with
itself.  But it is just the personification of thinking that brings to
pass those innumerable errors.  In the Hegelian system they always talk
as if thinking or “the thinking spirit” (_i.e._ personified thinking,
thinking as a ghost) thought and acted; in critical liberalism it is
always said that “criticism” does this and that, or else that “self-
consciousness” finds this and that.  But, if thinking ranks as the
personal actor, thinking itself must be presupposed; if criticism ranks
as such, a thought must likewise stand in front.  Thinking and criticism
could be active only starting from themselves, would have to be
themselves the presupposition of their activity, as without being they
could not be active.  But thinking, as a thing presupposed, is a fixed
thought, a _dogma_; thinking and criticism, therefore, can start only
from a _dogma, i.  e._ from a thought, a fixed idea, a presupposition.

With this we come back again to what was enunciated above, that
Christianity consists in the development of a world of thoughts, or that
it is the proper “freedom of thought,” the “free thought,” the “free
spirit.” The “true” criticism, which I called “servile,” is therefore
just as much “free” criticism, for it is not _my own_.

The case stands otherwise when what is yours is not made into something
that is of itself, not personified, not made independent as a “spirit”
to itself.  _Your_ thinking has for a presupposition not “thinking,” but
_you_.  But thus you do presuppose yourself after all?  Yes, but not for
myself, but for my thinking.  Before my thinking, there is — I.  From
this it follows that my thinking is not preceded by a _thought_, or that
my thinking is without a “presupposition.” For the presupposition which
I am for my thinking is not one _made by thinking_, not one _thought
of_, but it is _posited_ thinking _itself_, it is the _owner_ of the
thought, and proves only that thinking is nothing more than —
_property_, _i.  e._ that an “independent” thinking, a “thinking
spirit,” does not exist at all.

This reversal of the usual way of regarding things might so resemble an
empty playing with abstractions that even those against whom it is
directed would acquiesce in the harmless aspect I give it, if practical
consequences were not connected with it.

To bring these into a concise expression, the assertion now made is that
man is not the measure of all things, but I am this measure.  The
servile critic has before his eyes another being, an idea, which he
means to serve; therefore he only slays the false idols for his God.
What is done for the love of this being, what else should it be but a —
work of love?  But I, when I criticize, do not even have myself before
my eyes, but am only doing myself a pleasure, amusing myself according
to my taste; according to my several needs I chew the thing up or only
inhale its odor.

The distinction between the two attitudes will come out still more
strikingly if one reflects that the servile critic, because love guides
him, supposes he is serving the thing (cause) itself.

_The_ truth, or “truth in general,” people are bound not to give up, but
to seek for.  What else is it but the _Être suprême_, the highest
essence?  Even “true criticism” would have to despair if it lost faith
in the truth.  And yet the truth is only a — _thought_; but it is not
merely “a” thought, but the thought that is above all thoughts, the
irrefragable thought; it is _the_ thought itself, which gives the first
hallowing to all others; it is the consecration of thoughts, the
“absolute,” the “sacred” thought.  The truth wears longer than all the
gods; for it is only in the truth’s service, and for love of it, that
people have overthrown the gods and at last God himself.  “The truth”
outlasts the downfall of the world of gods, for it is the immortal soul
of this transitory world of gods, it is Deity itself.

I will answer Pilate’s question, What is truth?  Truth is the free
thought, the free idea, the free spirit; truth is what is free from you,
what is not your own, what is not in your power.  But truth is also the
completely unindependent, impersonal, unreal, and incorporeal; truth
cannot step forward as you do, cannot move, change, develop; truth
awaits and receives everything from you, and itself is only through you;
for it exists only — in your head.  You concede that the truth is a
thought, but say that not every thought is a true one, or, as you are
also likely to express it, not every thought is truly and really a
thought.  And by what do you measure and recognize the thought?  By
_your impotence_, to wit, by your being no longer able to make any
successful assault on it!  When it overpowers you, inspires you, and
carries you away, then you hold it to be the true one.  Its dominion
over you certifies to you its truth; and, when it possesses you, and you
are possessed by it, then you feel well with it, for then you have found
your — _lord and master_.  When you were seeking the truth, what did
your heart then long for?  For your master!  You did not aspire to
_your_ might, but to a Mighty One, and wanted to exalt a Mighty One
(“Exalt ye the Lord our God!”).  The truth, my dear Pilate, is — the
Lord, and all who seek the truth are seeking and praising the Lord.
Where does the Lord exist?  Where else but in your head?  He is only
spirit, and, wherever you believe you really see him, there he is a —
ghost; for the Lord is merely something that is thought of, and it was
only the Christian pains and agony to make the invisible visible, the
spiritual corporeal, that generated the ghost and was the frightful
misery of the belief in ghosts.

As long as you believe in the truth, you do not believe in yourself, and
you are a — _servant_, a — _religious man_.  You alone are the truth, or
rather, you are more than the truth, which is nothing at all before you.
You too do assuredly ask about the truth, you too do assuredly
“criticize,” but you do not ask about a “higher truth” — to wit, one
that should be higher than you — nor criticize according to the
criterion of such a truth.  You address yourself to thoughts and
notions, as you do to the appearances of things, only for the purpose of
making them palatable to you, enjoyable to you, and your own: you want
only to subdue them and become their _owner_, you want to orient
yourself and feel at home in them, and you find them true, or see them
in their true light, when they can no longer slip away from you, no
longer have any unseized or uncomprehended place, or when they are
_right for you_, when they are your _property_.  If afterward they
become heavier again, if they wriggle themselves out of your power
again, then that is just their untruth — to wit, your impotence.  Your
impotence is their power, your humility their exaltation.  Their truth,
therefore, is you, or is the nothing which you are for them and in which
they dissolve: their truth is their _nothingness_.

Only as the property of me do the spirits, the truths, get to rest; and
they then for the first time really are, when they have been deprived of
their sorry existence and made a property of mine, when it is no longer
said “the truth develops itself, rules, asserts itself; history (also a
concept) wins the victory,” etc.  The truth never has won a victory, but
was always my _means_ to the victory, like the sword (“the sword of
truth”).  The truth is dead, a letter, a word, a material that I can use
up.  All truth by itself is dead, a corpse; it is alive only in the same
way as my lungs are alive — to wit, in the measure of my own vitality.
Truths are material, like vegetables and weeds; as to whether vegetable
or weed, the decision lies in me.

Objects are to me only material that I use up.  Wherever I put my hand I
grasp a truth, which I trim for myself.  The truth is certain to me, and
I do not need to long after it.  To do the truth a service is in no case
my intent; it is to me only a nourishment for my thinking head, as
potatoes are for my digesting stomach, or as a friend is for my social
heart.  As long as I have the humor and force for thinking, every truth
serves me only for me to work it up according to my powers.  As reality
or worldliness is “vain and a thing of naught” for Christians, so is the
truth for me.  It exists, exactly as much as the things of this world go
on existing although the Christian has proved their nothingness; but it
is vain, because it has its _value_ not _in itself_ but _in me.  Of
itself_ it is _valueless_.  The truth is a — _creature_.

As you produce innumerable things by your activity, yes, shape the
earth’s surface anew and set up works of men everywhere, so too you may
still ascertain numberless truths by your thinking, and we will gladly
take delight in them.  Nevertheless, as I do not please to hand myself
over to serve your newly discovered machines mechanically, but only help
to set them running for my benefit, so too I will only use your truths,
without letting myself be used for their demands.

All truths _beneath_ me are to my liking; a truth _above_ me, a truth
that I should have to _direct_ myself by, I am not acquainted with.  For
me there is no truth, for nothing is more than I!  Not even my essence,
not even the essence of man, is more than I!  than I, this “drop in the
bucket,” this “insignificant man”!

You believe that you have done the utmost when you boldly assert that,
because every time has its own truth, there is no “absolute truth.” Why,
with this you nevertheless still leave to each time its truth, and thus
you quite genuinely create an “absolute truth,” a truth that no time
lacks, because every time, however its truth may be, still has a
“truth.”

Is it meant only that people have been thinking in every time, and so
have had thoughts or truths, and that in the subsequent time these were
other than they were in the earlier?  No, the word is to be that every
time had its “truth of faith”; and in fact none has yet appeared in
which a “higher truth” has not been recognized, a truth that people
believed they must subject themselves to as “highness and majesty.”
Every truth of a time is its fixed idea, and, if people later found
another truth, this always happened only because they sought for
another; they only reformed the folly and put a modern dress on it.  For
they did want — who would dare doubt their justification for this?  —
they wanted to be “inspired by an idea.” They wanted to be dominated —
possessed, by a _thought_!  The most modern ruler of this kind is “our
essence,” or “man.”

For all free criticism a thought was the criterion; for own criticism I
am, I the unspeakable, and so not the merely thought-of; for what is
merely thought of is always speakable, because word and thought
coincide.  That is true which is mine, untrue that whose own I am; true,
_e.g._ the union; untrue, the State and society.  “Free and true”
criticism takes care for the consistent dominion of a thought, an idea,
a spirit; “own” criticism, for nothing but my _self-enjoyment_.  But in
this the latter is in fact — and we will not spare it this “ignominy”!
— like the bestial criticism of instinct.  I, like the criticizing
beast, am concerned only for _myself_, not “for the cause.” I am the
criterion of truth, but I am not an idea, but more than idea, _e.g._,
unutterable.  _My criticism_ is not a “free” criticism, not free from
me, and not “servile,” not in the service of an idea, but an _own_
criticism.

True or human criticism makes out only whether something is _suitable_
to man, to the true man; but by own criticism you ascertain whether it
is suitable to _you_.

Free criticism busies itself with _ideas_, and therefore is always
theoretical.  However it may rage against ideas, it still does not get
clear of them.  It pitches into the ghosts, but it can do this only as
it holds them to be ghosts.  The ideas it has to do with do not fully
disappear; the morning breeze of a new day does not scare them away.

The critic may indeed come to ataraxia before ideas, but he never gets
_rid_ of them; _i.e._ he will never comprehend that above the _bodily
man_ there does not exist something higher — to wit, liberty, his
humanity, etc.  He always has a “calling” of man still left, “humanity.”
And this idea of humanity remains unrealized, just because it is an
“idea” and is to remain such.

If, on the other hand, I grasp the idea as _my_ idea, then it is already
realized, because I am its reality; its reality consists in the fact
that I, the bodily, have it.

They say, the idea of liberty realizes itself in the history of the
world.  The reverse is the case; this idea is real as a man thinks it,
and it is real in the measure in which it is idea, _i.  e._ in which I
think it or _have_ it.  It is not the idea of liberty that develops
itself, but men develop themselves, and, of course, in this
self-development develop their thinking too.

In short, the critic is not yet _owner_, because he still fights with
ideas as with powerful aliens — as the Christian is not owner of his
“bad desires” so long as he has to combat them; for him who contends
against vice, vice _exists_.

Criticism remains stuck fast in the “freedom of knowing,” the freedom of
the spirit, and the spirit gains its proper freedom when it fills itself
with the pure, true idea; this is the freedom of thinking, which cannot
be without thoughts.

Criticism smites one idea only by another, _e.g._ that of privilege by
that of manhood, or that of egoism by that of unselfishness.

In general, the beginning of Christianity comes on the stage again in
its critical end, egoism being combated here as there.  I am not to make
myself (the individual) count, but the idea, the general.

Why, warfare of the priesthood with _egoism_, of the spiritually minded
with the worldly-minded, constitutes the substance of all Christian
history.  In the newest criticism this war only becomes all-embracing,
fanaticism complete.  Indeed, neither can it pass away till it passes
thus, after it has had its life and its rage out.


	* * *

Whether what I think and do is Christian, what do I care?  Whether it is
human, liberal, humane, whether unhuman, illiberal, inhuman, what do I
ask about that?  If only it accomplishes what I want, if only I satisfy
myself in it, then overlay it with predicates as you will; it is all
alike to me.

Perhaps I too, in the very next moment, defend myself against my former
thoughts; I too am likely to change suddenly my mode of action; but not
on account of its not corresponding to Christianity, not on account of
its running counter to the eternal rights of man, not on account of its
affronting the idea of mankind, humanity, and humanitarianism, but —
because I am no longer all in it, because it no longer furnishes me any
full enjoyment, because I doubt the earlier thought or no longer please
myself in the mode of action just now practiced.

As the world as property has become a _material_ with which I undertake
what I will, so the spirit too as property must sink down into a
_material_ before which I no longer entertain any sacred dread.  Then,
firstly, I shall shudder no more before a thought, let it appear as
presumptuous and “devilish” as it will, because, if it threatens to
become too inconvenient and unsatisfactory for _me_, its end lies in my
power; but neither shall I recoil from any deed because there dwells in
it a spirit of godlessness, immorality, wrongfulness.  as little as St.
Boniface pleased to desist, through religious scrupulousness, from
cutting down the sacred oak of the heathens.  If the _things_ of the
world have once become vain, the thoughts of the spirit must also become
vain.

No thought is sacred, for let no thought rank as “devotions”;[_Andacht_,
a compound form of the word “thought”] no feeling is sacred (no sacred
feeling of friendship, mother’s feelings, etc.), no belief is sacred.
They are all _alienable_, my alienable property, and are annihilated, as
they are created, by _me_.

The Christian can lose all _things_ or objects, the most loved persons,
these “objects” of his love, without giving up himself (_i.e._, in the
Christian sense, his spirit, his soul!  as lost.  The owner can cast
from him all the _thoughts_ that were dear to his heart and kindled his
zeal, and will likewise “gain a thousandfold again,” because he, their
creator, remains.

Unconsciously and involuntarily we all strive toward ownness, and there
will hardly be one among us who has not given up a sacred feeling, a
sacred thought, a sacred belief; nay, we probably meet no one who could
not still deliver himself from one or another of his sacred thoughts.
All our contention against convictions starts from the opinion that
maybe we are capable of driving our opponent out of his entrenchments of
thought.  But what I do unconsciously I half-do, and therefore after
every victory over a faith I become again the _prisoner_ (possessed) of
a faith which then takes my whole self anew into its _service_, and
makes me an enthusiast for reason after I have ceased to be enthusiastic
for the Bible, or an enthusiast for the idea of humanity after I have
fought long enough for that of Christianity.

Doubtless, as owner of thoughts, I shall cover my property with my
shield, just as I do not, as owner of things, willingly let everybody
help himself to them; but at the same time I shall look forward
smilingly to the outcome of the battle, smilingly lay the shield on the
corpses of my thoughts and my faith, smilingly triumph when I am beaten.
That is the very humor of the thing.  Every one who has “sublimer
feelings” is able to vent his humor on the pettiness of men; but to let
it play with all “great thoughts, sublime feelings, noble inspiration,
and sacred faith” presupposes that I am the owner of all.

If religion has set up the proposition that we are sinners altogether, I
set over against it the other: we are perfect altogether!  For we are,
every moment, all that we can be; and we never need be more.  Since no
defect cleaves to us, sin has no meaning either.  Show me a sinner in
the world still, if no one any longer needs to do what suits a superior!
If I only need do what suits myself, I am no sinner if I do not do what
suits myself, as I do not injure in myself a “holy one”; if, on the
other hand, I am to be pious, then I must do what suits God; if I am to
act humanly, I must do what suits the essence of man, the idea of
mankind, etc.  What religion calls the “sinner,” humanitarianism calls
the “egoist.” But, once more: if I need not do what suits any other, is
the “egoist,” in whom humanitarianism has borne to itself a new-fangled
devil, anything more than a piece of nonsense?  The egoist, before whom
the humane shudder, is a spook as much as the devil is: he exists only
as a bogie and phantasm in their brain.  If they were not
unsophisticatedly drifting back and forth in the antediluvian opposition
of good and evil, to which they have given the modern names of “human”
and “egoistic,” they would not have freshened up the hoary “sinner” into
an “egoist” either, and put a new patch on an old garment.  But they
could not do otherwise, for they hold it for their task to be “men.”
They are rid of the Good One; good is left![105]

We are perfect altogether, and on the whole earth there is not one man
who is a sinner!  There are crazy people who imagine that they are God
the Father, God the Son, or the man in the moon, and so too the world
swarms with fools who seem to themselves to be sinners; but, as the
former are not the man in the moon, so the latter are — not sinners.
Their sin is imaginary.

Yet, it is insidiously objected, their craziness or their possessedness
is at least their sin.  Their possessedness is nothing but what they —
could achieve, the result of their development, just as Luther’s faith
in the Bible was all that he was — competent to make out.  The one
brings himself into the madhouse with his development, the other brings
himself therewith into the Pantheon and to the loss of —Valhalla.

There is no sinner and no sinful egoism!

Get away from me with your “philanthropy”!  Creep in, you
philanthropist, into the “dens of vice,” linger awhile in the throng of
the great city: will you not everywhere find sin, and sin, and again
sin?  Will you not wail over corrupt humanity, not lament at the
monstrous egoism?  Will you see a rich man without finding him pitiless
and “egoistic?” Perhaps you already call yourself an atheist, but you
remain true to the Christian feeling that a camel will sooner go through
a needle’s eye than a rich man not be an “un-man.” How many do you see
anyhow that you would not throw into the “egoistic mass”?  What,
therefore, has your philanthropy [love of man] found?  Nothing but
unlovable men!  And where do they all come from?  From you, from your
philanthropy!  You brought the sinner with you in your head, therefore
you found him, therefore you inserted him everywhere.  Do not call men
sinners, and they are not: you alone are the creator of sinners; you,
who fancy that you love men, are the very one to throw them into the
mire of sin, the very one to divide them into vicious and virtuous, into
men and un-men, the very one to befoul them with the slaver of your
possessedness; for you love not _men_, but _man_.  But I tell you, you
have never seen a sinner, you have only — dreamed of him.

Self-enjoyment is embittered to me by my thinking I must serve another,
by my fancying myself under obligation to him, by my holding myself
called to “self-sacrifice,” “resignation,” “enthusiasm.” All right: if I
no longer serve any idea, any “higher essence,” then it is clear of
itself that I no longer serve any man either, but — under all
circumstances — _myself_.  But thus I am not merely in fact or in being,
but also for my consciousness, the — unique.[_Einzige_]

There pertains to _you_ more than the divine, the human, etc.; _yours_
pertains to you.

Look upon yourself as more powerful than they give you out for, and you
have more power; look upon yourself as more, and you have more.

You are then not merely _called_ to everything divine, _entitled_ to
everything human, but _owner_ of what is yours, _i.e._ of all that you
possess the force to make your own; [_Eigen_] _i.e._ you are
_appropriate_ [_geeignet_] and capacitated for everything that is yours.

People have always supposed that they must give me a destiny lying
outside myself, so that at last they demanded that I should lay claim to
the human because I am — man.  This is the Christian magic circle.
Fichte’s ego too is the same essence outside me, for every one is ego;
and, if only this ego has rights, then it is “the ego,” it is not I.
But I am not an ego along with other egos, but the sole ego: I am
unique.  Hence my wants too are unique, and my deeds; in short,
everything about me is unique.  And it is only as this unique I that I
take everything for my own, as I set myself to work, and develop myself,
only as this.  I do not develop men, nor as man, but, as I, I develop —
myself.

This is the meaning of the — _unique one_.

** III.  The Unique One

Pre-Christian and Christian times pursue opposite goals; the former
wants to idealize the real, the latter to realize the ideal; the former
seeks the “holy spirit,” the latter the “glorified body.” Hence the
former closes with insensitivity to the real, with “contempt for the
world”; the latter will end with the casting off of the ideal, with
“contempt for the spirit.”

The opposition of the real and the ideal is an irreconcilable one, and
the one can never become the other: if the ideal became the real, it
would no longer be the ideal; and, if the real became the ideal, the
ideal alone would be, but not at all the real.  The opposition of the
two is not to be vanquished otherwise than if some one annihilates both.
Only in this _“some one_,” the third party, does the opposition find its
end; otherwise idea and reality will ever fail to coincide.  The idea
cannot be so realized as to remain idea, but is realized only when it
dies as idea; and it is the same with the real.

But now we have before us in the ancients adherents of the idea, in the
moderns adherents of reality.  Neither can get clear of the opposition,
and both pine only, the one party for the spirit, and, when this craving
of the ancient world seemed to be satisfied and this spirit to have
come, the others immediately for the secularization of this spirit
again, which must forever remain a “pious wish.”

The pious wish of the ancients was _sanctity_, the pious wish of the
moderns is _corporeity_.  But, as antiquity had to go down if its
longing was to be satisfied (for it consisted only in the longing), so
too corporeity can never be attained within the ring of Christianness.
As the trait of sanctification or purification goes through the old
world (the washings, etc.), so that of incorporation goes through the
Christian world: God plunges down into this world, becomes flesh, and
wants to redeem it, _e.g._, fill it with himself; but, since he is “the
idea” or “the spirit,” people (_e.g._ Hegel) in the end introduce the
idea into everything, into the world, and prove “that the idea is, that
reason is, in everything.” “Man” corresponds in the culture of today to
what the heathen Stoics set up as “the wise man”; the latter, like the
former, a — _fleshless_ being.  The unreal “wise man,” this bodiless
“holy one” of the Stoics, became a real person, a bodily “Holy One,” in
God _made flesh;_ the unreal “man,” the bodiless ego, will become real
in the _corporeal ego_, in _me_.

There winds its way through Christianity the question about the
“existence of God,” which, taken up ever and ever again, gives testimony
that the craving for existence, corporeity, personality, reality, was
incessantly busying the heart because it never found a satisfying
solution.  At last the question about the existence of God fell, but
only to rise up again in the proposition that the “divine” had existence
(Feuerbach).  But this too has no existence, and neither will the last
refuge, that the “purely human” is realizable, afford shelter much
longer.  No idea has existence, for none is capable of corporeity.  The
scholastic contention of realism and nominalism has the same content; in
short, this spins itself out through all Christian history, and cannot
end _in_ it.

The world of Christians is working at _realizing ideas_ in the
individual relations of life, the institutions and laws of the Church
and the State; but they make resistance, and always keep back something
unembodied (unrealizable).  Nevertheless this embodiment is restlessly
rushed after, no matter in what degree _corporeity_ constantly fails to
result.

For realities matter little to the realizer, but it matters everything
that they be realizations of the idea.  Hence he is ever examining anew
whether the realized does in truth have the idea, its kernel, dwelling
in it; and in testing the real he at the same time tests the idea,
whether it is realizable as he thinks it, or is only thought by him
incorrectly, and for that reason unfeasibly.

The Christian is no longer to care for family, State, etc., as
_existences;_ Christians are not to sacrifice themselves for these
“divine things” like the ancients, but these are only to be utilized to
make the _spirit alive_ in them.  The _real_ family has become
indifferent, and there is to arise out of it an _ideal_ one which would
then be the “truly real,” a sacred family, blessed by God, or, according
to the liberal way of thinking, a “rational” family.  With the ancients,
family, State, fatherland, is divine as a thing _extant;_ with the
moderns it is still awaiting divinity, as extant it is only sinful,
earthly, and has still to be “redeemed,” _i.  e._, to become truly real.
This has the following meaning: The family, etc., is not the extant and
real, but the divine, the idea, is extant and real; whether _this_
family will make itself real by taking up the truly real, the idea, is
still unsettled.  It is not the individual’s task to serve the family as
the divine, but, reversely, to serve the divine and to bring to it the
still undivine family, to subject everything in the idea’s name, to set
up the idea’s banner everywhere, to bring the idea to real efficacy.

But, since the concern of Christianity, as of antiquity, is for the
_divine_, they always come out at this again on their opposite ways.  At
the end of heathenism the divine becomes the _extramundane_, at the end
of Christianity the _intramundane_.  Antiquity does not succeed in
putting it entirely outside the world, and, when Christianity
accomplishes this task, the divine instantly longs to get back into the
world and wants to “redeem” the world.  But within Christianity it does
not and cannot come to this, that the divine as _intramundane_ should
really become the _mundane itself:_ there is enough left that does and
must maintain itself unpenetrated as the “bad,” irrational, accidental,
“egoistic,” the “mundane” in the bad sense.  Christianity begins with
God’s becoming man, and carries on its work of conversion and redemption
through all time in order to prepare for God a reception in all men and
in everything human, and to penetrate everything with the spirit: it
sticks to preparing a place for the “spirit.”

When the accent was at last laid on Man or mankind, it was again the
idea that they _“pronounced eternal_.” “Man does not die!” They thought
they had now found the reality of the idea: _Man is_ the I of history,
of the world’s history; it is he, this _ideal_, that really develops,
_i.e.  realizes_, himself.  He is the really real and corporeal one, for
history is his body, in which individuals are only members.  Christ is
the I of the world’s history, even of the pre-Christian; in modern
apprehension it is man, the figure of Christ has developed into the
_figure of man:_ man as such, man absolutely, is the “central point” of
history.  In “man” the imaginary beginning returns again; for “man” is
as imaginary as Christ is.  “Man,” as the I of the world’s history,
closes the cycle of Christian apprehensions.

Christianity’s magic circle would be broken if the strained relation
between existence and calling, _e.g._, between me as I am and me as I
should be, ceased; it persists only as the longing of the idea for its
bodiliness, and vanishes with the relaxing separation of the two: only
when the idea remains — idea, as man or mankind is indeed a bodiless
idea, is Christianity still extant.  The corporeal idea, the corporeal
or “completed” spirit, floats before the Christian as “the end of the
days” or as the “goal of history”; it is not present time to him.

The individual can only have a part in the founding of the Kingdom of
God, or, according to the modern notion of the same thing, in the
development and history of humanity; and only so far as he has a part in
it does a Christian, or according to the modern expression human, value
pertain to him; for the rest he is dust and a worm-bag.  That the
individual is of himself a world’s history, and possesses his property
in the rest of the world’s history, goes beyond what is Christian.  To
the Christian the world’s history is the higher thing, because it is the
history of Christ or “man”; to the egoist only _his_ history has value,
because he wants to develop only _himself_ not the mankind-idea, not
God’s plan, not the purposes of Providence, not liberty, etc.  He does
not look upon himself as a tool of the idea or a vessel of God, he
recognizes no calling, he does not fancy that he exists for the further
development of mankind and that he must contribute his mite to it, but
he lives himself out, careless of how well or ill humanity may fare
thereby.  If it were not open to confusion with the idea that a state of
nature is to be praised, one might recall Lenau’s “_Three Gypsies.”_-
What, am I in the world to realize ideas?  To do my part by my
citizenship, say, toward the realization of the idea “State,” or by
marriage, as husband and father, to bring the idea of the family into an
existence?  What does such a calling concern me!  I live after a calling
as little as the flower grows and gives fragrance after a calling.

The ideal “Man” is _realized_ when the Christian apprehension turns
about and becomes the proposition, “I, this unique one, am man.” The
conceptual question, “what is man?” — has then changed into the personal
question, “who is man?” With “what” the concept was sought for, in order
to realize it; with “who” it is no longer any question at all, but the
answer is personally on hand at once in the asker: the question answers
itself.

They say of God, “Names name thee not.” That holds good of me: no
_concept_ expresses me, nothing that is designated as my essence
exhausts me; they are only names.  Likewise they say of God that he is
perfect and has no calling to strive after perfection.  That too holds
good of me alone.

I am _owner_ of my might, and I am so when I know myself as _unique_.
In the _unique one_ the owner himself returns into his creative nothing,
of which he is born.  Every higher essence above me, be it God, be it
man, weakens the feeling of my uniqueness, and pales only before the sun
of this consciousness.  If I concern myself for myself,[_Stell’ Ich auf
Mich meine Sache._ Literally, “if I set my affair on myself”] the unique
one, then my concern rests on its transitory, mortal creator, who
consumes himself, and I may say:

All things are nothing to me.[106]

 

[1] [_“Ich hab’ Mein’ Sach’ auf Nichts gestellt”_, first line of
Goethe’s poem, “_Vanitas!  Vanitatum Vanitas!_” Literal translation: “I
have set my affair on nothing.”]

[2] Luke 11, 13.

[3] Heb.  11.  13.

[4] Mark 10.  29.

[5] [Italicized in the original for the sake of its etymology,
_Scharfsinn_ — “sharp-sense”.  Compare next paragraph.]

[6] 2 Cor.  5.  17.  [The words “new” and “modern” are the same in
German.]

[7] [Title of a poem by Schiller]

[8] [The reader will remember (it is to be hoped has never forgotten)
that “mind” and “spirit” are one and the same word in German.  For
several pages back the connection of the discourse has seemed to require
the almost exclusive use of the translation “spirit,” but to complete
the sense it has often been necessary that the reader recall the thought
of its identity with “mind,” as stated in a previous note.]

[9] _Essence of Christianity_

[10] [Or, “highest essence.” The word _Wesen_, which means both
“essence” and “being,” will be translated now one way and now the other
in the following pages.  The reader must bear in mind that these two
words are identical in German; and so are “supreme” and “highest.”]

[11] Cf.  _e.g._ _Essence of Christianity_, p.  402.

[12] [That is, the abstract conception of man, as in the preceding
sentence.]

[13] _E.g._ Rom.  8.  9, 1 Cor.  3.  16, John 20.  22 and innumerable
other passages.

[14] [How the priests tinkle!  how important they / Would make it out,
that men should come their way / And babble, just as yesterday, today!
// Oh, blame them not!  They know man’s need, I say!  / For he takes all
his happiness this way, / To babble just tomorrow as today.  —
_Translated from Goethe’s “Venetian Epigrams.”_]

[15] “_Achtzehntes Jahrhundert_”, II, 519.

[16] _De la Création de l’Ordre_ etc., p.  36.

[17] _Anekdota_, II, 64.

[18] _Essence of Christianity_, second edition, p.  402.

[19] P.  403.

[20] P.  408.

[21] [Rousseau, the Philanthropists; and others were hostile to culture
and intelligence, but they overlooked the fact that this is present in
_all_ men of the Christian type, and assailed only learned and refined
culture.]

[22] _Die Volksphilosophie unserer Tage_, p.  22.

[23] [Called in English theology “original sin.”]

[24] [Goethe, _Faust_.]

[25] _Anekdota_, II, 152.

[26] [Schiller, “_Die Worte des Glaubens_”.]

[27] [Parodied from the words of Mephistopheles in the witch’s kitchen
in _Faust_.]

[28] John 2.  4.

[29] Matt.  10.  35.

[30] _Essence of Christianity_, p.  403.

[31] Mark.  9.  23.

[32] [Or “citizenhood.” The word [_das Buergertum_] means either the
condition of being a citizen, or citizen-like principles, of the body of
citizens or of the middle or business class, the _bourgeoisie_.]

[33] 1 Corinthians 8.  4.

[34] _Ein und zwanzig Bogen_, p.  12

[35] Louis Blanc says (“_Histoire des dix Ans_”, I, p.  138) of the time
of the Restoration: “_Le protestantisme devint le fond des idées et des
moeurs_.”

[36] [In German an exact quotation of Luke 10.  7.]

[37] Proudhon (_Création de l’Ordre_) cries out, p.  414, “In industry,
as in science, the publication of an invention is the first and _most
sacred of duties_!”

[38] [In his strictures on “criticism” Stirner refers to a special
movement known by that name in the early forties of the last century, of
which Bruno Bauer was the principal exponent.  After his official
separation from the faculty of the university of Bonn on account of his
views in regard to the Bible, Bruno Bauer in 1843 settled near Berlin
and founded the _Allgemeine Literatur-Zeitung_, in which he and his
friends, at war with their surroundings, championed the “absolute
emancipation” of the individual within the limits of “pure humanity” and
fought as their foe “the mass,” comprehending in that term the radical
aspirations of political liberalism and the communistic demands of the
rising Socialist movement of that time.  For a brief account of Bruno
Bauer’s movement of criticism, see John Henry Mackay, _Max Stirner.
Sein Leben und sein Werk_.]

[39] Br.  Bauer, _Lit.  Ztg_.  V, 18

[40] _Lit.  Ztg_.  V, 26

[41] [Referring to minute subdivision of labor, whereby the single
workman produces, not a whole, but a part.]

[42] _Lit.  Ztg_.  V, 34.

[43] _Lit.  Ztg_.  _ibid_.

[44] Br.  Bauer, _Judenfrage_, p.  66

[45] Br.  Bauer, “_Die gute Sache der Freiheit_,” pp.  62–63.

[46] Br.  Bauer, “_Judenfrage_,” p.  60.

[47] [It should be remembered that to be an _Unmensch_ [“un-man”] one
must be a man.  The word means an inhuman or unhuman man, a man who is
not man.  A tiger, an avalanche, a drought, a cabbage, is not an
un-man.]

[48] _Lit.  Ztg_., V, 23; as comment, V, 12ff.

[49] _Lit.  Ztg_, V 15.

[50] Rom.  6, 18.

[51] 1 Pet.  2.  16.

[52] James 2.  12.

[53] [Parodied from the words of Mephistopheles in the witch’s kitchen
in _Faust_.]

[54] [Meaning “German”.  Written in this form because of the
censorship.]

[55] Rom 8.  14.

[56] Cf.  John 3.  10.  with Rom.  8.  16.

[57] Karl Marx, in the _Deutsch-französische Jahrbucher_, p.  197.

[58] Br.  Bauer, _Judenfrage_,, p.  61.

[59] Hess, _Triarchie_, p.  76.

[60] _Essence of Christianity_, 2nd ed., p.  401

[61] Mark 3.  29.

[62] [This word has also, in German, the meaning of “common law,” and
will sometimes be translated “law” in the following paragraphs.]

[63] Cf.  _Die Kommunisten in der Schweiz_, committee report, p.  3.

[64] A.  Becker, _Volksphilosophie_, p.  22f.

[65] [Mephistopheles in _Faust_.]

[66] “I beg you, spare my lungs!  He who insists on proving himself
right, if he but has one of those things called tongues, can hold his
own in all the world’s despite!” [Faust’s words to Mephistopheles,
slightly misquoted.  — For _Rechthaberei_: literally the character of
always insisting on making one’s self out to be in the right]

[67] _This Book Belongs to the King_, p.  376.

[68] P.  376

[69] P.  374

[70] P.  381

[71] P.  385

[72] See _Political Speeches_, 10, p.  153

[73] [_Volk_; but the etymological remark following applies equally to
the English word “people.” See Liddell & Scott’s Greek lexicon, under
_pimplemi_.]

[74] [The word _Genosse_, “companion,” signifies originally a companion
in enjoyment.]

[75] [This word in German does not mean religion, but, as in Latin,
faithfulness to family ties — as we speak of “filial piety.” But the
word elsewhere translated “pious” [_fromm_] means “religious,” as
usually in English.]

[76] [It should be remembered that the words “establish” and “State” are
both derived from the root “stand.”]

[77] What was said in the concluding remarks after Humane Liberalism
holds good of the following — to wit, that it was likewise written
immediately after the appearance of the book cited.

[78] [In the philosophical sense [a thinking and acting being] not in
the political sense.]

[79] [_Création de l’Ordre_, p.485.]

[80] [_Kölner Dom_, p.4.]

[81] B.  Bauer, _Lit.  Ztg_.  8,22.

[82] _E.  u.  Z.  B._, p.  89ff.

[83] [It should be remembered that to be an _Unmensch_ [“un-man”] one
must be a man.  The word means an inhuman or unhuman man, a man who is
not man.  A tiger, an avalanche, a drought, a cabbage, is not an
un-man.]

[84] [The words “cot” and “dung” are alike in German.]

[85] _e.g._, _Qu’est-ce que la Propriété?_ p.  83

[86] [Apparently some benevolent scheme of the day; see next note]

[87] In a registration bill for Ireland the government made the proposal
to let those be electors who pay £5 sterling of poor-rates.  He who
gives alms, therefore, acquires political rights, or elsewhere becomes a
swan-knight.  [see previous note]

[88] Minister Stein used this expression about Count von Reisach, when
he cold-bloodedly left the latter at the mercy of the Bavarian
government because to him, as he said, “a government like Bavaria must
be worth more than a simple individual.” Reisach had written against
Montgelas at Stein’s bidding, and Stein later agreed to the giving up of
Reisach, which was demanded by Montgelas on account of this very book.
See Hinrichs, _Politische Vorlesungen_, I, 280.

[89] In colleges and universities poor men compete with rich.  But they
are able to do in most eases only through scholarships, which — a
significant point — almost all come down to us from a time when free
competition was still far from being a controlling principle.  The
principle of competition founds no scholarship, but says, Help yourself;
provide yourself the means.  What the State gives for such purposes it
pays out from interested motives, to educate “servants” for itself.

[90] II, p.  91ff.  (See my note above.)

[91] Athanasius.

[92] Feuerbach, _Essence of Chr._, 394.

[93] To secure myself against a criminal charge I superfluously make the
express remark that I choose the word “insurrection” on account of its
etymological sense, and therefore am not using it in the limited sense
which is disallowed by the penal code.

[94] 1 Cor.  15.  26.

[95] 2 Tim.  1.  10.

[96] [See the next to the last scene of the tragedy: “ODOARDO: Under the
pretext of a judicial investigation he tears you out of our arms and
takes you to Grimaldi.  ...  // EMILIA: Give me that dagger, father, me!
...  // ODOARDO: No, no!  Reflect — You too have only one life to lose.
// EMILIA: And only one innocence!  // ODOARDO: Which is above the reach
of any violence.  — // EMILIA: But not above the reach of any seduction.
— Violence!  violence!  Who cannot defy violence?  What is called
violence is nothing; seduction is the true violence.  — I have blood,
father; blood as youthful and warm as anybody’s.  My senses are senses.
— I can warrant nothing.  I am sure of nothing.  I know Grimaldi’s
house.  It is the house of pleasure.  An hour there, under my mother’s
eyes — and there arose in my soul so much tumult as the strictest
exercises of religion could hardly quiet in weeks.  — Religion!  And
what religion?  — To escape nothing worse, thousands sprang into the
water and are saints.  — Give me that dagger, father, give it to me.
...  // EMILIA: Once indeed there was a father who.  to save his
daughter from shame, drove into her heart whatever steel he could
quickest find — gave life to her for the second time.  But all such
deeds are of the past!  Of such fathers there are no more.  ODOARDO:
Yes, daughter, yes!” (_Stabs her_.)]

[97] _Der Kommunismus in der Schweiz_, p.  24.

[98] _Ibid_, p.  63

[99] Rom.  1.  25.

[100] P.  47ff.

[101] Chamber of peers, Apr.  25, 1844.

[102] _Anekdota_, 1, 120.

[103] _Anekdota_, 1, 127.

[104] 1 Thess.  5.  21.

[105] [Parodied from the words of Mephistopheles in the witch’s kitchen
in _Faust_.]

[106] [“_Ich hab’ Mein’ Sach’ auf Nichts gestellt_.” Literally, “I have
set my affair on nothing.”]

